(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ python main.py
“Drake then posted a video on his Instagram story showing off a card his neighbour gave him, with a bag of chocolates, saying the random gift made his day.”
“...hours...”
“GODS PLAN VIDEO LINK IN BIO A post shared by champagnepapi champagnepapi on Feb 16 2018 at 8 06am PST Hours later the Grammy winning singer issued a challenge on his Instagram saying let s all watch the world be nice to each other even if it s for 24”
“Before its release, Drake, 31, called the video “the most important thing I have ever done in my career”.”
“Don’t tell the label,” a message at the start of the video says.”
“We gave it all away.”
““The budget for this video was $US996,631.90.”
“The God’s Plan video up-ended the usual lavish efforts from music production companies, and instead showed Drake handing out wads of cash to struggling families, toys to children, scholarships to students and cheques to a women’s shelter and a youth club in Miami.”
“The Canadian rapper followed it up with a challenge on Instagram urging his fans to “go out and be nice to each other”.”
“RAPPER Drake has dropped a music video to match his new song God’s Plan, giving away almost $US1 million ($A1.4 million) in cash to people in the US state of Florida.”


Drake then posted a video on instagram showing a card and a bag of chocolates from a neighbor, saying the casual gift made him happy
“… Hours... "
"Project gods video link" at 8:06 am PST on February 16, 2018, champagnepapi champagnepapi shared a blog post, and then the Grammy award-winning singer sent out a challenge on instagram, saying, "let's watch the world together, be friendly to each other, even for 24 hours."
Drake, 31, called the video "the most important thing I've ever done in my career" before it was released
A message at the beginning of the video says, "don't tell the tag."
"We gave them all."
"The budget for this video is $996631.90."
The "plan of God" video ended the usual extravagant efforts of music production companies. Instead, Drake handed out a pile of cash to struggling families, toys to children, scholarships to students, and checks to a women's shelter and a youth club in Miami
The Canadian rapper then challenged his fans on instagram to "go out and be friendly."
Rapper Drake gave up a music video to match his new song "plan for God" and presented nearly one million dollars (1.4 million dollars) in cash to people in Florida



Number  1
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He previously sampled Hill’s song, “Doo Wop (That Thing)” for his hit, “Draft Day.””
“...using Lauryn Hill s Ex Factor is the second song by Drake that borrows from the former Fugee...”
“Wilde who is the first Hollywood star featured in the video looking fantastic in a black top and red skirt tweeted her approval This was funnnnnnnn Haddish also shared a clip on Instagram writing This video is great and Everybody is Looking Good The single equipped with a funky hook...”
“Thanks @Drake for reminding me I ain't gotta be nice to these guys lol — CINDY (@Spicy__girll) April 7, 2018Looks like the guest stars are just as pleased with the video as fans of the “Best I Ever Had” rapper are.”
“This New Drake song got the bad bitch in me feelinh even badder.”
“Thanks @Drake for reminding me I ain’t gotta be nice to these guys lol,” one Twitter user hilariously quipped.”
“Women always looking to gain a following and live in the light, but that also comes with some resistance and hate — despite what they go through, Drake understands it and appreciates the hustle.”“This New Drake song got the bad b—ch in me feelin[g] even badder.”
“— love, sabrina (@sabrinaaaj) April 7, 2018Another follower analyzed the message Drake was sending out with the video: “Throughout the song, Drake speaks about female empowerment in the digital age.”
“...fr fr pic twitter com mUL2XdLNuM Kÿ kyaraXOXO April 7 2018 drake really made a whole song empowering WOMEN i love 1 man and 1 man ONLY”
“One fan wrote NiceForWhat On Repeat Thank you Drake women of the world needed this song fr fr while another tweeted Drake really made a whole song empowering WOMEN i love 1 man and 1 man ONLY NiceForWhat On Repeat Thank you Drake women of the world needed this song...”


He previously picked Hill's song "Doo woo" for his hit song "draft day."
“… Using Laurin Hill's pre factor is Drake's second song, borrowed from former fudge... "
"Wilde is the first Hollywood star to appear in the video. She looks great in her black coat and red skirt. She agrees on twitter. This is funnnnnnnn haddish. She also shares a video on instagram, which says that this video is great, everyone is good-looking, and this single has a fashionable hook..."
"Thank you @ Drake for reminding me that I don't have to be nice to these guys lol Cindy (@ spicy / u girl) April 7, 2018 it seems that guest stars are as satisfied with this video as fans of" my best rap singer ever. "
"This new Drake song makes me think bad bitches are worse."
"Thanks @ Drake for reminding me that I don't have to be nice to these guys, ha ha," one twitter user joked
"Women always want followers and live in the light, but it also brings some resistance and hatred - despite what they have experienced, Drake understands that and appreciates the noise." "This new Drake song makes me feel worse."
"Love, Sabrina (@ sabrinaaaaj) on April 7, 2018, another follower analyzed Drake's message in the video:" throughout the song, Drake talks about empowering women in the digital age. "
“… Fr fr pic twitter com mul2xdlnum K Ⅻ kyaraxoxoxo April 7, 2018 Derek really made a whole song empowering women I love a man and a man only
"One fan wrote a song to thank Drake women in the world for needing this song, while another fan wrote a whole song on Twitter to empower women. I love a man and a man, only nice. Thank Drake women in the world for needing this song..."



Number  2
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“Khloé Kardashian hosted, posting images on her Instagram story of the decor, all the pool floaties, and the fancy, chef-prepared burger stand.”
“(Plus a loooot of booze.)”
“InstagramInstagramInstagramInstagramThis content is imported from Instagram.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“But her most revealing Insta was a video of the entertainment...and Kendall Jenner and her rumored boyfriend/roommate Ben Simmons cuddling in the background.”
“While the two have kissed out in public before, this is their first time showing any PDA on an official Kardashian social channel.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"This content was imported from instagram."
"Hosted by khlo é Kardashian, on her instagram, she posted pictures of decorations, all the swimming pool buoys and the exquisite hamburger stand prepared by the chef."
(with a large glass of wine)
"Instagram instagram instagram this content was imported from instagram."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"But her most exposed insta is an entertainment video Kendall Jenner and her rumored boyfriend / roommate Ben Simmons hugged backstage
"Although they've been making out in public before, this is the first time they've played a PDA on Kardashian's official social channel."



Number  3
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“...with an emphasis on all things Star Wars Marvel and Game of Thrones...”
“Getty Images Gina Torres Getty Images Gabriel Macht and Jacinda Barrett Getty Images Sarah Rafferty Getty Images Abigail Spencer with Priyanka Chopra Getty Images Patrick J Adams Getty Images Rick Hoffman Matt Miller Culture Editor Matt is the Culture Editor at Esquire where he covers music movies books and TV”
“But we didn't know until this morning exactly which of Markle's former coworkers were invited to the wedding.”
“Various sources confirmed that "the cast and key executives from the hit US show are on the invite list for the royal wedding."”
“That's the hit USA legal drama on which Markle played Rachel Zane, a former paralegal and Columbia Law School grad and was engaged to Mike Ross, with whom she worked at Pearson Specter Litt.”
“But how about the Suits cast?”
“It's one of the rare moments in history when members of the British Royal Family mix with the likes of Oprah Winfrey and George Clooney.”
“There are a total of 600 lucky souls who will be invited to attend the biggest wedding of the year.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
“… Emphasize everything, Star Wars miracle and power game... "
"Gina Torres, Gabriel Macht and Jacinda Barrett, Sarah Lafferty, Abigail Spencer and Priyanka Chopra, Patrick J. Adams, Rick Hoffman, Matt Miller, culture editor Matt is the culture editor of gentleman magazine, responsible for music, movies, books and TV programs."
"But it wasn't until this morning that we found out who of Marcel's former colleagues had been invited to the wedding."
Various sources confirmed that "the actors and key executives of popular American dramas are on the royal wedding invitation list."
"This is a popular American law drama in which Marcel plays Rachel Zane, a former paralegal who graduated from Columbia Law School, is engaged to Mike Roth and works with him in Pearson Spector little."
"What about the suit actor?"
"This is one of the rare moments in history when members of the British royal family mingle with people like Oprah Winfrey and George Clooney."
"A total of 600 lucky people will be invited to the biggest wedding of the year."



Number  4
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He has not publicly named any individual as being subject of his allegations.”
“He has previously alleged industry figures molested young actors including himself and Haim.”
“The actor, now 46, has filed a report with police claiming he was sexually assaulted by Hollywood figures as a youngster.”
“...the Lost Boys actor s regular co star and friend Corey Feldman continues to speak out about child sex abuse in Hollywood...”
“He said Charlie was a loser Charlie Sheen and Corey Haim in Lucas Brascia is also alleged to have had a sexual relationship with Haim who died in 2010 at the age of 38 a claim that Brascia emphatically denied when asked about it by The Enquirer It comes as...”
““He claimed he didn’t like it and was finally over Sheen.”
“Brascia said: “Haim told me he had sex with Sheen again.”
“When Corey wanted to fool around again, Charlie was not interested.”( Charlie Sheen and Corey Haim were filming Lucas together when the alleged incident happened )According to Brascia, Haim also told him the co-stars had consensual sex years later, while Haim was in his mid-to-late 20s.”
““Haim said after it happened Sheen became very cold and rejected him.”
“See terms here {{message}} {{message}}“He told me they smoked pot and had sex.”


"He didn't name anyone publicly to be the object of his charges."
"He has previously accused the industry of molesting young actors, including himself and Haim."
The 46 year old actor submitted a report to police claiming that he had been sexually assaulted by Hollywood characters when he was young
“… Lost boy actor's regular co star and friend Corey Feldman goes on to say, "child sexual abuse in Hollywood..."
"He said that Charlie is a loser, and Charlize and Corey Haim in Lucas brasia were also accused of having sex with Haim, who died in 2010 at the age of 38. Brasia firmly denied that when asked about this, the questioner it came..."
"He said he didn't like it, and in the end it lost its luster."
"Haim told me he had sex with sin again," brasia said
"When Corey wanted to fool around again, Charlie wasn't interested." (Charlie Sheen and Corey Haim are said to be filming Lucas together at the time of the incident) according to brasia, Haim also told him that the couple had voluntary sex a few years later, and Haim was only in his mid and late 20s
"Haim said that after the incident, Xin became very indifferent and refused him."
"Look at the term here {message}}." he told me they smoked marijuana and had sex



Number  5
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Write to Laignee Barron at Laignee.Barron@time.com.”
“If you don't get the confirmation within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder.”
““Of course he said it,” Bush wrote in a New York Times op-ed Sunday titled, “Yes, Donald Trump, You Said That”.”
“Bush said he felt compelled to speak out after the president reportedly began telling aides and fellow politicians that the tape was fabricated.”
““President Trump is currently indulging in some revisionist history,” Bush said.”
““This has hit a raw nerve in me.”In the 2005 recording, which resurfaced during the final moments of last year’s presidential campaign when it was published by the Washington Post, Trump is heard lewdly bragging to Bush about groping and kissing women without their consent.”
“Trump on a hot mic tells the Access Hollywood anchor about unsuccessfully trying to have sex with a married woman and how you can do anything to women when you re a star He said he was able to grab them by the pussy After the recording s release Trump...”
“...then a presidential candidate issued an apology and dismissed the talk as locker room banter...”
“More recently, Trump has revisited the tape to question whether the voice heard is actually his, according to the New York Times.”
“Bush, who was fired by NBC after the tape’s release, confirms the voice is undoubtedly Trump’s, but adds that he only recently realized that the talk could be more than “hypothetical hot air from America’s highest-rated bloviator”.”


"To laignee Barron Lenny. Barron @ time.com. "
"If you are not confirmed within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder."
"Of course he said that," Bush wrote in the New York Times on Sunday, entitled "yes, Donald Trump, you said that."
"Bush said it was reported that after the president began telling aides and political colleagues that the tape was fabricated, he felt the need to speak."
"President trump is currently addicted to some revisionist history," Bush said
"It touched my nerves." In a 2005 recording, trump reappeared at the end of last year's presidential campaign, when the Washington Post published the recording. In the recording, trump was heard to obscene boast to Bush that he touched and kissed women without their consent
"Trump told the Hollywood anchor on a hot microphone that trying to have sex with married women failed. When you are a star, how can you do anything to women? He said that he can catch their pudenda after trump released the record..."
“…… Then a presidential candidate apologized and saw the conversation as a dressing room joke... "
According to the New York Times, "trump recently reviewed the tape and questioned whether the voice he heard was really his."
Bush, who was fired by NBC after the release of the tape, confirmed that the voice was undoubtedly Trump's, but added that he only recently realized that the conversation might not be just "the hypothetical hot air of America's most watched hooligans."



Number  6
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Although divorce rumors have popped up a few times over the years, they keep proving to be a perfect match for each other.”
“After my breakup, I was feeling really low and down and he said, ‘Just come to Paris and see my fashion show.’”They got married in 2014, and have since become parents of three to North, Saint, and Chicago.”
“However, she’s been married not just once, but twice before him.”
“Each marriage for Kardashian has been completely different from the other, and they help us see how much she and West are truly meant to be together.”
“Here’s an inside look at each of Kardashian’s three marriages.”
“Damon ThomasMost people don’t even realize Kardashian was ever married to music producer Damon Thomas.”
“They wed in 2000, when Kardashian was just 19 years old (and Thomas was 29).”
“While they separated in 2003 and were officially divorced in 2004, it wasn’t revealed until 2010 just how tumultuous their marriage really was.”
“In their divorce papers, Kardashian detailed how controlling and abusive he had been to her.”
““Damon decided what we would do and when we would do it,” she wrote.”


"Although there have been many divorce rumors over the years, it has been proved that divorce rumors are a perfect match for each other."
"After the breakup, I felt very depressed and he said," just come to Paris and see my fashion show. " They married in 2014 and later became parents of three children, north, saint and Chicago
"But she married more than once, and twice before him."
"Every marriage of Kardashian is totally different. They help us see that she and West are really destined to be together."
"Here's the inside story of Kardashian's three marriages."
"Most people don't even know that Kardashian was married to music producer Damon Thomas."
They married in 2000, when Kardashian was only 19 (Thomas was only 29)
"Although they separated in 2003 and formally divorced in 2004, it was not until 2010 that they revealed how turbulent their marriage was."
"In their divorce papers, Kardashian described in detail his control and abuse of her."
"Damon decided what we were going to do and when," she wrote



Number  7
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“AdvertisementDoctor Who continues on BBC1 on Saturday 27th May at the later time of 7.45pm...”
“As the Doctor would be sure to testify, it’s nice to be out of the dark once in a while.”
“But for now, we’re just basking in the metaphorical light of ONE mystery finally solved.”
“...into the wider action when she finally escapes is released from the vault...”
“Of course there are still plenty of mysteries and surprises still to come in this series from the identity of the evil monks and the return of John Simm s Master to why we keep seeing Peter Capaldi s Doctor regenerating early not to mention how exactly Missy will play...”
“...one the Doctor gave his captive at the end of episode 4”
“That dangerous friendship burning away who else will be lost to the flames We have to give full marks to the fans who already called this a couple of weeks ago after noticing clips in the trailers of Missy lying on what looked like a piano below just like the...”
““The story now is what’s going on between them.”
“And yes, it definitely is Missy in there – head writer Steven Moffat confirmed it to Radio Times in an exclusive in-depth discussion of the episode: “It’s definitely Missy in there, we’re not fooling you about that,” he said.”
“...to Earth for said vigil he made an oath to watch Missy s body for 1 000 years after her execution before sabotaging the execution so he could guard her living body instead...”


"On Saturday, May 27, at 7:45 p.m., the advertisement doctor continued on BBC1..."
"The doctor will certainly testify. It's good to come out of the dark once in a while."
"But for now, we're just immersed in the metaphor of a mystery that's finally solved."
“… When she finally escaped from the vault, she entered into a broader operation... "
"Of course, there are many mysteries and surprises in this series, from the identity of the evil monk and the return of Master John SIM to why we have been seeing Peter kapadi's doctor regenerate early, not to mention how Missy will play..."
“… At the end of Episode 4, the doctor gives him a prisoner
"Dangerous friendships burn out, and who else will be lost in the flames? We have to give the fans full marks. A few weeks ago, they noticed that the clip in Missy's trailer was lying on something like a piano below, like..."
"The story now is what happened between them."
"Yes, it must be Missy in there - lead author Steven Moffat confirmed this to the radio times in an exclusive in-depth discussion of the episode:" it must be Missy in there, we didn't fool you about that, "he said
“…… In order to watch the night, he vowed to guard Missy's body for 1000 years after she was executed, and then destroyed her execution, so that he could protect her living body.... "



Number  8
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Citations: Chrissy Teigen and Arthur Throw Shade at John Legend's Easter Bunny Outfit (E!)”
“TwitterThis bit is heading into its second month; follows are no longer guaranteed.”
“The couple took daughter Luna to snap a few photos with the Easter Bunny earlier this week, and John's outfit looked more like PBS cosplay than his Sunday best.”
“Chrissy didn't let him live it down after an unaffiliated Arthur Read account tweeted “Love your Easter look” at John.”
“Chrissy immediately dubbed the accountholder “shady as f!”
“!” and promised to throw them a follow.”
“TwitterUnfortunately, as of 19 hours ago, the Sports Illustrated model still hasn't followed the account.”
““Arthur” decided to call Chrissy out for her empty promise, as if suddenly a celebrity retweet isn't worth a damn thing.”
“TwitterPlus, this John-is-Arthur narrative isn't new to Chrissy.”
“Sorry, try harder.”


Quote: Chris tegan and Arthur cast shadows on John's legendary Easter Bunny Costume (E!) "
"Twitter is in its second month; the rest is no longer guaranteed."
"The couple took a few pictures earlier this week with their daughter Luna and the Easter Bunny, and John's dress looked more like a PBS Cosplay than his best Sunday dress."
"Chris didn't let him live because one of Arthur Reed's unrelated accounts tweeted" love your Easter face. "
Chris immediately nicknamed the account holder "dark f!"
"Promise to go with them."
"Unfortunately, as of 19 hours ago, the models in Sports Illustrated still didn't follow up."
"Arthur" decided to call Chris's blank check, as if suddenly a celebrity's forwarding was worthless
"Twitter plus, the story that John is Arthur is not new to Chris."
"Sorry, try harder."



Number  9
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Whether he considers his brave actions to be praiseworthy or not, many agree that Cumberbatch is living proof that not all superheros wear capes — well, not when they're not working anyway.”
““Benedict was courageous, brave and selfless.”
“The was the case when Benedict Cumberbatch saved a delivery cyclist from muggers, as reported by UK newspaper The Sun on Saturday, June 2.”
“The British actor who has starred as both Sherlock Holmes in BBC s crime drama Sherlock and Doctor Strange in several Marvel films most recently this year s hit Avengers Infinity War was reportedly in an Uber with wife Sophie Hunter in London last November when he spotted four men...”
“...attacking a food delivery cyclist according to Reuters One of the males attempted to grab the victim s cycle...”
“He was then punched in the face, struck on the head and hit with his helmet,” the Metropolitan Police confirmed to Reuters in a statement.”
“Speaking to The Sun, the actor's Uber driver, Manuel Dias, further detailed the incident, which ironically took place near Sherlock Holmes fictional residence at 221B Baker Street, saying that the actor leapt from the car and shouted “leave him alone,” before dragging the men off of the victim.”
“Dias, who claimed he wasn't aware of the actor's identity at first, says he joined Cumberbatch in defending the delivery man from the attackers, who ultimately fled the scene: “It was only then I recognized Benedict.”
“Then it all got a bit surreal.”
“Here was Sherlock Holmes fighting off four attackers just round the corner from Baker Street."”


"Whether he thinks his bravery is praiseworthy or not, a lot of people think that Cumberbatch is living proof that not all superheroes wear cloaks - well, not when they're not working."
"Benedict is brave, brave and selfless."
Benedict Cumberbatch rescued a delivery cyclist in a robbery, the Sun reported on June 2
"It is reported that the British actor, who played Holmes in the BBC crime drama Sherlock and Avengers infinity in several Marvel films, found four men in Uber in London last November with his wife Sophie hunter "Doctor Strange"... "
“… Attacked a cyclist delivering food. According to Reuters, one of the men tried to grab the victim's bicycle
"He was then punched in the face, hit in the head and hit in his helmet," the London police confirmed in a statement to Reuters
"Manuel DIAS, the actor's Uber driver, described the incident in further detail in an interview with the sun. Ironically, the incident happened near Sherlock Holmes' fictional residence at 221B Baker Street. He said that the actor jumped out of the car, yelled 'leave him alone' and then dragged these people off the victims."
Dias claimed he didn't know the identity of the actor at first. He said he and Cumberbatch defended the delivery man from the attack, and the attacker finally fled the scene: "I only recognized Benedict then."
"Then everything became a little surreal."
"Just around the corner of Baker Street, Holmes beat back four attackers."



Number  10
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let greasy locks inhibit your air drying?”
“One user called this product "the best shampoo ever" for making her mane thicker and fuller as it cleansed her 'do.”
“Your 'do will be ultra shiny from the hydrolyzed silk and amino acid ingredients, while vitamin B5 will nourish split ends.”
“To avoid it, spritz this weightless silkening mist on your hair as it starts to dry.”
“Eliminate Fly-Aways With A Silkening Shine SprayKenra Platinum Silkening Mist Spray, $15, AmazonAir drying can cause a major flyaway situation that I know you don't have time to deal with.”
“Bonus: The formula is strong, so one or two drops of this ojon oil serum does wonders — lasting you ages.”
“One user said the serum eliminated her frizz and added shine, looking "as if I had flat-ironed my hair, except without losing the softness."”
“Then, the ojon oil gets to work, treating damaged ends and making hair feel softer and smoother as it dries.”
“This intense and fast-acting restorative treatment instantly activates after you rub it between your hands.”
“I say: #nbd.”


"Let the greasy lock keep you from drying?"
One user called the product "the best shampoo ever" because it makes her mane thicker and fuller, while cleaning her hair
"Your 'do' will be made of hydrolyzed silk and amino acids, very shiny, and vitamin B5 will nourish and bifurcate."
"To avoid it, spray this weightless silk mist on your hair as it starts to dry."
"Use mercerizing spray to remove the Kenra AmazonAir platinum spray, spray 15, and dry may cause flight. I know you have no time to deal with it."
Additional advantages: the formula is strong, so one or two drops of this kind of Euro oil essence will produce miracles and make you endure.
One user said that this essence eliminated her curly hair and increased its luster. It looked like "I just pressed my hair, but I didn't lose my sense of softness."
Then Ojon oil begins to work, treating damaged hair tips and making hair feel softer and smoother when dry
"This intense and fast healing therapy is activated immediately after you rub it with your hands."
"I said: # NBD."



Number  11
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He will be bumped to sixth in line following the birth of William's third child next year.”
“Prince Harry is the fifth in line to the throne, behind the two children of his brother, Prince William, who is second in the line of succession behind their father.”
“Markle cheered on Harry as he played, but the two did not arrive or leave the event together.”
“But even after that announcement, the couple did not make any public appearances together until this past May when the two appeared at a polo match benefiting two of Prince Harry’s charities.”
“Chris Jackson / Getty ImagesThe couple kept quiet about their relationship until Prince Harry issued a rare statement last November scolding paparazzi for endangering the safety of his girlfriend and blasting coverage he found racist and sexist.”
“The happy couple, at a photo call with reporters Monday after news broke about their engagement.”
“The prince had never heard of the actress, who in turn knew only superficially about the royal.”
“Chris Jackson / Getty ImagesThe pair met in early July 2016 after being set up on a blind date set up by a mutual friend, the couple told the BBC in a joint interview.”
“The newly betrothed couple, during their first public appearance together on Sept. 25, 2017, at the Invictus Games in Toronto, Canada.”
“The couple dated for more than a year before making their first official appearance together this past September at the Invictus Games in Toronto.”


"Next year, when William's third child is born, he will be sixth."
"Prince Harry is the fifth in line to the throne, next only to his brother Prince William's two children, and Prince William is the second in line to the throne, next only to their father."
"Mark cheered Harry at the game, but they didn't arrive or leave the game together."
"But even after that announcement, the couple didn't make a public appearance together until May, when they appeared in a polo match in favor of Prince Harry's two charities."
"The Chris Jackson / Getty Images couple remained silent about their relationship until Prince Harry made a rare statement last November, denouncing the paparazzi for endangering his girlfriend's safety and exposing the racism and sexism he found."
"The happy couple took a photo with reporters on Monday after the news of their engagement came out."
"The prince has never heard of the actress, and the actress's knowledge of the royal family is very superficial."
"Chris Jackson / Getty Images told BBC in a joint interview that they met at a blind date arranged by a mutual friend in early July 2016."
"On September 25, 2017, the newlyweds made their first public appearance at the inviolable games in Toronto, Canada."
"The couple dated for more than a year and made their first official appearance at the inviolable games in Toronto in September."



Number  12
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I curse a lot.””
““My brother and I rode bikes to school and played in the woods all day.”
“My parents obviously did not believe in that and I worked out okay.”
““I believe in needs being met and faith being implemented, and I believe in letting your kids know they can count on you, and that you’ll be there.”
““Yeah, I believe in affection,” she says.”
“Image zoom Credit: Peggy SirotaWith her own kids, she has embraced more of an attachment parenting style.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“I had a good childhood.”Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Lots of rescuing animals, tree climbing, sports, gymnastics.”
“My dad was an insurance salesman,” she says.”


"I curse a lot."
"My brother and I go to school by bike and play in the woods all day."
"My parents obviously don't believe that, and I have no problem."
"I believe that needs are met, beliefs are fulfilled, and I believe in letting your children know that they can count on you and that you will be there."
"Yes, I believe in love," she said
"Thanks to image zooming: Peggy Sirota and her children, she accepted more attachment parenting."
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"I had a wonderful childhood." Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs? "
"Many rescue animals, tree climbing, sports, gymnastics."
"My father is an insurance salesman," she said



Number  13
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“No further action has been scheduled following our office hearing."”
“After a thorough review the matter was set for a City Attorney office hearing, during which both parties were present, detailed the incident, were advised on the law and given guidance as to how to avoid similar incidents in the future.”
“[NATL] Top Entertainment Photos: Best of the American Music Awards, and MoreRyan Phillippe and Fiance Paulina Slagter Break Up After 5 Years TogetherMeanwhile, a source close to Phillippe tells E!”
“Add to this any man who calls a woman a c--- has serious animus towards women in general and would not be one championing the equality of women."”
“Her employer Paul Marciano at Guess can confirm her injuries as can her friend who witnessed the assault.”
“The police took a report of the assault and issued a restraining order.”
“She has hospital records documenting her injuries.”
“She has photos of the serious cuts and bruises she suffered as a result of the assault.”
“He must think the media a bunch of fools.”
“The claim that he didn't assault her is laughable.”


"No further action has been arranged after the hearing in our office."
"After a thorough review, the matter was designated as a hearing by the municipal procuratorate. During the hearing, both parties were present, detailing the course of the incident, listening to legal opinions, and giving guidance on how to avoid similar incidents in the future."
"Top entertainment photo: Best American Music Award, Morian Phillips and fiance Paulina Slater broke up after five years together, while a source close to Phillips told e!"
"In addition, any man who calls women" C "has serious hostility to women in general, and will not be a person who advocates women's equality."
"Her employer, Paul Marciano at guess, can confirm her injuries, as can her friends who witnessed the attack."
"The police received reports of the attack and issued a restraining order."
"She has hospital records of her injuries."
"She has pictures showing that she suffered severe cuts and bruises in the attack."
"He must think of the media as a bunch of idiots."
"It's ridiculous that he didn't attack her."



Number  14
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The oil reducer is a proprietary ingredient called Airlicium that keeps shine under control all day long.”
“Its formula hides blemishes and pores, and soaks up oil to provide a matte finish.”
“Look at the veins in your wrist.”
“Check the undertones to see if they match your coloring.”
“See if the foundation disappears against your skin.”
“It’s best if you can place a small sample along your jawline and look at it in the daylight.”
“Selecting the best color foundation for your skinChoosing the best color to blend with your skin tone isn’t too hard if you can test the foundation yourself.”
“Now let’s look at tips for picking the best color.”
“The farther down the ingredient list the problem appears, the less of it makes up the formula.”
“Some foundations may contain one or two undesirables, but otherwise are good.”


"Oil reducer is a proprietary ingredient called airlicium that keeps sunlight under control throughout the day."
It's formulated to hide flaws and pores, and to absorb grease, providing a matte effect
"Look at the blood vessels on your wrist."
"Check that the background color matches your color."
"See if the foundation will disappear on your skin."
"It's better to put a small sample along the chin line and watch it during the day."
Choosing the foundation that best suits your complexion is not difficult to choose the best color to blend with your complexion, as long as you can test the foundation yourself.
"Now let's look at the techniques for choosing the best color."
"The deeper the list of ingredients in question, the less ingredients in the formula."
Some foundations may contain one or two undesirable substances, but they are good in other ways



Number  15
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Bio” from Lorne Michaels and Seth Meyers, “Rise” from Jason Katims, virtual reality thriller “Reverie,” and military drama “The Brave” (formerly “For God and Country”) to series.”
““SVU” joins previously renewed NBC shows “This Is Us,” “Chicago Fire,” “Chicago Med,” “Chicago PD,” “Superstore,” “The Good Place,” “Taken,” “Shades of Blue,” and “Blindspot.” The network has canceled “Timeless,” “Emerald City,” and “Powerless.” On the pilot side, the network has ordered “A.P.”
“Julie Martin, Jonathan Starch, Arthur Forney, Peter Jankowski, and Hargitay are also executive producers.”
“Wolf is the creator and executive producer.”
“The series is a Wolf Films production in association with Universal Television.”
“It has been nominated for 25 Emmys throughout its run, winning six, including Hargitay’s win in 2006 for outstanding lead actress in a drama series.”
“The series remains a ratings powerhouse for NBC, ranking among its top scripted programs just under “This Is Us,” “Chicago Fire,” and “Chicago PD.” Season 18 averaged a 1.4 rating in adults 18-49 and 5.8 million viewers per episode.”
“Newer cast members include Kelli Giddish, Peter Scanavino, and Raúl Esparza.”
“The series has undergone numerous casting changes over its long run, but series mainstays include Mariska Hargitay and Ice T, the former having been with the show from the very beginning.”
“The last remaining installment of Dick Wolf’s storied franchise follows life inside the NYPD’s Special Victims Unit, an elite squad that investigates sexually-based offenses, which are considered especially heinous.”


Ron Michaels and Seth Meyers' biology, Jason cardim's rise, the virtual reality thriller reverie, and the military drama the brave (formerly for God and the country) are adapted for the series
"SVU" has added previously updated NBC programs "this is us", "Chicago Fire", "Chicago Med", "Chicago PD", "superstore", "the good place", "taken", "shadows of blue" and "blindspot". The network canceled "timeless", "Emerald City" and "powerless". In the pilot area, the network has ordered "A.P."
Julie Martin, Jonathan stark, Arthur Forney, Peter jankovsky and hagritty are also executive producers
"Wolff is the creator and executive producer."
"This series is a Wolf movie CO produced with universal TV."
"The play has received 25 Emmy nominations throughout the performance, including six in 2006 for Haggerty's outstanding heroine in the drama series."
"The series is still NBC's top ratings, second only to this is us, Chicago Fire and Chicago Police Department among its top screenwriters. The average adult ratings for season 18 were 1.4, with 5.8 million per episode. "
Newer actors include Kelly gidesh, Peter scannavino and Raul espaza
"The series has undergone numerous cast changes over a long period of time, but the main actors of the series include Mariska hagritty and Bing T, who were with the show from the beginning."
The last part of the dick wolf saga is about the life of the New York Police Department's special victims group, an elite group that investigates sex crimes and is considered particularly heinous



Number  16
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““They are really good people and very smart.’”
““Christine is not willing to sit down,” Staub explains to Giudice.”
“...giving the hit Bravo series its most iconic moment involving Giudice flipping a table at Staub and calling her a prostitution whore in the season 1 finale...”
“But while Staub is all square with Giudice now, there are two people in her life who aren’t: daughters Christine, 23, and Jillian, 19 — both of whom carried the shame of their mother’s reputation with them for years.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“In an exclusive sneak peek at Wednesday’s all-new episode, Giudice, 45, attempts to fix that.”
“After being asked by Staub in a previous episode to apologize to Christine and Jillian, the Standing Strong author shows up this week ready to make amends.”
““Can the universe erase ‘prostitution whore’ from memory sake’s?” Staub tells audiences in the clip.”
““No.”
“I can’t make it right for my kids.”


"They are really good people, very smart."
"Christina didn't want to sit down," stubb explained to Judith
“… The most iconic moments for the hit Bravo series include Giudice turning tables in Staub and calling her a prostitute at the end of season one... "
"But despite the fact that Stubbs and Judith are now on a good relationship, there are two people in her life who are not like this: Christina, 23, and Gillian, 19, who have been ashamed of their mother's reputation for years."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Judith, 45, tries to solve this problem in a new episode of exclusive peeping on Wednesday."
"After being asked by Stubbs to apologize to Christina and Gillian in the last episode, the powerful writer appeared this week to prepare for an apology."
Can the universe erase prostitutes from memory? "Stab told the audience in the clip."
"No. “
"I can't do the right thing for my children."



Number  17
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'I think that I would like to give it a proper shot,' said the Iron Man actress.”
“Howard began the conversation about Brad by asking her why she decided to get married again after she was wed to Chris Martin for 13 years.”
“Their display comes after a source told New York Post's Page Six column that their nuptials will take place 'at the end of the summer, after Labor Day'.”
“It's where she filmed 1999's The Talented Mr Ripley with Jude Law, Cate Blanchett and Matt Damon.”
“Paltrow, whose mother is Blythe Danner, looked sculpted with toned arms, tummy and legsNo body trouble here: And it's very impressive that at age 45 the siren has no flaws, scars or unwanted fatPaltrow is no stranger to Italy.”
“She has muscles everywhere!”
“Paltrow was seen leaning up for a kiss with one of the greatest fashion designers in Italy; he looked sharp with a sweater over his shoulders and print slacks on.”
“The pair were joined by designer Valentino and fashion president Giancarlo Giammetti, who took to Instagram to share a cosy snap of the group on the watercraft.”
“The Spider-Man: Homecoming actress continued her low-key display as she wore her blonde tresses in loose beach waves.”
“...on the back of the famed yacht The Iron Man actress displayed her natural beauty as she went make up free for the casual day with the pair relaxing side by side...”


"I think I'll give it a proper chance," said the Ironman actress
"When Howard talked about Brad, he first asked her why she decided to marry again after 13 years of marriage to Chris Martin."
A source told the New York Post's page 6 column that their wedding would take place "at the end of the summer after labor day."
"There, she worked with Jude Law, Kate Blanchett, and Matt Damon on on 1999's Mr. Ripley the genius."
"Paltrow's mother is Bryce Danner. She looks well proportioned in arms, stomach and legs, and has no physical problems. What's impressive is that the siren at the age of 45 has no defects, scars or excess fat. Paltrow is no stranger to Italy. "
"She's full of muscles!"
"Paltrow has been seen bending over and kissing one of Italy's greatest fashion designers; he looks neat with a sweater over his shoulders and baggy pants."
"Designer Valentino and fashion president Giancarlo Giammetti joined the couple, sharing their comfortable group photo on instagram."
The actress in Spiderman: Homecoming continues her low-key performance, wearing golden hair in loose beach waves
“…… On the back of the famous yacht, the steel heroine shows her natural beauty. She makes up for free on her leisure day, and they relax side by side. "



Number  18
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...and Lionsgate TV recently suspended The Royals showrunner Mark Schwahn over sexual harassment allegations by cast and crew members of both his previous show, One Tree Hill, and The Royals.”
“...and Jessica Queller...”
“...the accusations...”
““After a thorough investigation, Warner Bros Television Group has terminated Andrew Kreisberg’s employment, effective immediately,” the company said in a statement.”
““We remain committed to providing a safe working environment for our employees and everyone involved in our productions.”WBTVKreisberg has been one of the top lieutenants of Greg Berlanti, architect of the CW DC universe, whose company Berlanti Prods.”
“...produces all series.”
“Kreisberg had been hands-on involved in The Flash and Supergirl, serving as co-showrunner on both.”
“Following his exit Berlanti co creator exec producer of the two series will step in for him assuming additional responsibilities on both The Flash where he will work closely with executive producer co showrunner Todd Helbing and Supergirl where he will work closely with executive producers co showrunners Robert Rovner...”
“Related Story Matt Lauer Fired By NBC News Over Allegation Of 'Inappropriate Sexual Behavior'“Warner Bros Television Group recently concluded its investigation into the allegations against Andrew Kreisberg,” Berlanti Prods.’ Berlanti and Sarah Schechter said in a statement.”
“Meanwhile, E!”


“…… Lion Gate recently suspended mark Schwann, the host of RTV, because of sexual harassment charges against him from his previous show a tree mountain and RTV actors and crew members. "
“… And Jessica Quiller... "
“… "Charge..."
"After a thorough investigation, Warner Bros. Television Group has terminated the employment of Andrew cressberg with immediate effect," Warner Bros. said in a statement
"We are still committed to providing a safe working environment for our employees and everyone involved in our production." Wbtv Kreisberg has been one of the lieutenants of Greg berlantis, the architect of CW DC Universe and the company berlantis prods
“… Production of all series. "
"Kresberg personally participated in the shooting of flash and super girl and served as a co projectionist for the two films."
"After he quits, the executive producer, the co creator of the two series, will take on more responsibilities. He will work closely with executive producer co stars Todd Herbin and super girl, and he will work closely with executive producer co star Robert rofner..."
"In connection with this, Matt Raul was fired by NBC news for alleged" sexual misconduct. " "Warner Bros Television Group recently concluded an investigation into Andrew Kreisberg's charges," berlanti said in a statement
"At the same time, e!"



Number  19
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“There was no stabbing.””
“WHILE SECURITY WAS DISTRACTED, W A GUY A CAR PULLED UP & ATTACKED!”
““THE WORLDS SMALLEST KNIFE WOUND…..OR?!?!”
“YES I WAS ATTACKED 2 DAYS AGO, YES THEY USED SOME SORT OF SHARP WEAPON, AND YES IT WENT INTO MY BODY!” Feldman captioned pic of the tiny wound on his body on Thursday, March 29.”
““THIS IS WHAT THE SCAR LOOKS LIKE NOW, OBVIOUSLY IF IT WAS A KNIFE I GOT VERY LUCKY & IM BLESSED!”
“IF IT WAS A SYRINGE, I WILL PRAY 4 THE BEST RESULTS!”
“GOD BLESS!!”
“As previously reported, the former child star, 46, tweeted pictures from the hospital on Wednesday, March 28, after he was allegedly attacked the night before.”
““I WAS ATTACKED 2NITE!”
“A MAN OPENED MY CAR DOOR & STABBED ME W SOMETHING!” Feldman captioned pics of himself in a hospital bed with his fiancée, Courtney Anne, close by.”


"No stabbing."
"When the security guard was distracted, a man and a car stopped and attacked him!"
"The smallest knife wound in the world Or?!? "
"Yes, I was attacked two days ago, yes, they used some kind of sharp weapon, yes, it entered my body! "On Thursday, March 29, Feldman described the small wound on his body in the photo."
"That's what scar looks like now, and it's obvious that if it were a knife, I would be lucky & I'm lucky!"
"If it was a syringe, I would pray for four best results!"
"God bless!"
"As previously reported, the 46 year old former child star tweeted photos of the hospital after being accused of being attacked the night before yesterday (Wednesday), March 28."
"I've been attacked!"
"A man opened my door and stabbed me with something! "Feldman added a caption to a photo of his fiancee Courtney Anne in a nearby hospital bed."



Number  20
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Be sure to tune in for the big show at 8 p.m. ET/PT on May 7, 2017, and check back here on MTV News for updates leading up to the 2017 MTV Movie & TV Awards.”
“Us Best Kiss Ashton Sanders Jharrel Jerome Moonlight Emma Stone Ryan Gosling La La Land Emma Watson Dan Stevens Beauty and the Beast Taraji P Henson Terrence Howard Empire Zac Efron Anna Kendrick Mike Dave Need Wedding Dates Best Villain Allison Williams Get Out Demogorgon Stranger Things Jared Leto Suicide...”
“Here Are Your 2017 MTV Movie & TV Awards Nominations: See The Full ListThe MTV Movie Awards have a new look and a new name: Introducing the MTV Movie & TV Awards.”
“For the first time ever, the annual broadcast slated for Sunday, May 7, will recognize TV series alongside feature films — and the nominations for this year’s big show, hosted by Adam Devine, are finally out.”
“Leading the pack with six nods is Jordan Peele’s record-breaking directorial debut, Get Out, including Movie of the Year and a Next Generation nomination for star Daniel Kaluuya.”
“Beauty and the Beast follows with four nominations, including a Best Actor in a Movie nom for Emma Watson.”
“Meanwhile, Barry Jenkins's Oscar-winning film, Moonlight, scored three nominations, including a Best Kiss nod for Ashton Sanders and Jharrel Jerome, as well as a nom in our brand-new category, Best American Story.”
“(R.I.P.”
“Best Shirtless Performance.)”
“Over on the TV side, Stranger Things — last year's pop-culture phenomenon — nabbed four nominations, two of which belong to breakout star Millie Bobby Brown.”


"Be sure to watch the big show at 8:00 p.m. EST on May 7, 2017 / Pacific time, and see the latest news of the 2017 MTV Movie and TV awards in MTV News."
"America's best kiss Ashton Sanders Jarrell Jerome moonlight Emma stone Ryan Gosling lallalan Emma Watson Dan Stevens beauty and beast taraji P Henson Terrence Howard Empire Zac evron Anna Kendrick Michael Dave needs wedding date best villain Alison Williams out of demogon stranger thing Jared Leto suicide..."
"Here's your nomination for MTV film and Television Awards 2017: see the complete list. MTV Film Awards have a new look and new name: introducing MTV film and Television Awards."
"The TV series of the year, scheduled to air on Sunday, May 7, will be recognized for the first time along with feature films - the nomination for this year's major TV series, hosted by Adam Devin, has finally come out."
Jordan Peel's record breaking directorial debut "get out" led the way with six nods, including the film of the year award and the next-generation nomination of star Daniel kalouya
"Beauty and the beast" subsequently won four nominations, including Emma Watson's nomination for best film actor
Meanwhile, Barry Jenkins' Oscar winning film moonlight has received three nominations, including for best kiss from Ashton sanders and Jarrell Jerome, and for our brand new award "Best American story."
“（R.I.P.”
"The best shirtless performance."
"On television, the pop culture phenomenon strange things got four nominations last year, two of which were for the star Millie Bobbie brown."



Number  21
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I should have something to hold on to.”
“You have to have something that’s sacred to you and the people around you … I shared so much of my life, my childhood, and my family, the death of my nephew with the world.”
“.”
““She’s a charming Southern girl, you know, she’s not impressed.”
“...wine and dine,” and that he had his work cut out for him pursuing her.”
“You got to dazzle .”
“JAY-Z later told the magazine, “we were just beginning to try to date each other” at the time, adding: “Well, you know, you’ve got to try first.”
“Just to have someone who you just like is so important, and someone [who] is honest.”Fall 2001The pair appears on the cover of Vanity Fair‘s November 2001 music issue.”


"I should have reservations."
"You have to have something sacred to you and the people around you I share a lot of my life, childhood and family with the world, and the death of my nephew. "
“.”
"She's a charming southern girl, you know, she's not impressed."
"Eat, drink and play," he did a job pursuing her
"You have to dazzle people."
"Jay-Z later told the magazine that we were just starting to try dating," he added, "well, you know, you have to try first."
"It's important to have someone you like, an honest person." In the fall of 2001, the couple appeared on the cover of Vanity Fair's November 2001 Music Edition



Number  22
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Rivera has yet to comment.”
“Image zoom Naya Rivera on Jan. 31 | Credit: Derek Storm / SplashOff-camera, Rivera and Salling dated as they filmed together.”
“The actress, 31, was in New York City on Wednesday for her appearance on Total Request Live where she promoted her upcoming YouTube Red Originals series, Step Up: High Water.”
“During the show, Rivera was not asked about Salling’s death or their previous relationship.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Salling was found dead on Tuesday in an apparent suicide just a month before he was to be sentenced to prison for possession of child pornography.”
“Rivera and Salling starred on Glee together from 2009 to 2015 during which she portrayed cheerleader Santana while he played jock Puck.”
“During the early seasons of the Fox series, their characters had a brief romance.”
“But in her 2016 memoir, Sorry Not Sorry, she wrote that he dumped her at the request of his publicist, who said she wasn’t good for his image.”
“Then, by all means, regret everything.”Image zoom Mark Salling and Naya Rivera in 2010While Glee cast members Matthew Morrison and Jane Lynch shared their reactions to Salling’s death.”


"Rivera has yet to comment."
"Image of Naya Rivera taken on January 31 source: Derek storm / splash off camera, Rivera and salling dating while shooting together."
The 31 year old actress attended the launch of total request live in New York on Wednesday, where she promoted the upcoming YouTube Red original drama "step up: high water"
"On the show, Rivera was not asked about sarin's death or their previous relationship."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Sarin was found dead of apparent suicide on Tuesday, just a month before he was jailed for possession of child pornography."
"Rivera and sarin starred in glee from 2009 to 2015, where she played cheerleader Santana, who played ice hockey player."
"In the early days of the fox series, their characters had a short romantic history."
"But in her 2016 memoir, I'm sorry, I'm not sorry, she wrote that at the request of PR, he dumped her, and PR said she was not good for his image."
Glee actors Matthew Morrison and Jane Lynch share their reaction to sarin's death



Number  23
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Scott Garfield | Disney ABC Television Group | Getty Images...”
“Richard Cartwright | Disney ABC Television Group | Getty ImagesAfter high school, Pompeo worked as a bartender until her father encouraged her to pursue acting.”
“"'Are you out of your f------ mind?”
“"I was like, 'I'm not going to be stuck on a medical show for five years,'" she says.”
“When her agent brought her the script for "Grey's," Pompeo balked.”
“She went on to nab parts in "Old School" and "Daredevil" but, by 2004, Pompeo's career had hit a wall and she was almost broke.”
“That marked her first appearance on the big screen.”
“Her breakout moment came in 2002 when she landed a role as the love interest in "Midnight Mile."”
“Ellen Pompeo as Meredith Grey on ABC's "Grey's Anatomy."”
“However, he convinced her to audition anyway, if only to pay her rent.”


"Scott Garfield | Disney ABC TV Group | Getty pictures..."
"Richard Cartwright, Disney ABC television group, Getty Images after high school and Pompeo worked as a bartender after high school until her father encouraged her to perform."
"Are you crazy?"
"I thought, 'I won't be stuck in a medical show for five years,'" she said
"Pompeo hesitated when her agent brought her the play for" gray. "
She continued to play nab in old school and the expendables, but in 2004, Pompeo's career suffered a setback and she almost went bankrupt
"It marks her first appearance on the big screen."
Her breakthrough took place in 2002, when she played a similar role in midnight mile
Alan Pompeo plays Meredith gray in ABC's anatomy of gray
"But he talked her into auditioning, even if it was just to pay the rent."



Number  24
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sign up for our daily newsletter and get the latest industry news in your inbox every day.”
“Thankfully.”
“Watch the full video to see more of her little tweaks and tips throughout the process that make the style look more finished, but it doesn't get much more complicated than that.”
“It's pretty much that simple.”
“Then she separates her hair into two sections, weaves a long braid on either side and pins them up.”
“Also, she has excellent eyebrows, so I know I can trust her.)”
“(I can forgive her for saying this, if only because the tutorial that follows is so fast and easy to follow, I can't help but love her for it.”
“Sazan starts.”
“"It's summer, which means... hairstyles gotta be on fleek!"”
“She breaks it down into super-simple steps that don't require crazy-intricate techniques; you just need to know how to do a plain old three-strand braid.”


"Sign up for our daily newsletters and get the latest industry news in our inboxes every day."
"Thank goodness."
"Watching the full video, you can see more of her small adjustments and tips in the whole process, making the style look more perfect, but nothing is more complicated than this."
"It's that simple."
Then she divided her hair into two parts, braided a long braid on both sides and tied it up with a pin
"And she has beautiful eyebrows, so I know I can trust her." “
"I can forgive her for saying that. If it's just because the following tutorial is fast and easy to learn, I can't help falling in love with her."
"Sasan's starting."
"It's summer, which means... Make sure your hair is flicked! "
"She breaks it down into super simple steps, and doesn't need crazy complicated technology; you just need to know how to make an ordinary old-fashioned three strand braid."



Number  25
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““It’s so important to tune out the noise and the unnecessary, and just focus on the people that you love because they know you better than anyone.””
““When I’m not working, I’m at home with my cat, with my family, with my boyfriend, with the people that I love — and that’s how I reset, and that’s how I center myself,” Michele said.”
“...part in her upcoming wedding to fiancé Zandy Reich...”
“The Glee alum, 31, announced the happy news that her longtime friend and former costar will be her maid of honor alongside a sweet snap of the pair cozying up for a selfie on the beach.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Appropriately, she captioned the photo, “Maid of honor .”Michele and Groff, 33, first became pals when they starred in the 2006 hit rock musical Spring Awakening, for which Groff received a Tony nomination.”
“Since reuniting to play opposite each other on Glee, Michele has gone on to star in Scream Queens and is about to join fellow Glee costar Darren Criss on a joint nine-city tour.”
“Groff starred in HBO’s Looking and he also returned to Broadway to play King George III in the smash hit Hamilton, receiving a second Tony nomination.”
“Image zoom Lea Michele and Jonathan Groff | Credit: Lester Cohen/WireImageSince announcing her engagement to Reich last month, Michele revealed that she had no idea Reich’s romantic Hamptons proposal was coming.”
““I was so surprised,” she explained during an appearance on Watch What Happens Live last week.”


"It's very important to stay away from the noise and unnecessary things and focus only on the people you love because they know you better than anyone else."
"When I'm not working, I'm at home with my cat, with my family, with my boyfriend, with people I love - that's how I reset, that's how I focus on myself," Michelle said
“… To her upcoming wedding to her fiancee, Zandi Lake... "
The 31 year old "glee club" alumni announced the good news: her old friend and former partner will be her bridesmaid, and they will also take a self portrait on the beach
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
She aptly titled the photo "bridesmaids." Michelle and grove, 33, became friends for the first time in 2006's popular rock music "the awakening of spring," and grove won Tony's nomination
"Since her reunion with glee, Michelle has been playing the Scream Queen and will be on the nine city tour with glee partner Darren Chris."
Grove starred in HBO's find, and he returned to Broadway to play King George III in the blockbuster Hamilton, winning a second Tony nomination
Image zooming Leah Michelle and Jonathan grove | source: Lester Cohen / wire image since announcing her engagement to Reich last month, Michelle revealed that she didn't know Reich's romantic Hampton proposal was coming
"I'm so surprised," she explained on last week's "what's going on at the scene."



Number  26
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“My problem was with the daily stuff, the small things."”
“I'm very proud of everything he's accomplished, and I think it's amazing.”
“"I think it was just a culmination of things that at the end of it, we were just two very different people that couldn't get along," she explained.”
“Naomie attributed the breakup to "a million little things that added up" that eventually "just kind of blew up."”
“After working on their relationship last season of Southern Charm, including going to see a counselor, Naomie and Craig ultimately decided to end their relationship prior to the start of Season 5.”
“It is what it is now."”
“I wish I hadn't been such a bitch, but oh well.”
“He's like a puppy.”
“I wish I had been nicer to him because Craig is such a nice person.”
“"It's very weird just to watch back, just the anger, really.”


"My problem is daily chores."
"I'm proud of what he's achieved and I think it's amazing."
"I think it's just a climax of things, and at the end of the day, we're just two very different people who can't get along," she explained
Naomi blamed the breakup on "a million little things in total" and finally "a little messed up"
"In the last season of Southern glamour, Naomi and Craig have been dealing with their relationship, including going to see a psychologist, and finally decided to end their relationship before the start of the fifth season."
"That's how it is now."
"I wish I wasn't such a bitch, but oh, well."
"He's like a little dog."
"I wish I could be nice to him because Craig is a good man."
"Just looking back, it's anger. It's really strange."



Number  27
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Here\u2019s what I wish I knew \u2014 and what I learned from my Things I Wish I Knew Before I Bought My First House”,”reading_time”:8}]};”
“That\u2019s the case with new Just Announced New Travel Card Perks \u2014 That Don’t Involve learned a lot throughout the process of buying my first home.”
“But that doesn\u2019t mean there isn\u2019t still plenty of value to be had from them \u2014 even from those that carry yearly membership fees.”
“...you u2019re not alone...”
“...const FP tips can help you turn an average skill into an above average side the Tips for Starting a Side Hustle From Experts Who u2019ve Done it your travel rewards credit cards have been sitting in the back of your sock drawer for the better part of last year...”


"That's what I want to know, and that's what I want to know before I buy my first home."
"In the whole process of buying my first home, I didn't learn a lot. That's the new travel card offer announced in 2014."
"But that doesn't mean that even companies that charge annual membership fees don't have much value."
“… You're not alone... "
“… Const FP tips can help you turn a common skill into a higher than average skill. Start a sidepush skill from experts in 2019. Your travel reward credit card was in the back of your sock drawer for most of last year... "



Number  28
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For complete coverage, bookmark THR.com/upfronts.”
“#truth A post shared by Clayne Crawford (@claynecrawford) on Apr 24, 2018 at 12:53pm PDTKeep track of all the latest renewals and cancellations with THR's scorecard and of all the pilot pickups with our handy guide.”
“Lethal Weapon star Clayne Crawford is making amends for his bad behavior on the set of the Fox reboot.”
“The actor on Tuesday posted a lengthy apology on his verified Instagram page in which he detailed two incidents that occurred on the Warner Bros. Television procedural.”
“Crawford admitted that he was "reprimanded twice" during the second season of the Fox procedural.”
“He said the first incident happened when he became angry with what he deemed unsafe working conditions on the set.”
“After the outburst, Crawford said he met with human resources, apologized for his role in the conflict and completed studio-appointed therapy, while also sharing a "sizable portion" of his paycheck with one of the parties involved — at Warners' request.”
“The second incident occurred during an episode Crawford was directing when another actor on set felt unsafe after being hit by a piece of shrapnel from an effect.”
“"I absolutely love, respect and care for my crew and cast, and would never intentionally jeopardize so many jobs," Crawford wrote.”
“"I an incredibly sorry if my passion for doing good work has ever made anyone feel less than comfortable on our set, or feel less than celebrated for their efforts.”


"To completely override, please bookmark at: THR.com/upfronts .”
"# the truth, a post shared by crane Crawford (@ claynecrawford) on PDT at 12:53 p.m. on April 24, 2018, uses thr's scorecard to track all the latest renewals and cancellations, and uses our handy guide to track all the pilot deliveries."
"Lethal weapon Star Crane Crawford is apologizing for his bad behavior on fox."
"On Tuesday, the actor posted a lengthy apology letter on his instagram website, detailing two incidents at Warner Bros
Crawford admitted that he was "reprimanded twice" in the second season of Fox
"He said that when the first incident happened, he was angry at what he thought was an unsafe working environment."
"After the outbreak, Crawford said he met with the human resources department, apologized for his role in the conflict, completed the treatment assigned by the studio, and, at Warner's request, shared a" substantial portion "of his salary with one of the parties."
"The second incident happened in an episode directed by Crawford when another actor on the set felt insecure after being hit by special effects shrapnel."
"I absolutely love, respect and care for my crew and actors," Crawford wrote. "I would never deliberately sabotage so much work."
"If my passion for doing a good job has ever made anyone feel uncomfortable on our set or unpopular with their efforts, I'm really sorry."



Number  29
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Just a short drive away from their A-list avenue home in Beverly Hills, this Carpinteria beach home is the perfect vacation getaway for the small family.”
“And don’t forget the cozy fireplace in the living room, vaulted ceilings, breakfast nook and hot tub.”
“The home features just what you’d expect in a luxurious beach house: a fresh white exterior, contemporary architecture, a large patio and a master bedroom that opens to a wraparound balcony.”
“With six bedrooms and six bathrooms, the house is roomy enough for Kutcher, Kunis, their two kids and any lucky guests.”
“Located just outside Santa Barbara, the 3,100-square-foot home is at the end of a gated, private drive and is surrounded by sand and water on all sides!”
“That 70s Show costars and lovebirds Ashton Kutcher and Mila Kunis just spent $10 million for a secluded beachfront vacation home in Carpinteria, California.”


"It's a short drive from their home in Beverly Hills on A-class Avenue, and this home in cabentilla beach is the perfect resort for this small family."
"Don't forget the comfortable fireplace, arched ceiling, breakfast corner and hot tub in the living room."
"The features of this house are exactly what you expect in a luxury beach villa: fresh white appearance, modern architecture, a large terrace and a master bedroom leading to a balcony."
"It has six bedrooms and six bathrooms, enough for Kutcher, Kunis, their two children and any lucky guest."
"Just outside Santa Barbara, this 3100 square foot house is at the end of a closed driveway, surrounded by sand and water!"
"The 1970s co stars and lovers Ashton Kutcher and Mira Kunis just spent $10 million in a secluded seaside resort in cabentia, California."



Number  30
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Revenant star looked very happy as he enjoyed another night on the townClub nights: The movie star was seen entering the nightspot with a gaggle of ladies...”
“The duo who ended their relationship in 2014 were photographed holding hands as they strolled out of the club together Act natural Leonardo 42 sheepishly separated from the leggy blonde when they were spotted by photographers but onlookers say the duo ended up going home together Making a call The...”
“Leonardo DiCaprio, 42, appeared to be back in the arms of former flame Toni Garrn, as the movie star was pictured leaving a New York nightclub with the model on Saturday morning.”
“The duo - who ended their relationship in 2014 - were photographed holding hands as they exited 1Oak nightclub.”
“Scroll down for videoBack on?”
“Leonardo DiCaprio left 1Oak nightclub with ex girlfriend Toni Garrn on Saturday morning Swift exit Leo and Toni enjoyed a year and a half relationship from May 2013 until December of 2014 Leonardo sheepishly separated from the leggy blonde when they were spotted by photographers but eyewitnesses say the duo...”
“...ended up going home together...”
“Wearing his wardrobe staple baseball hat, the Django Unchained star tried to make a low key exit from the night spot.”
“He wore a navy shirt and jeans with trainers as he took the 25-year-old model's hand and led her away from the club.”
“The German-born beauty wore a plunging waistcoat with smart black trousers and draped a blazer over her shoulders to keep out the chill.”


"The avenger looked very happy because he had another night at the Town Club: the movie star was seen going into the nightclub with a group of ladies..."
"When the two people who ended their relationship in 2014 were photographed holding hands and walking out of the club together, the 42 year old Leonardo shyly separated from the long legged blonde when he was found by the photographer, but onlookers said that they finally went home together and made a phone call..."
"Leonardo DiCaprio, 42, seems to be back in the arms of former movie star Toni garn, who left a New York nightclub with her model on Saturday morning."
"The two ended their relationship in 2014 and were photographed holding hands as they left 1oak nightclub."
"Scroll down to see the video, and then open it again?"
"Leonardo DiCaprio and his ex girlfriend Toni garn left 1oak nightclub on Saturday morning. From May 2013 to December 2014, Tony and Leonardo DiCaprio) enjoyed a year and a half of love. When the photographer found out about them, Leonardo shyly separated from the long legged blonde, but witnesses said that the couple... "
“… Finally, let's go home together... "
Wearing the baseball cap in his closet, the Django star tried to leave the club in a low profile
"He took the 25-year-old model by the hand and led her out of the club in a Navy shirt, jeans and sneakers."
"The German born beauty wore a low waisted vest, beautiful black trousers and a coat over her shoulder to keep out the cold."



Number  31
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Add events directly to your calendar.”
“Read more listings for art, classical music, dance, film, pop music and theater.”
“All dates are subject to change.”
“...new shows coming to TV and streaming through the end of the year as well a few significant returning series...”
“Also on tap are new shows from some of the defining creators of the current TV era Matthew Weiner s The Romanoffs for Amazon his first series since Mad Men and Lena Dunham and Jennifer Konner s Camping for HBO their follow up to Girls Here is a roundup of...”
“Benicio Del Toro in “Escape at Dannemora” and Jim Carrey, directed by Michel Gondry, in “Kidding” for Showtime.”
“Michael Douglas and Alan Arkin in Netflix’s “The Kominsky Method.” Toni Collette in “Wanderlust” for Netflix.”
“Jessica Lange returning to FX’s “American Horror Story.” Sean Penn in “The First” on Hulu.”
“The Korean auteur Park Chan-wook directing “The Little Drummer Girl” for AMC.”
“Robot,” in Amazon’s “Homecoming.” Anthony Hopkins as Lear, also on Amazon.”


Add events directly to the calendar
Read more lists of art, classical music, dance, movies, pop music and drama
"All dates may change."
“…… The new program will be broadcast at the end of the year, and there are some important return series.... "
"The Romanoff for Amazon by Matthew Weiner, one of the leading TV creators, is also on the air. It's his first series since mad men, Lena Dunham and Jennifer Konner camped for HBO. Their follow-up to girls
"Benigno del Toro escapes in danamola" and Jim Carey, directed by Michelle Gondry, perform during "joke" time
Michael Douglas and Alan akin in Netflix's "kominsky method" and Tony Colette in Netflix's "vagabond."
Jessica Langer returns to FX's "American horror story.". Sean Pan's gourd in "the first"
Korean director Park sung wook directed "little drummer girl" for AMC
"Robot", in Amazon's "back to school festival". Anthony Hopkins, as Lear, is also on Amazon



Number  32
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sporty Spice will be performing her band's hits, as well as her solo stuff, although tickets aren't cheap with entry level starting at £45 and ranging all the way up to £175.”
“And perhaps sick of waiting, Mel C has now decided to hit the road solo, securing a six week residency at Boisdale restaurant in London's Canary Wharf.”
“...the royal wedding going as far as to hint they could even perform at the reception on Saturday...”
“But it's now been claimed that only three of the Spiceys have made it to the list, with Victoria Beckham, Emma Bunton and Geri Halliwell having reportedly got invites, while Mel B and Mel C have been left out in the cold.”
““Only Victoria, Emma and Geri were invited, so clearly, the Spice Girls were never going to perform," a source told the New York Post's Page Six.”
“Victoria and husband David are already well in with the royals, having attended Prince William and Kate's wedding in 2011.”
“(Image: PA) (Image: Getty Images)Geri also mixes in more aristocratic circles these days following her marriage to Formula One boss Christian Horner.”
“Asked about the wedding back in February, Mel B told the world her presence was a done deal.”
“"Yeah, I’m going...”
“I don't know if I should've said that!"”


"Sports spice girl will perform her band's hit songs and her solo works, but tickets are not cheap. Entry level tickets range from 45 pounds to 175 pounds."
"Perhaps tired of waiting, Mel C has now decided to go on his own and get a six week stay at boysdale restaurant in London's Canary Wharf."
“…… The royal wedding even hinted that they could even perform at the reception on Saturday. "
"But now it's reported that only three of the spaceys are on the list. It's reported that Victoria Beckham, Emma Bunton and Gary Halliwell have been invited, while Mel B and Mel C have been ignored."
A source told the New York Post on page 6: "only Victoria, Emma and grey were invited, and it's clear that the spice girls will never perform."
"Victoria and her husband David have a good relationship with the royal family. They attended the wedding of Prince William and Kate in 2011."
(photo: PA) (photo: Getty Images) after marrying Christian Horner, the owner of Formula One racing, grey has joined more aristocratic circles these days
"Asked about her February wedding, Mel B told the world that her presence was a foregone conclusion."
"Yes, I'm going to..."
"I don't know if I should say that!"



Number  33
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Avengers: Endgame will be released on April 26th, 2019.”
“Doctor Strange did see into the future and he did give Thanos the Infinity Stone for a reason saying that they were in the endgame now Endgame will also likely rope in Captain Marvel and her space traveling powers so while everything may not rest on Ant Man he certainly...”
“If you’ve skipped one or two, there may be some lingering questions after watching Endgame’s first trailer.”
“[Warning: The following contains spoilers for Avengers: Infinity War and Ant-Man and the Wasp.]”
“Avengers: Endgame’s trailer sets up a surprising reveal: the surviving Avengers presumed that Scott Lang, aka Ant-Man, was killed when Thanos wiped out half of the universe’s life, only to have him turn up on their doorstep at the end of the trailer.”
“Lang’s appearance — wildly waving his arms around and asking Captain America to let him into the makeshift Avengers headquarters — is to the great surprise of just about everyone.”
“Ant-Man didn’t appear in Avengers: Infinity War, which could explain why heroes like Captain America, Black Widow, and Bruce Banner (the Hulk is also MIA) are shocked to learn that Lang survived.”
“But Lang’s appearance won’t be surprising to anyone who watched Ant-Man and the Wasp, which arrived after Avengers: Infinity War.”
““We’re in the endgame now.”A post-credits scene from Ant-Man and the Wasp explains that while other people on Earth were shattering into dust following Thanos’ snap, Ant-Man was in the quantum realm.”
“Ant-Man may not have been killed by Thanos’ snap — officially referred to as the Decimation, according to Marvel Comics — possibly because he wasn’t within the universe at the time.”


Avenger: the end will be released on April 26, 2019
"The strange doctor did foresee the future, he did give tanos infinite stone, because he said that they had entered the final stage, and now, the final stage is likely to involve Captain Marvel and her space travel ability, so although nothing can fall on the ant man, he is sure that..."
"If you skip one or two, there may be some lingering problems after watching the first trailer of endgame."
"[warning: the following destroyers include Avengers: Infinite War and ant man and wasp. ]”
There is an amazing discovery in the trailer of "Avenger: the end": the surviving Avenger speculates that Scott Lang, also known as ant man, was killed when tanos wiped out half of the life in the universe. As a result, he appears on the doorstep of their house at the end of the trailer
"Lang's appearance - waving his arms wildly, asking Captain America to let him into the temporary Avenger headquarters - surprised almost everyone."
"Ant man didn't appear in Avenger: Infinite War, which explains why heroes like Captain America, the black widow and Bruce Banner (and Mia is the Hulk) were shocked to learn that Lang survived."
"But Lang's appearance will not surprise anyone who has seen" ant man and wasp ", which appeared after" Avenger: Infinite War. "
"We're in the last inning." One scene of the ant man and wasp explains that the ant man is in the quantum field when the rest of the earth is smashed into dust in tanos' capture
"The ant man may not have been killed by tanos's thump - officially called a mass extinction according to marvel - probably because he wasn't in the universe at the time."



Number  34
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“That made me so happy because I felt so bad about not being closer to him when he probably needed me the most.””
“He’s very free.”The reality star let out a deep sigh, saying on camera, “When Tyler said that you know don’t worry about Jean-Claude, he’s good, he’s happy.”
“The Real Housewives of New York City star, 52, breathed a sigh of relief after receiving a reading from Hollywood Medium‘s Tyler Henry in an exclusive clip on Monday while she and Henry were at one of the famed restaurants created by Jean-Claude Baker.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I have one man coming through who I can tell is an individual who is not family, and he passed away at a premature age,” Henry, 22, tells the TV star.”
“He s doing this to me motions his hands toward his chest and when they do this it s their way of acknowledging that they take accountability for their passing or what caused them to transition He continued This man I can tell comes across as very creative kind of...”
“...an energy of a very brilliant mind...”
“The thing with this is they’re showing me double-edged sword, double-edged sword.”
“So when they do that that’s their way of acknowledging that whatever good quality they had also might have been the thing that caused some torment internally.”Image zoom Credit: E!”
“Luann de Lesseps“Do you know of any situations pertinent to any individual dying at a premature age that contributed to their passing?” Henry asked de Lesseps.”


"It makes me happy because I feel too close to him when he may need me the most."
"He's free." The reality star sighed deeply in front of the camera and said, "Tyler said, you know, don't worry about Jean Claude, he's fine, he's happy."
On Monday, Tyler Henry, the 52 year old star of "New York City's Real Housewives," read a passage in an exclusive video as she and Henry were dining at a famous restaurant founded by Jean Claude Baker
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Henry, 22, told TV star: "I saw a man who was not family and died early."
"He did this to me, put his hand on his chest, and when they did this, they admitted that they were responsible for their own death, or what led to their transformation, and he continued, I can say, this person seemed very creative..."
“… The energy of a very smart mind... "
"The problem is that they show me a double-edged sword, a double-edged sword."
"So when they do, that's when they admit that no matter what good qualities they have, it can also be the cause of internal pain."! "
"LuAnn de Lesseps" do you know anything about premature death? "Henry asked dreisepps."



Number  35
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The couple was married in November 2016.”
“Jinger and husband Jeremy Vuolo first announced they were expecting their first child together in January, revealing soon after their July 2018 due date.”
“Jessa (Duggar) and husband Ben Seewald are not expecting their third child, despite earlier reports.”
“A Duggar family spokesperson told E!”
“News exclusively that Jessa is not pregnant.”
“Earlier this week, a report from In Touch reported that Jessa was four months along and would be making an announcement in April, according to an anonymous source.”
“It should be noted no one in the Duggar family confirmed that report.”
“As it turns out, Jessa and Ben are too busy parenting their two kids, Henry, 13 months, and Spurgeon, 2, to think about more kids.”
“"Right now we have two kids and there’s two of us, so it’s man-to-man coverage.”
“When we have more we ll have to switch it up to a zone defense Ben joked to PEOPLE magazine last year with Jessa adding that they may be expanding their family in non biological method It will be a little while since we just had a baby but adopting...”


"The couple got married in November 2016."
"Ginger and her husband, Jeremy vuolo, announced for the first time in January that they would be pregnant with their first child together, which they revealed shortly after their due date in July 2018."
"Despite earlier reports that Jesse (dagger) and her husband Ben Seward are not pregnant with a third child."
"A spokesperson for the daggers told me!"
"Jesse doesn't have an exclusive on pregnancy."
"Earlier this week, according to an anonymous source, a report from contact said Jesse had been four months and would make an announcement in April."
"It should be noted that no one in the Dagar family confirmed this report."
"It turns out that Jesse and Ben are busy raising their two children, 13-month-old Henry and 2-year-old spookin, and have no time to think about more children."
"Now we have two children and two people, so it's person to person."
"When we have more people, we will have to turn it into regional defense. Ben joked with Jesse in people magazine last year that they may expand their families in an abiotic way. It will be a while, because we have just had a child, but adopt..."



Number  36
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...their main priority will always and forever be the wellbeing of their son...”
“I think that’s disgusting and I would never sell my soul to the devil like that.”
“There was even a social media meltdown.”
“Though the singer is finally ready to clear the air.”
“Sitting down with the ladies of The View, the Grammy-nominated reality star shared the status of her relationship with Herbert and spilled the tea who fueled allegations that caused her Instagram hiatus.”
““I have a regular marriage and in regular marriages just like everyone else, things happen, you know.”
“In my marriage, it was just to a point where I felt like divorce was the only option I had left,” she said.”
“Herbert sat in the audience listening attentively as his former partner continued.”
“Although we re in extensive counseling and that is much needed and it always will be I think the bigger picture of everything is that we have a responsibility to my amazing 4 year old son just to raise him in the most comfortable amazing loving and secure household that...”
“...we can that s why we don t live together she said...”


“…… Their first priority will always be their son's happiness... "
"I think that's disgusting. I would never sell my soul to the devil like that."
"Social media has even collapsed."
"Although the singer is finally ready to clarify the truth."
The Grammy nominated reality star sat with the audience, shared her relationship with Herbert and poured a cup of tea, which helped fuel the accusation that her instagram had been interrupted
"I have a fixed marriage, and in a fixed marriage, like everyone else, things happen, you know."
"In my marriage, I feel that divorce is my only choice," she said
"Herbert sat in the audience listening intently, his former partner continued
"Although we are conducting extensive psychological counseling, which is very necessary and will always be so, I think that, more importantly, we are responsible for my amazing 4-year-old son, that is, raising him in the most comfortable, lovely and safe family..."
“… We can That's why we don't live together, she said



Number  37
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“In July of last year, she shared stroke identification tips on her Instagram to help others recognize it happening — sharing that despite lingering symptoms of the stroke, such as the occasional slip of her tongue or forgetting of a word, she is “almost fully recovered” and is feeling “great.””
“I’ve pretty much fully recovered, but I can’t say that I don’t think, ‘Could this happen again?’ ”RELATED VIDEO: Kim Zolciak-Biermann Says She Received Death Threats After RHOA Costar NeNe Leakes Called Her ‘Racist’Since then, Zolciak-Biermann has become an outspoken advocate on the issue.”
“...never seen before...”
“On Tuesday, the 39-year-old Don’t Be Tardy and Real Housewives of Atlanta star shared a photo to Instagram of an X-ray she had taken.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The side-profile scan showed the device put in Zolciak-Biermann’s heart in the aftermath of her 2015 stroke.”
““How crazy?!!”
“You can see the device they put in my heart 2 years ago… on my X-ray that I got today!”
“God is so good!”
“!” Zolciak-Biermann wrote in the caption of the photo, which she labelled “My chest X-ray and you can see the device in my heart!”


"In July last year, she shared stroke recognition tips on instagram to help others recognize the occurrence of stroke - she shared that despite the lingering symptoms of stroke, such as occasional aphasia or forgetting a word, she" almost recovered completely "and felt" great. "
"I'm almost fully recovered, but I can't say I don't think, 'will this happen again? "Related video: Kim zolciak Biermann said she received death threats because RhoA's collaborator, Nene leaves, called her" racist. ". Since then, zolciak Biermann has been an outspoken advocate of this issue. "
“… Never seen... "
"On Tuesday, the 39 year old" don't be late "shared an X-ray photo she took on instagram with the Atlanta star's" Real Housewives. "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"A lateral scan showed that the device was implanted into zorchak Bilman's heart after her stroke in 2015."
"Crazy?"?! "
"You can see on my X-ray today the device they put in my heart two years ago!"
"Good God!"
"! zolciak Biermann wrote in the title of the photo that she pasted" my chest X-ray, you can see the device in my heart! "



Number  38
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“Here’s what her five tarot cards told her, according to Savvas:Card #1: Try Things DifferentlySavvas explains: ‘It's the most important card for you to take into the new year because everything essentially what I was feeling before setting into this and sitting into your energy.”
“And while the world is currently mourning the loss of yet another one of our favourite A list couples we have a feeling the World of Dance star might have already known a break up was on the cards back in January as a result of an eerily accurate Tarot...”
“...card reading...”
“In the reading – which was filmed for Jenna's YouTube channel – the actress met with spiritual teacher Todd Savvas (whom she adorably calls ‘Merlin’) to find out what's in store for 2018, reports E!”
“News.”
“Introducing the reading, Dewan says: ‘It's 2018.”
“2017 was kind of crap for everybody in their own unique way.”
“‘It's a new year and I kind of just wanted to know what's happening, what my soul wants me to know, what's on the horizon and what to look out for?’In response, Savvas said her open-minded attitude was the perfect way to approach the cards.”
“This content is imported from YouTube.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"This is what her five tarot cards tell her, according to Savas: card1: try different things, Savas explained:" this is the most important card for you in the new year, because everything is what I feel before I enter the year and enter your energy. "
"When the whole world mourns the loss of another of our most popular A-level lovers, we have a feeling that the world of dance stars may have known for a long time that in January, due to a strange and accurate tarot card, the breakup is imminent..."
“… Read card... "
"In reading for Jenna's YouTube channel, the actress meets with spiritual mentor Todd Savas (who she lovingly calls" Merlin ") to learn about the future of 2018," e said
"News."
"In introducing the reading, Dewan said: 'it's 2018.'"
"2017 is rubbish for everyone and has its own unique way."
"It's a new year, I just want to know what happened, what my soul wants me to know, what's on the horizon, what to pay attention to? In this regard, Savas said, her open-minded attitude is the best way to approach the card
"This content was imported from YouTube."



Number  39
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Or, if MTV does not have the drama from the storyline they want, they try to create drama as hard as they can.””
““You guys need to leave and leave for the rest of the f—ing day.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Tensions between Evans and Eason began to simmer when Evans went to her husband-to-be seeking comfort after getting upset over her relationship with her estranged mother, Barbara, just 24 hours ahead of the big day.”
“Eason, however, was busy doing construction work in the couple’s shed, and Evans lost it.”
““Until he acts like I exist then I’m not filming anymore,” she screamed at the cameras.”
““I want him to talk to me.”
“I want him to ask me what’s wrong with me.”
“He doesn’t care.”Within minutes, Evans, 25, decided to kick out the MTV show’s crew.”
““Can you guys please go away?” she told them.”


"Or, if MTV doesn't have the drama in the storyline they want, they will try their best to create drama."
"You guys have to leave, and then leave for the rest of the day."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The tension between Evans and Ethan began to ferment, because Evans was upset about his relationship with his separated mother Barbara 24 hours before his big day, so Evans went to her husband for comfort."
"But Ethan was busy building in the couple's shed, and Evans lost it."
"Unless he acts like I do, I'll never shoot again," she screamed into the camera
"I want him to talk to me."
"I want him to ask me what happened."
"He doesn't care." Within minutes, Evans, 25, decided to fire the MTV crew
"Can you go away? "She told them."



Number  40
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I had days where I wanted to physically harm myself."”
“Not only was I a victim of viral humiliation but a victim of cyber bullying.”
“I don t do drugs...”
“The British wrestling diva was issued with a lengthy ban back in October for her second violation of the wrestling company's Talent Wellness Programme.”
“Paige had already been suspended back in August for 30 days and had previously denied taking illegal substances.”
“But the 24-year-old has now opened up about the heartache surrounding her suspension after being filmed on reality show Total Divas.”
“According to The Sun, the interview was conducted last year when Paige had just found out the news that she had been banned and broke down in tears.”
“Paige said: “WWE posted a statement about me failing the wellness policy.”
“Video Loading Video Unavailable Click to play Tap to play The video will auto-play soon 8 Cancel Play now“We get drug tested all the time…first of all, I don’t do drugs.”
““Second of all, I did the test and I passed it.”


"I wanted to hurt myself for a few days."
"I am not only a victim of viral humiliation, but also a victim of cyber bullying."
"I don't take drugs..."
"As early as October, the British wrestler was suspended for a long time for violating the wrestling company's talent health plan for the second time."
"Page was suspended for 30 days as early as August after denying taking illegal drugs."
"But the 24-year-old, who was filmed in the reality show total queen, has now publicly expressed her heartache of being suspended."
"According to the sun, the interview was conducted last year when Peggy cried just after she found out that she had been banned."
"We made a statement that I didn't comply with the health policy," page said
"Video loading video not available click play click play video will play automatically soon 8 cancel play now" we have been conducting drug testing First of all, I don't use drugs
"Second, I took the exam, and I passed it."



Number  41
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Rob’s only concern is for the well-being of baby Dream.””
“I’ve tried to warn my kids — all of them, I’ve got a lot of kids — you’ve got to pick your friends, and it’s hard to do.”
“The I Am Cait alum, 67, weighed in on the situation while appearing on The View on Friday, July 14, along with revenge porn victim Mischa Barton and her lawyer Lisa Bloom, who is also representing Chyna.”
““It’s a tough deal.”
“We’ve had to deal with this, obviously in our family,” Jenner said.”
““Rob was stupid for doing that.”
“He kind of apologized.”Jenner clarified that he has not had much of a relationship with Kardashian, 30, in recent years, though.”
““I’ve never met Blac Chyna, never met the kid [Dream Kardashian].”
“Rob, I haven’t really haven’t had a serious conversation with in years,” she said.”
““I’ve kind of been out of that scene, so I really can’t comment on what’s going on there.” (The rest of the Kardashians have also distanced themselves from Jenner after the former Olympian made damaging claims in her memoir about ex-wife Kris Jenner.)”


"Rob's only concern is the happiness of the baby's dream."
"I try to warn my children - all the children, I have a lot of children - that you have to choose your friends, which is hard to do."
"I'm Cain's 67 year old alumnus, who was involved in the incident with revenge porn victim Misha Barton and her lawyer Lisa bloom when I appeared in opinion magazine on July 14 (Friday), and she was also Zina's representative."
"It's a tough deal."
"We have to face this problem, obviously at home," Jenner said
"Rob is stupid to do that."
Jenner clarified that he had little to do with 30-year-old Kardashian in recent years
"I've never met Blake ziner, or that kid."
"Rob, I haven't talked to you seriously for years," she said
"I've left the scene, so I really can't comment on what happened there." (other members of Kardashian's family have also distanced themselves from Jenner, a former Olympic athlete, after she made destructive remarks about her ex-wife Chris Jenner in her memoirs.)



Number  42
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RIP.””
“...before his death...”
“Hardy was best known for his role in the Harry Potter films as the Minister for Magic Cornelius Fudge, and as Siegfried Farnon in BBC series All Creatures Great and Small.”
“Hardy’s children Emma, Justine and Paul said in a statement: “It is with great sadness that the family of Robert Hardy CBE today announced his death, following a tremendous life: a giant career in theatre, television and film spanning more than 70 years.”
“From the early start post WWII with the Shakespeare Memorial Company in Stratford to his later role in the Harry Potter films as Cornelius Fudge the Minister for Magic he will perhaps be most remembered for two iconic roles as Siegfried Farnon in the long running and much loved BBC”
“...series All Creatures Great and Small and in his many and magnificently distinguished portrayals of Winston Churchill...”
“”They said that they will remember their father “as a meticulous linguist, a fine artist, a lover of music and a champion of literature, as well a highly respected historian, and a leading specialist on the longbow.”
““He was an essential part of the team that raised the great Tudor warship The Mary Rose.”
“Always dignified Gruff elegant twinkly and always dignified he is celebrated by all who knew him and loved him and everyone who enjoyed his work Hardy s children said they are immensely grateful to the team at the Denville Hall retirement home for their tender care during in the weeks...”
“A familiar face in households across the country, Hardy’s other roles included Tite Barnacle in Little Dorrit (2008) and Arthur Brooke in Middlemarch (1994).”


"Tear."
“… Before he died... "
Hardy is best known for his role as magic minister Cornelius Fudge in the Harry Potter films and Sigmund Vernon in the BBC film the great and the small of all creatures
"Robert Hardy's CBE family announced his death today with great sadness. He has experienced a great life: a great career in the field of drama, television and film, spanning more than 70 years," Hardy's children Emma, Justin and Paul said in a statement
"Starting with Shakespeare Memorial in Stratford in the early days after World War II, and later playing magic minister Cornelius Fudge in Harry Potter films, he may be best known for his two iconic roles of Sigmund Vernon in the long run and loved by the BBC."
“…… All the creatures in the series, big and small, in his many outstanding carvings of Winston Churchill.... "
"They say they will remember their father" as a meticulous linguist, an excellent artist, a music lover and literature supporter, as well as a respected historian and a famous Longbow expert
"He was an integral part of the team that built the great Tudor ship Mary Rose."
"Always solemn, rough, elegant, flashing, always solemn. He was praised by all who knew him and loved him. Everyone who liked his work, Hardy's children said that they were very grateful to the team of Danville hall retirement home for taking good care of them in the past few weeks..."
Hardy is a familiar face in American family. His other roles include Tate barnack in little Dorrit (2008) and Arthur Brooke in Middlemarch (1994)



Number  43
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I think part of what I was trying to say was about inclusion, and about that openness to my impulses,” he said.”
“...his comments were twisted and taken out of context clarifying that he was referring to how he was immersed in gay culture while preparing for the role...”
“The actor sparked backlash from the LGBT community in July 2017 when he was starring in the London production of the play and stated that he was a gay man right now just without the physical act Garfield later said...”
“...the 1980s crisis that killed hundreds of thousands in the gay community...”
“Garfield Faces Backlash After Saying I Am a Gay Man Right Now Just Without the Physical Act In the play The Amazing Spider Man star plays Prior Walter a gay man battling the reality of AIDS during the height of...”
“He continues But if I were to identify I would identify as heterosexual and being someone who identifies that way and who s taking on this seminal role my scariest thought was Am I allowed to do this WATCH Andrew...”
“I want to know as much of the garden as possible before I pass I have an openness to any impulses that may arise within me at any time Image zoom Andrew Garfield in Angels in America Credit Helen Maybanks...”
“I think most people — we’re intrinsically trying to control our experience here, and manage it, and put walls around what we are and who we are.”
““My stance toward life, though, is that I always try to surrender to the mystery of not being in charge.”
““Up until this point, I’ve only been sexually attracted to women,” Garfield says.”


"I think part of what I want to say is about tolerance and openness to my impulses," he said
“… His comments were distorted and taken out of context to clarify how he meant to immerse himself in gay culture while preparing for the role of... "
"In July 2017, when the actor appeared in the play in London, he aroused strong opposition from the LGBT community. He said that he is now a homosexual, but he has no body movement. Garfield later said that..."
"The crisis of the 1980s caused hundreds of thousands of deaths among the gay community..."
"Garfield is facing strong opposition after saying that I am now a homosexual. It's just that the amazing spider man star doesn't play a homosexual man's real struggle with AIDS at a high level..."
"He went on, but if I admit I'm heterosexual, I'll admit I'm heterosexual, and I think I'm heterosexual. My most terrible thought is, can I make this watch, Andrew..."
"I want to know as much about the garden as possible before passing it. I have an open attitude to the impulses that may arise in my heart at any time. This is Andrew Garfield's image in angels in America, Helen maybanks's work..."
"I think most people - we're essentially trying to control and manage our experience here, to build walls around who we are and who we are."
"However, my attitude towards life is that I always try to surrender to irresponsible mysteries."
"So far, I've only been sexually attracted to women," Garfield said



Number  44
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“News on Wednesday.”
““I fell in love, got married quickly and am very sad that two people in love are not together,” Tom, 50, told E!”
“...to Tom D Agostino...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Taped from her house in Sag Harbor, New York, the former countess talked candidly about the demise of her marriage.”
““I didn’t see all these red flags,” she said about watching D’Agostino’s “sneaky” actions for the first time as a RHONY viewer.”
“It s different in that perspective on the show all things piled up Rumors of D Agostino s infidelity which were often brought up by her fellow New York City Housewives this past season was a major part of their split which came after they had a couple of bouts...”
“...and breakups during their romance...”
“Image zoom Credit: Bravo“It was the weekend before the reunion [aired], basically,” she said, when asked if there was one thing that led to their separation.”
““Tom went out and he called up an old girlfriend and they met up with a group of people.”


"The news on Wednesday."
"I fell in love and got married soon. It's very sad that two people in love are not together," Tom, 50, told E
“… To Tom dagostino... "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
The former Countess made a recording at her home in port saga, New York, about the end of her marriage
"I didn't see all these danger signs," she said, noting that as a rhony audience, she saw dagostino's "sneaky" action for the first time
"From this point of view, it's different. All things have accumulated rumors of D Agostino's infidelity, which is often put forward by her colleague, the New York City housewife, in the past season. It's a major part of their breakup. This is after they have had several contests..."
“… Break up in their romance... "
Asked if there was one thing that led to their separation, she said: "it was basically a weekend before the reunion."
"Tom went out. He called an old girlfriend. They met a group of people."



Number  45
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It is usually held on Friday nights, but organizers moved the competition to Saturday in an effort to draw a bigger audience.”
“The contest is in its 30th year.”
“Last year's winner was a 125-pound (57-kilogram) gentle giant named Martha — a Neopolitan Mastiff with gas and a droopy face.”
“The contestants included a blackhead-covered Chinese Crested-Dachshund mutt, a bulldog mix with excess wrinkly skin and a Pekingese named Wild Thang.”
“The dogs are evaluated by a panel of judges.”
“The dogs and their handlers walk down a red carpet.”
“Dogs in the annual competition flaunt their imperfections - some have hairless bodies, others have lolling tongues.”
“Brainard found Zsa Zsa on a pet-finding site, according to the contest bio.”
“The dog's owner Megan Brainard of Anoka, Minnesota, will receive $1,500 for Zsa Zsa's win.”
“Zsa Zsa won the title Saturday night at the Sonoma-Marin Sonoma-Marin Fairgrounds in Petaluma.”


The game is usually held on Friday night, but the organizers put it off until Saturday in order to attract more spectators
"This is the 30th year of the competition."
"Last year's champion was a 125 pound (57 kg) gentle giant named Martha, a New Orleans mastiff with poison gas and a drooping face."
Participants included a black headed sausage, a wrinkled bulldog and a Pekingese named wild thang
"The dogs were judged by a jury."
"Dogs and their owners walk on the red carpet."
In the annual competition, dogs show off their imperfections - some have hairless bodies, some have drooping tongues
"According to the profile of the competition, brennard found Zsa Zsa on a pet search website."
Megan brennard, owner of a dog in arnoka, Minnesota, will win 1500 dollars
"Zsa Zsa won the championship at Sonoma Marin playground in Petaluma on Saturday night."



Number  46
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““She had seen that at the core of adult issues like addiction and family breakdown, unresolved childhood mental health issues were often part of the problem.””
““It was Catherine who first realized that all three of us were working on mental health in our individual areas of focus,” he said.”
“Prince William reportedly spoke about how “proud” he was to be involved and credited his wife for coming up with the idea.”
“The royals celebrated the impact of their Heads Together Charity that encourages people to speak out about their struggles with mental health.”
““She’s delighted to be here tonight.”RELATED: Duchess Catherine has a new secret weapon to help aid against morning sicknessShe is reportedly less than 12 weeks into her pregnancy.”
“News.”
““The Duchess’ condition is improving but she’s still suffering from Hyperemesis Gravidarum,” a royal aide told E!”
“The mother of two suffers from Hyperemesis Gravidarum, a severe form of morning sickness in her pregnancies and it forced her to miss several engagements, including Prince George’s first day of school.”
“The reception marks the first time Catherine has been seen in public since announcing her pregnancy in early September.”
“The Duchess looked beautiful in a blue frock and black heels as she attended a reception at St. James Palace, her tiny baby bump on display.”


"She saw that at the heart of adult problems, such as addiction and family breakdown, unresolved children's mental health problems are often part of the problem."
"For the first time, Catherine realized that all three of us are committed to mental health in our respective areas of concern," he said
According to reports, Prince William said he was "proud" of his involvement and praised his wife for coming up with the idea
"The royal family celebrated the impact of a charity they worked together to encourage people to speak out about their mental health efforts."
"She's very happy to be here tonight." Related reports: Duchess Catherine has a new secret weapon to help her fight morning sickness. She is reported to be less than 12 weeks pregnant
"News."
"The Duchess is getting better, but she still has hyperemesis gravidarum," a royal aide told e! "
The mother of two suffered from hyperemesis gravidarum, a severe morning sickness during her pregnancy, which forced her to miss several dates, including Prince George's first day of school
"This reception marks Catherine's first public appearance since she announced her pregnancy in early September."
The Duchess was wearing a blue jacket and black high heels to the reception at St. James' palace. Her little lump was on display



Number  47
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED: The best of beauty at the Venice Film Festival:”
“Check out the slideshow for the best Venice Film Festival ensembles so far.”
“The annual film festival is going on through September 9, so there are definitely more red carpet looks to come!”
“Days later, she dazzled in a emerald green Marchesa gown.”
“She donned a Atelier Versace gown in a bright red hue for her first red carpet.”
“Of course, Luciana stole the spotlight from her husband of 12 years not once, but twice!”
“Matt Damon also made several red carpet appearances with his gorgeous wife Luciana alongside him.”
“Jane Fonda was a total showstopper in a dusty blue tulle Marchesa gown with floral embroidery, while Amanda Seyfried stunned in a floral Alexander McQueen frock.”
“She paired the look with Aquazzura shoes.”
“Amal Clooney made her first red carpet appearance after giving birth to her twins back in June, wearing a dreamy lavender gown from Atelier Versace.”


"Related reports: the most beautiful works of Venice Film Festival"
"Check out the slides for the best episodes of the Venice Film Festival so far."
"The annual film festival will last until September 9, so there will certainly be more red carpet looks!"
A few days later, she was dazzled in her emerald green machesha robe
"The first time she walked down the red carpet, she wore a bright red dress from atelier Versace."
"Of course, Luciana stole the limelight from her husband of 12 years, not once, but twice!"
"Matt Damon also made several red carpet appearances with his beautiful wife, Luciana."
"Jane Fonda is a real showman in a Dusty Blue Tulle Marquez Floral Embroidered robe, while Amanda Seyfried is stunned in an Alexander McQueen floral dress."
"She matched the look with the aquazzura shoes."
"Amal Clooney made her debut on the red carpet after giving birth to twins in June, wearing a dreamy Lavender dress from atelier Versace."



Number  48
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“"I am mid-life, and this is a new chapter for me."”
“"I took five years off of movies, just making music and touring," she said.”
“Best Supporting Actress...”
“But the '90s weren't just about Lewis' movie roles -- the actress and singer garnered a lot of attention for her high-profile romance with Brad Pitt.”
“Lewis began dating Pitt, who was 10 years her senior, at the age of 17.”
“They were together for three years before splitting in 1993.”
“Following their breakup, Lewis, who once deemed herself a "heavy pothead," got deeper into drugs and began dabbling with painkillers and cocaine.”
“She eventually entered a rehab program and has been sober since she was in her 20s.”
“In a new interview with People, Lewis admitted that most of the stories surrounding her were "usually about Brad Pitt or drug addiction, which hasn't been me since I was 22."”
“"I'm 40.”


"I'm middle-aged and this is my new chapter."
"I spent five years watching movies, just doing music and touring," she said
"Best supporting actress..."
"But it wasn't just Lewis' movie role in the 1990s - the actress and singer got a lot of attention for her high-profile relationship with Brad Pitt."
When Lewis was 17, he started dating Pete, who was 10 years older than her
"They were together for three years until they broke up in 1993."
After the two broke up, Lewis, who once thought he was an "addict", got a deeper understanding of drugs and began to dabble in painkillers and cocaine
"She ended up in rehab and has been awake since she was in her 20s."
In a new interview with people magazine, Lewis admitted that most of the stories surrounding her "are usually about Brad Pitt or drugs, not me since I was 22."
"I'm 40 years old."



Number  49
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED: Blake Lively Is Going to Play an MMA Fighter in Her Most Intense Role YetSee What's Trending in W Video:”
“She also told Glamour that characters in Hollywood are most often two-dimensional, but having women take the reins to produce their projects—as with breakout blockbuster Wonder Woman—is a step in the right direction.”
“In a cover interview for the September issue of Glamour, the former Gossip Girl star opens up about why she hates it when people claim she has a "perfect" life.”
“"It’s nonsense.”
“It simplifies people," she says of the rainbows-and-sunshine-filled lifestyle she's often portrayed by the media to have.”
“"Not all men, but a subsection of men, have a desire to understand and control women.”
“To do that, you have to paint them into this thing you can wrap your head around.”
“But women are complex.”
“It also is [a reminder] that what you see in the media is not real life."”
“The issue of understanding women as complex people isn't just limited to Lively IRL.”


"Related report: Blake Lively will play an MMA fighter in her most intense role: yetsee what's trending in W Video:
"She also told Glamour magazine that Hollywood roles are usually two-dimensional, but it's a step in the right direction for women to take control of their projects like the breakthrough blockbuster wonder woman."
In a cover interview with glamour's September issue, the former gossip girl star confessed why she hated it when people claimed she had a "perfect" life
"That's bullshit."
"It simplifies people's lives," she said, adding that rainbows and sunshine are full of lifestyles, and the media she often portrays are
"Not all men, but a small number of men, have the desire to understand and control women."
"To do that, you have to put them on this thing so you can wrap your head around it."
"But women are complicated."
"It's also (a reminder) that what you see in the media is not real life."
"The problem of understanding women as complex people is not limited to the lively IRL."



Number  50
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Write to Eli Meixler at eli.meixler@time.com.”
“If you don't get the confirmation within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder.”
“Clarkson called for a “moment of action” to replace the usual “moment of silence” that follows mass shooting tragedies.”
““My home state has had so much heartbreak over this past year.”
“And once again we re grieving for more kids that have died the singer and host of The Voice said referring to the shooting at Santa Fe High School in Texas where 10 people were killed at least 10 others wounded by 17 year old suspected gunman Dimitrios Pagourtzis on...”
“Friday...”
“The incident recalled the deadly shooting at Marjory Stoneman Douglas High School in Parkland, Florida in February, which killed 17 people and sparked a national debate about gun violence.”
“Read more How Parkland Teens Are Leading the Gun Control Conversation Clarkson who was hosting the Billboard Music Awards reiterated that call for action in a sometimes emotional plea saying that we re failing our children by allowing them to continue to face the risk of gun violence in schools...”
“...churches and movie theaters...”
““I’m so sick of ‘moment of silence’.”


"To Eli mexler, Eli mexler @ time.com."
"If you are not confirmed within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder."
"Clarkson called for" action moment "to replace the usual" silence moment "after mass shooting tragedy."
"In the past year, my hometown has experienced too much heartbreak."
"Once again, we grieve for the death of more children," the singer and voice presenter said of the shooting at Santa Fe high school in Texas, where 10 people were killed and at least 10 wounded by 17-year-old gun suspect Dimitrios paguz... "
"Friday..."
"This incident is reminiscent of the fatal shooting in February at Marjorie Stoneman Douglas high school in parkland, Florida, which killed 17 people and sparked a national debate on gun violence."
"To learn more about how parkland teenagers lead the gun control dialogue, Clarkson hosted the Billboard Music Awards. He reiterated the call for action in a sometimes emotional way. He said that we are failing them by allowing children to continue to face the risk of gun violence in school..."
“… Churches and cinemas... "
"I'm tired of the moment of silence."



Number  51
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"We do have some upcoming shows through the end of the year which will still happen as planned, and we can't wait!"”
“The statement also teases a number of farewell concerts the group has planned this year.”
“"With your love and encouragement we will continue to build on ourselves, support one another in everything we do, and keep making you proud, each other proud and ourselves proud."”
“"To our Harmonizers, thank you for everything we have been able to build as Fifth Harmony," the group's statement concludes.”
“Several members of Fifth Harmony have shared solo tracks so far this year, including Brooke's debut single Perfect and Kordei's recent collaboration with Khalid for the Love, Simon soundtrack, Love Lies.”
“Former member Camila Cabello departed the group at the end of 2016.”
“After finishing in third, the group embarked on a pop music career, releasing three albums — 2015's Reflection, 2016's 7/27 and 2017's self-titled — and scoring a top 10 hit in 2016 with Work From Home.”
“More:Fifth Harmony on Camila Cabello and 'gossip interviews': 'That’s not who we are'More:Camila Cabello: New music, old exes and why 2017 was the 'best year of my life'Fifth Harmony formed in 2012 to compete on the second season of the XFactor.”
“"In doing this we are allowing ourselves to gain new experiences, strengths and perspectives that we can bring back to our Fifth Harmony family."”
“"We are all very excited and grateful to be able to take this time to learn and grow creatively and really find our footing as individuals," the statement continues.”


"We do have some programs to the end of the year, but they will go on as planned. We can't wait!"
"The statement also made fun of the many farewell concerts planned by the orchestra this year."
"With your love and encouragement, we will continue to improve ourselves, support each other in everything we do, make you proud, make each other proud, and make ourselves proud."
"For our harmony, thank you for all you've done for us, as the fifth harmony," the organization's statement concluded
"So far this year, several members of fifth harmony have shared their solo tracks, including Brooke's debut single perfect and coldy's recent collaborations with Khalid, love, Simon soundtrack and love lies
"Former member Camilla Cabello left the group at the end of 2016."
"After finishing third, the band started a career in pop music, releasing three albums - reflection in 2015, 7 / 27 in 2016 and self styled in 2017, and won the top ten albums of 2016 with work at home."
"More: fifth harmonic about Camilla Cabello and" gossip interview ":" that's not us "more: Camilla Cabello: new music, old ex-wife and why 2017 is the best year of my life. Fifth harmonic was founded in 2012 to compete in xfactor Season 2."
"By doing so, we give ourselves new experiences, strengths and perspectives that we can bring back to our fifth harmonious family."
"We are all very excited and grateful to be able to use this time to learn and grow creatively, and really find our foothold as individuals," the statement continued



Number  52
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Check out some of their sexiest selections below:”
“Both of these foxy ladies' Instagram feeds are (almost) too hot to handle.”
“And then she went solo to show off her backside in a high-riding leopard print swimsuit.”
“Visit WebsiteThese ladies must love their followers, because Ashley posted a second booty-licious poolside video.”
“Visit WebsiteADVERTISEMENT Thanks for watching!”
“ADVERTISEMENT Thanks for watching!”
“Dancing poolside with a sexy squad that included Vanessa’s younger sister Stella, Aussie singer/dancer Laura New, and DJ/producer GG Magree, the former Maxim cover girls twerked to the beat of Kendrick Lamar's "DNA," a hard-hitting track from his recently-released album, DAMN.”
“Photos: MaximFormer High School Musical actresses Vanessa Hudgens and Ashely Tisdale graduated from Disney stardom to total smokeshows long ago, and they've reminded us of that fact with a saucy new Instagram clip.”
“This looks like one helluva pool party.”


"Take a look at some of their sexiest choices:
"The instagram feeds of these two fox spirits are (almost) too hot to handle."
"And then she was wearing a leopard print high waisted swimsuit to show off her back."
"Visiting the website, these women must love their followers because Ashley posted a second legal video by the pool."
"Thanks for watching the ads on the website!"
"Thanks for watching!"
"With a sexy team that includes Vanessa's sister Stella, Australian singer / dancer Laura shin, and DJ / producer GG magley, former Maxim cover girl tweaked to Kendrick Lamar's" DNA "rhythm from his latest album, damned heavyweight track."
"Photo: former high school musical actresses Vanessa Huggins and Ashley Tisdale graduated from Disney Stars long ago and joined total smokeshows, reminding us of this fact with a playful new instagram clip."
"It looks like a great pool party."



Number  53
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“As the couple led the crowd in a singalong, it was easy to believe.”
“After the apparent vow renewal played, the words THIS IS REAL LOVE flashed onscreen.”
“Their children have reportedly joined them on tour, so more family moments, both onstage and off, seem inevitable.”
“Bey and Jay together on stage again feels like an ideal celebration of their 10th anniversary this year.”
“This is just the kickoff of “OTR II,” which will continue through October with the North American tour beginning in Cleveland on July 25.”
“Two babies appear in the foreground, though it’s hard to say whether they’re Rumi and Sir, since previous reports of a “second look” at the twins proved to be false.”
“Closer scrutiny shows Beyoncé’s mother Tina Knowles and a blonde Solange standing behind them.”
“Clad in a white suit, Jay-Z embraces Blue before joining Beyoncé, who is wearing a veil and a dress not unlike the one she wore at their original wedding ceremony, her hair pulled back in a chignon.”
“Then, the couple is shown in what looks like an intimate vow renewal ceremony.”
“As Beyoncé and Jay-Z sung “Forever Young” at Wednesday night’s “On the Run Tour II” show in Cardiff, Wales, footage of their family—Beyoncé pregnant with the twins, Jay-Z holding Blue—played on giant screens overhead.”


"It's easy to believe when the couple leads the crowd along a long line."
"It's true love flashing on the screen after the obvious vow renewal."
"It's reported that their children also took part in the tour, so more family moments, both on and off the stage, seem inevitable."
"Bei and Jay Chou feel like ideal celebrations for their 10th anniversary on stage again."
"This is just the beginning of OTR II, which will last until October, and the North American tour will start in Cleveland on July 25."
"The two babies are in the foreground, although it's hard to say they are Mr. Rumi and Mr. Wang, because previous reports about the 'second eye' twins have proved to be false."
"Watch carefully, Beyonce's mother, Tina Knowles, and a blonde sorange are standing behind them."
"Jay-Z was wearing a white suit and hugged blue before joining Beyonce, who was wearing a veil and a dress similar to the one they wore at their original wedding, and her hair was combed back into a long one."
"Then the couple appeared at a ceremony that looked like an intimate renewal of vows."
When Beyonce and Jez sang "forever young" on "travel II" in Cardiff, Wales on Wednesday night, their family, Beyonce, was pregnant with twins, and Jez played it on a huge screen overhead with blue in their arms



Number  54
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But I want him to be strong-minded and I want him to be the way he is, but there’s definitely moments where I feel like I have no idea what I’m doing a lot of the time.””
“I don’t try to pretend that I’m doing it perfect and that things are all smooth and wonderful.”She added, “It’s tough, especially with a toddler.”
“The Sopranos alum, 36, and her pro baseball player husband Cutter Dykstra have welcomed their second child: a son named Jack Adam Dykstra, her rep confirms to PEOPLE.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The baby boy was born Monday, Jan. 15, weighing 8 lbs., 13 oz.”
“— and as her rep tells PEOPLE, “Mother and son are both doing great!”Sigler announced the news Tuesday via a photo gallery featuring herself and 4-year-old son Beau Kyle with the family’s new addition, writing, “He’s here.”
“Jack Adam Dykstra we will talk about your tardiness eventually but for now we ve got a lot of love to give Image zoom Credit Jamie Lynn Sigler Instagram Jamie Lynn Sigler and son Jack Thanks to my besties for helping me laugh and smile and to my husband for...”
“...just being my rock added the star of Dykstra 28 whom she wed in January 2016 in Palm Springs California...”
“Jack’s middle name will resonate with those familiar with Sigler — her oldest brother Adam died suddenly in 2014 after slipping into a coma following a massive brain hemorrhage.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”


"But I want him to be strong willed and I want him to be what he is, but there must be times when I feel like I don't know what I'm doing a lot of the time."
"I don't pretend that I'm perfect, that everything is going well and good," she added. "It's hard, especially for a toddler."
The 36 year old soprano alumnus and her husband, professional baseball player Carter dextra, have their second child: her representative confirmed to people that their son is Jack Adam dextra
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The baby boy was born on Monday, January 15 and weighed 8 pounds 13 ounces."
"And her representative told people," Mom and son are doing great! On Tuesday, Sigler announced the news through a photo gallery in which she, her 4-year-old son Bo Kyle and new members of her family wrote, "he's here."
"Jack Adam Dykstra, we'll talk about your lateness in the end, but now we have a lot of credit for scaling pictures Jamie Lynn Sigler instagram Jamie Lynn Sigler and my son Jack thank my good friends for helping me smile, thank my husband..."
“… As my rock star, she married 28 year old dextra in Palm Springs, California, in January 2016... "
"Jack's middle name resonates with those who are familiar with Sigler - her brother Adam died suddenly in 2014 after falling into a coma after a massive cerebral hemorrhage."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"



Number  55
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“(Exclusive)EXCLUSIVE: 'Black Lightning' Cast Opens Up About Being the First Black Superhero Family on the CWGina Rodriguez’s 'Jane the Virgin' Directorial Debut Is the Next Chapter in Her Unstoppable Career (Exclusive)”
“RELATED CONTENT:'Riverdale' Stars Dish Hilarious Details About Choni's First Kiss & Falice's 'Serpent Love'!”
“The fate of these shows is expected to be announced in May.”
“Noticeably missing from The CW's list of renewals are The 100, iZombie, Life Sentence and Valor.”
“"By picking these ten series up for next season, we have a terrific selection of programming to choose from when we set our fall schedule in May, with more still to come."”
““As The CW expands to a six-night, Sunday through Friday schedule next season, we are proud to have such a deep bench of great returning series for 2018-19," President of The CW Mark Pedowitz announced in a press release on Monday.”
“Rounding out The CW's list is Supernatural, which will be returning for an impressive 14th season!”
“Additionally, Jane the Virgin (season 5), Crazy Ex-Girlfriend (season 4), Riverdale (season 3) and Dynasty (season 2) will all be back for a new year of episodes.”
“The full list of returning series includes all five DC series with Arrow (season 7), The Flash (season 5), DC's Legends of Tomorrow (season 4), Supergirl (season 4) and Black Lightning (season 2).”
“The network announced on Monday that The CW is picking up all returning series on its fall schedule as well as freshmen Dynasty and Black Lightning.”


(exclusive) exclusive: "the black lightning crew made her debut in CW Gina Rodriguez's maiden Jane directing debut, becoming the first black superhero family, which is the next chapter of her irresistible career (exclusive)"
"Related content: the stars of Riverdale provide funny details for Johnny's first kiss and Farris's snake love!"
"The fate of these shows is expected to be announced in May."
"In CW's renewal list, what is obviously missing are 100, izombe, life imprisonment and bravery."
"By selecting these 10 series for the next season, we have a series of wonderful shows to choose from when we set our autumn schedule in May, and there are more to do."
CW President Mark pedowitz announced in a press release on Monday: "with the expansion of CW's schedule to six nights next season, from Sunday to Friday, we are proud to have such a deep lineup for the 2018-19 season."
"It's supernatural to finish CW's list. It's going to be an impressive 14th season!"
"In addition, virgin Jane (Season 5), crazy ex girlfriend (Season 4), Riverdale (Season 3) and Dynasty (Season 2) will all return in the new year."
The complete list of the return series includes all five DC series, including arrow (Season 7), lightning (Season 5), DC's legend of tomorrow (Season 4), super girl (Season 4) and black lightning (Season 2)
"The network announced on Monday that CW will select all the return series, as well as the new dynasty and black lightning, on its autumn program list."



Number  56
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The subtleties of Drake, a young black man, mimicking how white men used to mimic and dehumanize black people may be lost in a rap battle, but we should not be distracted from the issues that are still affecting our communities.””
“While the company noted that the photo wasn’t taken during a Too Black Guys photoshoot, they defended both their clothing and Drake’s intention, writing, “We feel that Drake, who is a long-time friend of the brand, was brilliantly illustrating the hypocrisy of the Jim Crow Era.”
“David Leyes and writing These are his truths see for yourself The photo has elicited an explanation from both Drake and the Canadian streetwear brand Too Black Guys which made the Jim Crow shirt Drake wears in the photo...”
“That s what I know Pusha T released The Story of Adidon Tuesday in response to Drake s Duppy Freestyle which was a response to Pusha T s Daytona track Infrared After the track premiered Pusha T detailed the photo s source on Twitter linking to the website of photographer...”
“That’s number one.”
“No you weren’t.”
“You were so passionate back then?”
““You are silent on all black issues, Drake,” said Pusha-T. “You don’t stand for nothing, you don’t say nothing about nothing.” The rapper added, “You have all the platform in the world.”
“...actors struggling to get roles being stereotyped and type cast Pusha T dismissed Drake s response pointing to his lack of activism as he s become one of the biggest artists in the world...”
“Pusha T used the picture as the cover art for his new diss track The Story of Adidon While the track contains several incendiary burns and claims Drake felt compelled to respond to the photo which he said was taken in 2007 for a project that was about young black...”


"The subtleties of how young Black Drake imitates and dehumanizes white people may be lost in a rap fight, but we should not be distracted by the problems that still affect our community."
"Although the company pointed out that this picture was not taken when a guy who was too dark was taking a picture, they defended their clothes and Drake's intentions, writing," we think Drake is a long-time friend of the brand, and he excels in illustrating the hypocrisy of Jim Crowe's generation. "
"David Reyes, it's his truth to write these down. You see, this picture has caused the explanation of Drake and the people of Canadian street clothing brand who are too black, which makes Drake wear Jim Crow shirt in the picture..."
"As far as I know, on Tuesday, Pusat released" the story of aditon "in response to Drake's Dolby freestyle, which is a response to Pusat's Daytona circuit. After the premiere of the circuit, Pusat tweeted the photo source in detail and linked to the photographer's website..."
"This is number one."
"No, you don't."
"You were very enthusiastic then?"
"You're silent on all black issues, Drake," Pusat said. "You don't mean to say nothing, to say nothing." The rapper added, "you have all the platforms in the world."
“… The actors are trying to shape the characters and types. The actor pushat refutes Drake's response, pointing out that he lacks enthusiasm because he has become one of the biggest artists in the world... "
"Pusat used this photo as the cover art of his new diss track the story of Addison, which contains several burning burns, and claimed that Drake felt it necessary to respond to this photo, which he said was taken in 2007 for a project about young black people..."



Number  57
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The ‘Mila’ Motherhood ring is available to reserve at marinab.com/mila...”
“They confirmed their engagement back in February.”
““Not only is the ring beautiful, but it furthers our commitment to social responsibility.”Kunis and her fiancé Ashton Kutcher welcomed their first child together, daughter Wyatt Isabelle Kutcher, on 30 September.”
“Kunis as she starts her journey into motherhood continued Ian Harebottle the CEO of Gemfields...”
“While we created it for Mila in celebration of Wyatt s arrival this is the kind of ring any woman can wear Having worked with Marina B on a previous collection of emerald jewellery it was only natural that we would collaborate on a piece for our brand ambassador Mila...”
““We are very excited about the new Mila ring, as it will introduce the iconic Marina B style to a new generation,” said Paul Lubetsky, the CEO of Marina B.”
“Centre in Zambia...”
“The actress who is also the face of Gemfields has designed an 18 karat yellow gold ring set with a Zambian emerald in Marina B s signature cut with all profits from the 4 800 around 2 970 price tag donated to support the upgrade of the Gemfields Nkana Health...”
“To celebrate the birth of her daughter Wyatt, Mila Kunis has teamed up with Gemfields and Marina B to create a ring which honours the devotion and commitment of mothers.”


"Mila's maternal ring can be found in marinab.com/mila ...”
"They confirmed their engagement as early as February."
On September 30, Kunis and her fiancee Ashton Kutcher welcomed their first child, daughter Wyatt Isabel Kutcher
"Kunis begins her mother's journey and continues with Ian harebottle's CEO, Jim field..."
"Although we designed this ring for Mila to celebrate the arrival of Wyatt, it is a ring that any woman can wear. We have worked with Marina B on a series of jadeite jewelry before, so we will naturally work with Mila, our brand ambassador..."
Paul lubetsky, chief executive of Marina B, said: "we are very excited about the new Mila ring because it will introduce the iconic Marina B style to the new generation."
"Zambia Center..."
"The actress, who is also the spokesperson of gemfields, designed an 18 carat gold ring with a Zambian emerald. On Marina B's signature cutting, all the profits came from $4800, about $2970 price tag, to support the upgrade of gemfields nkana health..."
To celebrate the birth of her daughter Wyatt, Mira Kunis joined hands with jimfield and Marina B to create a ring to commemorate her mother's dedication and commitment



Number  58
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““People disappoint you, but your dogs never will.””
““It’s never really fit into my life.”Though Gosselin admits her life is “very complicated,” she won’t allow that to hold her back from the possibility of finding happily ever after.”
“It’s been a little more than eight years since the mother of eight’s divorce from Jon Gosselin was finalized in December 2009, and now, the Kate Plus 8 star is ready to give love another chance.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“PEOPLE can exclusively reveal that Gosselin, 43, will star in new TLC series Kate Plus Date, which will document the reality star on her dating journey.”
““I’m nervous, I’m excited, and I’m forcing myself to do this,” Gosselin, who was married to ex-husband Jon for 10 years, tells PEOPLE about the upcoming docuseries.”
“In fall 2019, her two eldest children — twins Mady and Cara, both 17 — will go off to college, leaving Gosselin at home with 13-year-old sextuplets Aaden, Joel, Alexis, Hannah and Leah.”
“(Collin is enrolled in a program away from home to help him reach his full potential.)”
“As we re talking about Mady and Cara going off to college which is becoming more and more of a reality it s gonna happen it almost became like a worry for them too like Mommy you re gonna be...”
“...all alone soon shares Gosselin...”


"People let you down, but your dog will never."
"It never suited my life." Although Gosselin admits that her life is "very complicated", she will not let it hinder her possibility of finding happiness
"It has been a little more than eight years since the divorce case between the mother of eight children and Jon Gosselin was finalized in December 2009. Now, the Kate plus eight star is ready to give love another chance."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"It can be revealed exclusively that Gosselin, 43, will play in the new TLC series Kate plus dating, which will record the reality TV star's dating experience."
"I'm nervous, I'm excited, I force myself to do it," Gosselin, who has been married to her ex husband Jon for 10 years, told people
"In the fall of 2019, her two oldest children - Twins Maddy and Kara, both 17 years old - will go to college and leave Gosselin and 13-year-old sextuples Aidan, Joel, Alexis, Hannah and Leah at home."
"Colin took part in a run away program to help him reach his full potential."
"When we talk about Maddy and Kara going to college, it has become a more and more realistic thing, which almost becomes their worry. Just like mom, you will become..."
“… It's not long before you're alone to share Gosselin... "



Number  59
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But we shouldn't feel ashamed,' Brie admitted.”
“I can do it on my own."”
“'Oh John, you're gonna be the most amazing dad in the world,' Nikki gushed.”
“I would never, ever say something like this,' John confirmed.”
“'I'm not gonna change my mind.”
“Nikki pressed.”
“Are you gonna change your mind?'”
“I will give you a child,' John promisedDoubts: And when John agreed to fathering a child with Nikki, she expressed concern as she alluded to his capability of siring by saying: 'But you have the...''You're sure though?”
“And relationships, marriage especially, is about sacrifice, and I will make that sacrifice for you.”
“Surprises: 'I can't have you out of my life.”


"But we should not be ashamed," Bree admitted
"I can do it myself."
"Oh, John, you're going to be the greatest dad in the world," Nikki gushed
"I'll never say that," John confirmed
"I won't change my mind."
"Nicky pressed it."
"Do you want to change your mind?"
"I'm going to give you a baby," John promised. When John agreed to have a baby with Nicky, she implied that Nicky was worried when he was able to have a baby. She said, "but you have..." Are you sure? "
"And relationships, especially marriage, are about sacrifice. I will sacrifice for you."
"Surprise:" I can't let you leave my life. "



Number  60
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Drop a comment below.”
“), Nick and Jess begin contemplating marriage.”
“Fox on Thursday announced that the seventh and final season will begin airing on Tuesday, April 10 at 9:30/8:30c.”
“The abbreviated eight-episode run will then air uninterrupted for six weeks, leading up to the one-hour series finale on Tuesday, May 15 at 9/8c.”
“(FWIW, your math isn’t wrong.”
“The network will inevitably air back-to-back episodes at some point before the finale.)”
“As previously reported, Season 7 kicks off with a four-year time jump.”
“After returning from a European book tour (that Julius Pepperwood novel must have really taken off!”
“Potentially complicating matters is Jess’ decision to take a job working for ex-boyfriend Russell (again played by Dermot Mulroney).”
“Are you looking forward to the final season of New Girl?”


"Comment below."
”Nick and Jess began to think about getting married
Fox announced on Thursday that the seventh and final season will begin at 9:30 / 8:30 on Tuesday, April 10
"The eight episode film will be broadcast for six weeks until the one hour finale on Tuesday, May 15, at 9 / 8."
"(fwiw, you're right in math."
"At some point before the end of the show, it's inevitable that the TV network will continue to broadcast some series."
"As previously reported, the seventh season starts with a jump of four years."
"When you come back from your European book tour (that Julius pepperwood novel must be a best seller!"
"Jess's decision to work for ex boyfriend Russell (played by demort muroni) could complicate things."
"Are you looking forward to the last season of new girl?"



Number  61
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She didn't disappoint!”
“She also revealed that the kids had requested the decorations all be environmentally sensitive, she noted that they like to make ghosts to look like the family.”
“Jenn was with ex Ben Affleck when they took the kids trick or treating later that night...”
“Dark layers Jennifer later ditched her witch costume paring her look down to a black top and skinny jeans Family time Later on Jen took the kids trick or treating with ex hubby Ben Affleck Flame thrower Little Sam was dressed like the dragon from How To Train Your Dragon...”
“She completed her scary look with a long black haired wig and a witches hat.”
“Jennifer had her face painted green with contoured cheekbones, drawn on eyebrows and a bold red lip.”
“Earlier in the day, Jennifer showcased her impressive witch transformation.”
“And while Violet, 12, also dressed up, her character wasn't entirely clear.”
“Jennifer Garner was unrecognizable on Wednesday when she turned into the Wicked Witch of the Wild West for HalloweenHer brunette locks were out straight and tied into two low ponytails.”
“The youngest Affleck sibling appeared to be dressed as a dinosaur with a slightly scary head pieceJen, is that you?”


"She's not disappointed!"
"She also revealed that children require all decorations to be environmentally sensitive, noting that they like to make ghosts look like family."
"That night, Jan was with ex Ben Affleck, and they played trick or treat with the kids..."
"In the dark layer, Jennifer abandoned the witch's clothes and changed her appearance into a black coat and tight jeans. After family time, little sam, the" trick or treat "children of Jennifer and her ex husband Ben Affleck, dressed like the dragon in how to train your dragon..."
"She's wearing a long black wig and a witch's hat, and she's done her terrible look."
Jennifer's face is painted green, her cheekbones are well defined, and her eyebrows are painted with a bold red lip
Earlier in the day, Jennifer showed off her impressive witch transformation
"Although the 12-year-old violet is also well dressed, her character is not entirely clear."
"On Wednesday, Jennifer Garner was transformed into an evil witch of the wild west on Halloween, and she was beyond recognition. Her dark hair was straight out and in two ponytails
"The youngest Affleck brother looks like a dinosaur. His head is a little scary. Is that you?"



Number  62
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We made very, very strong attempts to keep them,” offering “an awful lot of money.” But the reality, with long-running dramas, he said, is “sometimes you lose cast members.” As the CSIs, Grey’s Anatomy and SVU have all experienced, “At some point there’s some cast turnover.””
“...move on Kahl echoed that at TCA saying We love both those actors and did not want to lose them...”
“In a Facebook post about his difficult choice not to continue Kim told fans The path to equality is rarely easy In response showrunner Peter M Lenkov said that H50 had been extremely generous and proactive in their renegotiation talks offering unprecedented raises but in the end they chose to...”
“Grace Park and Daniel Dae Kim parted ways with the show in late June, when their reported request for salary parity with series leads Alex O’Loughlin and Scott Caan were not met.”
“Speaking of diversity, Kahl was asked to revisit Hawaii Five-0‘s big shake-up.”
“Senior EVP Thom Sherman — also new to his post — reminded that a year ago there were “several female-led” pilots (that didn’t move forward), before adding: “I feel confident that we will be successful” in improving that representation.”
“CBS however once again did not greenlight any new shows fronted by a woman.”
“We are making progress,” he reiterated.”
““We are absolutely moving in the right direction.”
“...and midseason entries , diverse casting is up “almost 60 percent,” while inroads have been made in the writing and directing ranks as week.”


"We worked very, very hard to keep them," he said, "providing a lot of money." But the reality is that long-term TV shows, he says, "sometimes you lose actors." As crime scene investigators, Gray's anatomy, and SVU have all experienced, "at some point, the cast changes."
“…… Going forward, Carl responded on TCA, "we love these two actors and don't want to lose them..."
"In an article published on Facebook, Kim told fans that the road to equality was not easy. In response, host Peter M lenkov said that H50 was very generous and proactive in renegotiation, offering unprecedented pay increases, but in the end they chose..."
"Grace Parker and Daniel dekin parted ways with the show in late June, when their reported demands for equal pay with the lead stars Alex olaflin and Scott Kahn were not met."
"When it comes to diversity, Karl was asked to revisit Hawaii's 5-0 adjustment."
Senior executive vice president Tom Sherman, who is also new, cautioned that a year ago there were "several women led" pilots (who did not make progress), then added: "I am confident that we will succeed in" improving this representativeness. "
"However, once again, CBS has not given the green light to any new shows hosted by women."
"We are making progress," he reiterated
"We are moving in the right direction."
“…… In the middle of the season, the diverse cast grew "nearly 60%," and progress has been made in writing and directing. "



Number  63
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And I think just constantly share hope instead of encouraging any more fear."”
“"And to stand up for what's right.”
“"Never bow down to bullies, that's what my parents always said," she continued.”
“And I think that right now, we're supposed to be the land of the free, but we can't have freedom if we're constantly living in fear."”
“Or we're scared of losing someone that we love to go to a concert or to go see a film?”
“Cyrus explained why the lyrics of that song particularly resonate with her in the aftermath of this shooting:"When these tragic events happen, what is music if we can't go see our favorite artist perform because we're scared of violence?”
“Enjoy the show tonight & #MileyWeek .... hope we can make you smile even thru so much pain  @happyhippiefdnShe had also kicked off The Tonight Show by performing a cover of Dido’s “No Freedom” with Adam Sandler.”
“These words mean more now to me than ever ... " Keep The Faith" ..... Sending love to ALL!”
“So we started this week off with a song I haven't performed in years ... #TheClimb .”
“As she wrote on Instagram:"In honor of the lives lost , injured and affected by the tragic shooting in Vegas, @fallontonight & I dedicated this show to not only mourning this horrific event but using this platform to encourage unity , peace & hopefulness!”


"I think it's just about sharing hope, not encouraging more fear."
"Fight for justice."
"Never bow to bullies, that's what my parents used to say," she continued
"I think we should be free now, but if we live in fear all the time, we can't be free."
"Or are we afraid of losing someone we love to go to concerts or movies?"
Cyrus explains why the lyrics of the song resonate with her after the shooting: "when these tragedies happen, if we are afraid of violence and can't go to see our favorite artists, what is the music?"
"Enjoy tonight's show & every week.... I hope we can make you smile. Even after so much suffering, @ Happy hippiefdnshe performed the cover of Dido's no freedom with Adam Sandler
"These words are more important to me now than ever before..." Stick to faith "..... Send love to all
"So we start this week with a song I haven't sung in years... #"Amputation."
As she wrote on instagram, "to commemorate the lives lost, injured and affected in the Vegas massacre, @ fallontonight & I dedicates this program to you, not only to mourn this terrible event, but also to use this platform to encourage unity, peace and hope!"



Number  64
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...tell the truth A rep for Affleck declined to comment...”
“You lie A source told Page Six that while the Oscar winner isn t perfect he isn t a monster noting Any allusion that he s anywhere close to Harvey Weinstein is absurd and could be considered defamatory adding that it s frustrating that McGowan questioned Affleck s ability to...”
“The press conf I was made to go to after assault.”
“I TOLD HIM TO STOP DOING THAT’ you said that to my face.”
““@benaffleck ‘GODDAMNIT!”
““Ben Affleck f—k off,” McGowan, 44, tweeted after Affleck’s statement was released Tuesday.”
“...sexual misconduct previously...”
“Affleck who came under fire for his denouncement of alleged serial sexual harasser and rapist Harvey Weinstein tweeted Wednesday I acted inappropriately toward Ms Burton and I sincerely apologize Meanwhile actress Rose McGowan was suspended from Twitter for attacking Affleck for claiming he didn t know about Weinstein s alleged...”
“...on the network...”
“Comedy writer Jen Statsky corroborated Tendler s account tweeting I was also at this party and multiple friends had this same exact experience On Tuesday night Burton 35 tweeted that she didn t forget Affleck tweaking her left breast during an MTV taping in 2003 when she was a VJ”


“…… To be honest, a representative of Affleck declined to comment... "
"You lie, a source told page 6 that although the Oscar winner is not perfect, he is not a monster. Any suggestion that he is closely related to Harvey Weinstein is absurd and may be considered defamatory. He also said that McGovern's ability to question Affleck is frustrating..."
"The press conference I'm going to go to after the attack."
"I told him not to do that again, you said it to his face."
"@ benaffleck 'damn it!"
"Ben Affleck F-K is gone," McGovern, 44, tweeted Tuesday after Affleck's statement
“… Previous sexual misconduct... "
"Mr. Affleck, who has come under attack for denouncing Harvey Weinstein, the so-called serial sexual harasser and rapist, tweeted on Wednesday: 'I sincerely apologize for what I did to Ms. Burton, while actress rose McGovern McGowan) was suspended from twitter for attacking Affleck, claiming he didn't know Weinstein's charges... "
“… On the Internet... "
"Comedy writer Jen Statsky confirmed what tedler said on twitter, and I was at the party, and many friends had the same experience on Tuesday night. Burton 35 tweeted that she didn't forget that afflake twisted her left chest when she was recording on MTV in 2003 when she was VJ."



Number  65
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The show co-stars Jayne, Lisa Vanderpump, Kyle Richards, Dorit Kemsley and Teddi Mellencamp Arroyave.”
“A post shared by Lisa Rinna (@lisarinna) on Jan 23, 2018 at 9:02pm PSTRinna joined The Real Housewives of Beverly Hills in Season 4, and was made a series regular in Season 5.”
“The 54-year-old Real Housewives of Beverly Hills star debuted new, longer locks Tuesday after 19 years with a shag.”
“AdvertisementRinna said in an interview with People that she entrusted hairstylist Julius Michael with her transformation.”
“Michael has also worked with Real Housewives stars Danielle Staub, Tamra Judge and Peggy Sulahian.”
“"The last time I grew my hair out was when I had [daughter] Delilah Belle.”
“So, 19 years ago!"”
“Rinna told the magazine.”
“"It was time, what the hell!"”
“"I think spending the last two years with Erika Jayne has rubbed off on me," she added, referencing her co-star.”


The play is co starred by Jan, Lisa vandepham, Kyle Richards, dorit Kemsley and teddy merenkamp aroyav
"An article Lisa rinna (@ lisarinna) shared at pstrinna on January 23, 2018 at 9:02 p.m. added" Real Housewives at Beverly Hills "in the fourth quarter and became a regular series in the fifth quarter."
"The 54 year old Beverly Hills star's real housewife unveiled a new longer lock on Tuesday for the first time after 19 years of romance."
"In an interview with people magazine, advertising Rina said she commissioned hairstylist Julius Michael to take charge of her transformation."
Michael has also worked with Real Housewives stars Danielle stubb, Tamra gage and Peggy sulashin
"The last time I grew my hair was when I had [daughter] Delilah bell."
"So, 19 years ago!"
"Lina told the magazine."
"It's time, damn it!"
"I think the last two years with Erica Jayne have had an impact on me," she added, referring to her partner



Number  66
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...prevnext...”
“...prevnextThe Perfect Comeback (Photo: Facebook/Legally Blonde) We all hated Vivian Kensington after she tried to bully Elle by finally inviting her to a college party, only to lie to her and saying it was a costume party.”
“Reese Witherspoon has had many memorable roles in her career, but none compare to the iconic, fierce and incredibly groundbreaking Harvard student, who broke stereotypes and won a huge tour cast in her first year of law school.”
“In honor of the official production of next chapter in the Legally Blonde franchise, we rounded up some of the best lines from queen Elle Woods' through the years.”
“Scroll through to read some of the 2001 film's most memorable quotes.”
“Getting into Harvard (Photo: Facebook/Legally Blonde) After getting broken up with by boyfriend Warner, Elle applied to the prestigious law school and worked hard to prove she was just as smart despite her blonde locks.”
“After he is surprised to see her on campus, she serves the best response to him refusing to believe she got accepted.”
“"What, like it's hard?"”
“...prevnextStarting a movement (Photo: Facebook/Legally Blonde) We will never forget when Elle taught Paulette about the "Bend and Snap," which people are still quoting, and practicing in their regular lives so many years later... thankfully with not too many broken noses.”
“...prevnextFashion statements (Photo: Facebook/Legally Blonde) "Whoever said orange is the new pink was seriously disturbed."”


“… Last... "
“… We all hate Vivian Kensington because she tried to bully Al and finally invited her to a college party, only to lie to her and say it was a masquerade party. "
"Reese Witherspoon has played many unforgettable roles in her career, but none of them can be compared with this iconic, fierce and pioneering Harvard student who broke the rules and won a grand tour in her first year of law school."
"To commemorate the official production of the next chapter in the legal blonde series, we collected some of the best lines from Queen al woods over the years."
"Scroll through some of the most memorable quotes from the 2001 movies."
"After breaking up with her boyfriend Warner and entering Harvard University (photo: Facebook / legal blonde), Elle applied to the famous law school and tried to prove that she was just as smart despite her blonde hair."
"When he was surprised to see her on campus, she gave him the best response, refusing to believe that he was accepted."
"What, it seems difficult?"
“… We'll never forget that when Elle taught Paulette to "bend and break," people were still quoting, practicing in their daily lives after so many years... Thank goodness, there aren't too many broken nose bridges. "
“… Prevnextfashion statement (photo: Facebook / Legally Blonde) "Whoever says orange is the new pink is seriously disturbed."



Number  67
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Congrats to you and Jada on your milestone day!”
“He’s just getting started.”
“On Sunday, he was a little bit sweet and a little bit philosophical.”
“The “Bright” star, 49, celebrated his 20th wedding anniversary to wife Jada Pinkett Smith by posting a wonderful throwback photo from their big day back in 1997.”
“He also shared what he’s learned since they tied the knot.”
“Turns out, he’s learned a lot.”
““20 Years Ago Today we held hands and walked naively down that aisle.”
“Here’s what I’ve learned since,” he began.”
““Love is Like Gardening...”
“I have learned to focus on HELPING you to BLOSSOM into what YOU want to be (into what you were born to be)... Rather than Demanding that you become what my Fragile Ego needs you to be.”Impressed?”


"Congratulations to you and Jada on your landmark day
"He's just starting."
"On Sunday, he was a little sweet, a little philosophical."
To celebrate the 20th anniversary of his marriage to his wife Jada pinkert Smith, the 49 year old star posted a wonderful retrospective photo of their big day in 1997
"He also shared what they learned when they got married."
"Originally, he learned a lot."
"Today, 20 years ago, we walked in that aisle hand in hand."
"That's what I learned from it," he began
"Love is like gardening..."
"I've learned to focus on helping you grow to be what you want to be (that's what you were born to be)."... Instead of asking you to be what my fragile self needs? "



Number  68
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Share it in the comments below.”
“...the story...”
“It might have been fun for us but not for the team behind the hit HBO series.In order to prevent something like this happening again, the Emmy Award-winning show has taken extreme measures this year.”
“Code names, secret sets, disappearing scripts — Game of Thrones has gone to great lengths to keep secrets for its upcoming final season.According to E Online!”
“, rumour had it that multiple endings were being shot to throw off spoiler spies, but starlet Maisie Williams denied anything remotely close to happening on her appearance on the Jimmy Kimmel Live show.”
“"Well, I heard this, and I immediately thought, ‘I don't think we've got the budget to shoot lots of different endings'," Williams said.However, Williams' co-star and onscreen sibling, Sophie Turner revealed what actually happened to keep the secrets of season eight.”
“Turner confirmed the reports of self-destructing scripts (they wouldn't blow up, this isn't a movie), but said "it's all true.”
“""I mean, we wouldn't get anything physical.”
“We would have it on an app.”
“We would get sent sides for the scenes we were shooting the next day.”


"Please share in the comments below."
“… The story... "
"It may be fun for us, but it's not a series for the team behind the hit HBO. In to prevent similar things from happening again, the Emmy winning show took extreme measures this year."
"Code, secret, lost script - game of Thrones spared no effort to keep secrets for the upcoming finals. According to go to e online
"It's rumored that multiple endings were shot to get rid of the spoiler spies, but actress Messi Williams denied any remote access occurred in her appearance on the Jimmy Kimmel live show."
"Well, when I heard that, I immediately thought," I don't think we have enough budget to shoot a lot of different endings. " But he said Williams' partner and screen brother, Sophie Turner, revealed the secrets of the eighth season
Turner confirmed reports of self destructing scripts (they won't explode, it's not a movie), but he said "it's all true."
"I mean, we don't get anything tangible."
"We'll put it on the app."
"The scenes we shot the next day will be sent to the other side."



Number  69
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I don’t think I’ll ever really forget my experiences in Paris — the good or the bad — and I think that’s okay,” Kim said in an on-camera interview.”
“I didn’t really have a lot of anxiety.”The reality star even believed she could go back for a longer visit.”
“I hope that this trip will just be so good that I can start to remember all the magical things about Paris and why Kanye and I fell in love with it In the car after landing in Paris where West was fascinated with the number of bike shops he...”
““I have so many special memories in Paris,” the KKW Beauty guru said.”
““But it’s a good putting your toe in the water.”RELATED VIDEO: Kim Kardashian Says She Was High on Ecstasy During First Wedding — and When She Made a Sex TapeKim expressed hope that the quick visit would help bring back a positive view of Paris.”
““You’re a really good friend to go back to a place where you’re not the most comfortable,” she told Kim.”
“But I guess you never know what could happen.”Khloé, 34, agreed, “It’s time.”Momager Kris Jenner also encouraged her daughter to head to France.”
““You know, I’m going really cautiously, and I think going for such a short period of time def helps me mentally.”
““I definitely want to be there to support Kanye and Virgil but the last time I was there obviously [was] like a horrific experience for me,” Kim said in an on-camera interview.”
“When the mother of three consulted her sisters Khloé and Kourtney offered support of her one day trip to Paris...”


"I don't think I'll really forget my experience in Paris - good or bad - I don't think it matters," king said in an interview
"I really don't have much anxiety." The reality star even thought she could go back for a longer visit
"I hope this trip will be so wonderful that I can start to recall all the magical things in Paris and why Kanye and I fell in love with it in the car after landing in Paris. West is fascinated by the number of bike shops he owns..."
"I have a lot of special memories in Paris," said the kkw beauty guru
Related video: Kim Kardashian said she was ecstatic at her first wedding. When she made a sex video, Kim Kardashian said she hoped the quick visit would give people a positive view of Paris
"You're such a good friend, going back to a place where you're not the most comfortable," she told Kim
"But I don't think you ever know what's going to happen." Khlo é, 34, agreed, "it's time." Mother Kris Jenner also encouraged her daughter to go to France
"You know, I'm really cautious. I think such a short period of time is good for my spirit."
"Of course I want to go there to support Kanye and Virgil, but the last time I went there was obviously a terrible experience for me," king said in an interview
"When the mother of three asked her sister for advice, khlo é and Kourtney expressed their support for her one-day trip to Paris..."



Number  70
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I just feel happier, more positive, energized, and disciplined if I work out.””
“Sweating is how I change my oil every day.”
“During an interview with the Associated Press in Las Vegas March 30, the Sons of Anarchy actor recounted his hasty 1999 wedding to actress Katharine Towne, who he had met at a Dawson’s Creek audition.”
“Listen to what he said in the video above!”
““First time I was ever in Vegas I got married, which didn’t turn out that well,” Hunnam, 37, said.”
““I had known the girl for three weeks.”
“We had fallen madly in love and it was the first time I had ever been in love.”The pair decided to elope before Hunnam, then 18, had to head back home to England.”
““We thought, ‘What if we never see each other again?”
“Let’s get married and then we’ll have to see each other again even if it’s just to get divorced,’” he recalled.”
““So we came to Vegas, but I couldn’t even get a drink so I actually didn’t think I would be able to get married.”But anything goes in Sin City.”


"If I exercise, I will feel happier, more active, more energetic and more disciplined."
"Sweating is my way of changing oil every day."
"In an interview with the associated press in Las Vegas on March 30, the anarchist actor's son described his hasty wedding to actress Katharine town in 1999, whom he met in the Dawson's Creek audition."
"Listen to what he said in the video above!"
"I got married in Vegas for the first time and it didn't turn out that well," said Hennan, 37
"I've known that girl for three weeks."
"We fell madly in love. This is the first time I've ever fallen in love." The two decided to elope before Hennan, then 18, returned to the UK
"We thought, what if we never see each other again?"
"Let's get married, even if it's just for divorce, we'll have to meet again," he recalled
"So we came to Vegas, but I couldn't drink a drink, so I didn't really think I could get married." But sin city has everything



Number  71
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  72
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Not only has she fronted campaigns for the likes of Miu Miu and Calvin Klein, nabbed her first Vogue cover, and even appeared alongside Scarlett Johansson in Ghost In The Shell, she’s inspired young women with her willingnesss to discuss mental health.”
“Hugo Boss Woman of the Year: Adwoa AboahPresented by Poppy Delevingne© Mariano VivancoOur next winner is less Woman Of The Year and more Woman Of A Generation.”
“This is a designer who, through her half-British, half-Jamaican upbringing, has translated London’s wonderful cultural melting pot into fashion.”
“Riccardo Tisci and JW Anderson which says it all...”
“Breakthrough Designer of the Year Grace Wales Bonner Presented by Jaden Smith Piczo Not only did our next winner receive one of the most prestigious awards a young designer can receive the 2016 LVMH Prize she was assessed by one the most formidable judging panels featuring Karl Lagerfeld Marc Jacobs...”
“Now, he has yet another.”
“But it wasn’t just the result – it was the manner of the win, setting a new Premier League record for most wins in a single season and becoming the first man in history to win three Manager Of The Month awards in a row.”
“Not only did our winner take the Premier League title at the first time of asking – something not done since José Mourinho first took over at Chelsea over a decade before.”
“Special Achievement of the Year: Antonio ContePresented by Gordon Ramsey© Claudio PorcarelliThere could only be one contender.”
“He’s known as the “bad boy of ballet”, but he looks pretty good to us.”


"She not only spoke for Miu Miu and Calvin Klein, but also got her first vogue cover. She even starred in" the ghost in the shell "with Scarlett Johnson. She also inspired young women to discuss mental health issues with her own will."
"Boss Hugo's woman of the year award: presented by poppy delevingne, adwoa aboah ■ Mariano vivancoour, the next winner is a little less woman of the year and a generation more women."
"This is a designer who, through her growth experience of half Britain and half Jamaica, has transformed London's wonderful cultural melting pot into fashion."
"Both Riccardo tisci and JW Anderson said
"Grace Wales Bonner, the breakthrough designer of the year presented by Jaden Smith piczo, not only won one of the most prestigious awards for our next winner, but also won the 2016 LVMH Award for a young designer who was named by the most awe inspiring jury of Karl Lagerfeld and Marc Jacobs..."
"Now, he has another one."
"But it's not just the result - it's the way to win, set a new record for the most wins in a single season in the Premier League and become the first person in history to win the coach of the Month award three times in a row."
"Our winners don't just win the Premier League for the first time - it's something that has never happened since Jose Jose took over Chelsea for the first time ten years ago
"Special achievement of the year: Antonio container introduced by Gordon Ramsey ■ Claudio porcarelli has only one competitor."
"He's known as the bad boy of ballet, but he's very good to us."



Number  73
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Barzee watched without compassion as Elizabeth was raped and degraded.”
“...other than a willing co conspirator to her husband...”
“'I woke up with...a dark man standing over me.”
“Once he told her they were to be ‘naked as Adam and Eve in the garden,' and forced her to watch as he performed ‘anatomy lessons’ on Barzee.”
“He presented himself as a ‘prophet’ and espoused twisted biblical notions.”
“After that Mitchell raped her daily, often many times over.”
“'I was broken beyond repair.'”
“And then when he was finished he stood up and I was left alone feeling absolutely broken, absolutely shattered.”
“Speaking to Meredith Vieira on NBC she recalled: 'I remember him forcing me onto the ground (and) fighting the whole way.”
“At just 14 Elizabeth was ‘a little girl really,’ who, stripped of the red pyjamas, had her innocence taken in the most brutal way.”


"Basse watched Elizabeth raped and depraved without pity."
“… Except for her husband's accomplice
"When I woke up A nigger is standing on me
"Once he told her that they were going to be" naked like Adam and Eve in the garden "and forced her to watch his" anatomy class "in Barcelona
"He calls himself a prophet and believes in distorted biblical ideas."
"Since then, Mitchell raped her every day, and often many times."
"I can't fix it anymore."
"When he finished, he stood up. I was alone. I felt completely broken, completely broken."
"I remember him pushing me to the ground and fighting all the way," she told Meredith Vieira on NBC television
"Elizabeth is only 14 years old. She is really a little girl. She takes off her red pajamas and accepts her innocence in the most cruel way."



Number  74
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“#PMOY 94 ❤️ pic.twitter.com/sF9ARYgEpw — Jenny McCarthy (@JennyMcCarthy) September 28, 2017As of press time, Hefner's wife, Crystal Hefner, has yet to make a statement about her husband's death.”
“I hope I made you proud.”
“But one area in Hef's wheelhouse that's often overlooked is the mark he left on reality television, specifically, the E!”
“...series "The Girls Next Door."”
“The TV series originally aired from 2005 until 2010, and was co-created by the Playboy founder.”
“The first five seasons starred Hef's three main girlfriends, Holly Madison, Kendra Wilkinson, and Bridget Marquardt, while the sixth and final season focused on Hef's new girlfriends, twins Kristina and Karissa Shannon, and a then-23-year-old Crystal Harris, who would eventually become his third wife.”
“WireImage Holly Madison, Hugh Hefner, Bridget Marquardt and Kendra Wilkinson.”
“(Denise Truscello/WireImage)On Thursday, both Wilkinson and Marquardt posted reactions to their ex-boyfriend's death.”
“Via Twitter, Marquardt posted a picture of her and Hef in better times, writing, "So sad but forever grateful for all the wonderful memories and amazing experiences #RIPHef #Playboy ."”
“So sad but forever grateful for all the wonderful memories and amazing experiences #RIPHef#Playboy  pic.twitter.com/RkHje7h0Un — Bridget Marquardt (@Bridget) September 28, 2017In a statement, Wilkinson said: "Hef changed my life.”


"# item 94 ❤️  pic.twitter.com/sF9ARYgEpw -Jenny McCarthy (@ Jenny McCarthy) on September 28, 2017, as of the time of press release, herfner's wife, Christo herfner, had not made a statement on her husband's death. "
"I hope I make you proud."
"But one area that is often overlooked in Hoff's cab is his mark on reality TV, especially E!"
“… "The girl next door."
"This TV series was originally broadcast from 2005 to 2010 and co created by the founder of playboy."
"The first five seasons feature three of herf's main girlfriends, Holly Madison, Kendra Wilkinson and Bridget Marquardt, while the sixth and final season focuses on herf's new girlfriends, twins Christina and calissa Shannon, and then 23-year-old Kristo Harris, who will eventually become his third wife."
"Holly Madison, Hugh Hefner, Bridget Marquardt and Kendra Wilkinson."
(Dennis trucello / WireImage) on Thursday, Wilkinson and Marquardt both released their reactions to the death of their ex boyfriend
"Through Twitter, Marquardt posted a picture of her and HEF in a wonderful time, writing," very sad, but always grateful for all the wonderful memories and wonderful experiences ţ riphof ţ playboy. "
"So sad, but always grateful for all the wonderful memories and wonderful experiences pic.twitter.com/RkHje7h0Un -Bridget Marquardt (@ Bridget) on September 28, 2017, Wilkinson said in a statement: "huff has changed my life."



Number  75
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  76
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  77
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[/embed][embed]Just a suggestion, Kylie... Maybe your next makeup venture should be all about the brow?”
“Now, we'll leave you with some pics so you can spend some time admiring her makeup.”
“So while her method does include a lot of steps, her brows are legit.”
“Yup, definitely trying that one out!”
“Where it hits on your temple is where your brow should end.”
“He said to take the spoolie pencil and place it from the tip of your nose to your temple.”
“While we love an Anastasia eyebrow pencil with all of our hearts, the one thing that truly stood out was the MUA's tip for figuring out how long your brow needs to be.”
“Next, using light, feather-like strokes, he fills them in with a pencil (for Kylie, he uses Anastasia Beverly Hills in Medium Brown) and then applies foundation at the bridge to define them.”
“Then, using a spoolie, he combs Kylie's brows in an upward position.”
“In a video posted on her app, Tejada says that they first like to tint eyebrows for a more defined look.”


"[/ embed] [embed] just a suggestion, Kelly... Maybe your next makeup project should be eyebrows? "
"Now, we'll leave you a few photos for you to spend some time appreciating her make-up."
"So, although her method does involve many steps, her eyebrows are legal."
"Yes, you must try that!"
"Where it hits your temple is the end of your eyebrow."
"He said to put the spool pen from the tip of the nose to the temple."
"Although we love Anastasia eyebrow pencil with all our heart, what really stands out is MUA's tips, which let us know how long your eyebrows will take."
Next, fill them in with light feathered strokes and pencils (Kylie, who uses Anastasia Beverly Hills medium brown), then apply foundations to define them on the bridge.
"Then he used a spool to brush Kelly's eyebrows up."
In a video posted on its app, Tejada said they first like to dye their eyebrows in clearer colors



Number  78
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“In a statement announcing the cancellation of her sitcom, ABC Entertainment president Channing Dungey said, “Roseanne’s Twitter statement is abhorrent, repugnant and inconsistent with our values.””
“As you say, those ordinary examples of racism that happen every single day.”Barr, who has since apologized to Jarrett on Twitter, is facing intense backlash for her comments.”
“The person who is walking down the street minding their own business and they see somebody cling to their purse, or run across the street, or every black parent I know who has a boy who has to sit down and have a conversation – the talk – as we call it.”
“I’m worried about all the people out there who don’t have a circle of friends and followers who come right to their defense.”
““I’m fine.”
“Jarrett said on MSNBC she is “fine” but feels concerned for people without “friends and followers who come right to their defense” who experience “ordinary examples of racism that happen every single day.”“I think we have to turn it into a teaching moment,” Jarrett said.”
“ABC announced it was canceling “Roseanne” in the aftermath of the Twitter outburst.”
“...one tweet Barr wrote Muslim brotherhood planet of the apes had a baby vj in reference to Jarrett...”
“Photo by Alberto E Rodriguez Getty Images CNN Valerie Jarrett a former top aide to President Barack Obama reacted to actress Roseanne Barr s racist Twitter rant that led to the cancellation of the television sitcom Roseanne on Tuesday by saying that the incident should become a teaching moment In...”
“(Photo by NICHOLAS KAMM / AFP) (Photo credit should read NICHOLAS KAMM/AFP/Getty Images)BEVERLY HILLS, CA - MARCH 10: Actress Roseanne Barr attends The Paley Center For Media's 2014 PaleyFest Icon Award announcement at The Paley Center for Media on March 10, 2014 in Beverly Hills, California.”


"Rosanna's statement on Twitter is disgusting, offensive and inconsistent with our values," Channing Dungey, President of ABC entertainment, said in a statement announcing the cancellation of her sitcom
"As you said, there are common examples of racial discrimination that happen every day." Barr apologized to jarette on twitter, and her comments are facing a strong backlash
"A person who wanders in the street, mind his own business, and they see someone clutching his wallet, or running across the street, or every black parent I know, he has a boy who has to sit down and talk, which we call conversation."
"I'm worried that people who don't have a circle of friends or followers will defend them directly."
"I'm fine."
Jarrett said on MSNBC that she was "fine," but she was concerned about those who did not have "friends and followers who defend themselves directly" because they experienced "ordinary examples of racism that happen every day." "I think we have to turn it into a teaching moment," Jarrett said
"ABC announced that after the outbreak of the twitter incident," rosani "will be cancelled."
“…… Barr tweeted that there is a baby VJ on the ape planet of the Muslim Brotherhood, which refers to Jaret... "
Valerie Jarrett, a senior aide to former President Barack Obama on CNN, responded to the racist comments made by actress Roseanne Barr on twitter, saying the incident should become The comments led to the cancellation of the TV sitcom "Roseanne" on Tuesday
(Photo by Nicholas Kamm / AFP) (photo source should be Nicholas Kamm / AFP / Getty Images) Beverly Hills, California - March 10, 2014: actress Roseanne Barr attended the announcement of the 2014 best idol award by the Beverly Hills, California media center on March 10, 2014



Number  79
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Just last week stock for GameStop soared after a group of people on Reddit were able to get the stock price for it to rise significantly and cause a hedge fund worth billions of dollars to go ban Read more Peloton s Cody Rigsby Explains Recent Absence Reveals He s...”
“The 24-year-old social star revealed on the latest episode of his podcast that he invested about $50,000 in GameStop stocks.”
““Yellowfin were chewing today #200# @hook360 @lossuenosresort,” Connor wrote along with the photo.”
“The 26-year-old son of Tom Cruise and Nicole Kidman recently took to his Instagram to share a rare photo of himself holding up a huge fish he caught while fishing in Costa Rica.”
“...life...”
“Someone who s a very established actor and director in this industry gave me really terrible advice that was helpful because I just Read more Tom Cruise Nicole Kidman s Son Connor Posts Rare Photo of Himself on Instagram Connor Kidman Cruise is giving a rare glimpse into his personal...”
“Now, the 36-year-old actress and director is explaining the policy and opening up about what inspired her to institute it on her movie sets.”
“...no a holes policy that he violated...”
“A few hours earlier Hailey headed Read more Olivia Wilde Explains the No A holes Policy She Instituted on Her Movie Sets You might remember that Olivia Wilde fired Shia LaBeouf from her movie Don t Worry Darling last year and at the time several reports said she has a...”
“Hailey also stayed safe in a black face mask as she arrived at the restaurant.”


"Just last week, a group of people found out on reddit that Gamestop's share price had soared, leading to the ban of a multi billion dollar hedge fund. Read more, peloton's Cody Rigsby explains that his recent absence shows him
"The 24-year-old social star revealed in the latest podcast that he has invested about $50000 in Gamestop stock."
"Today, yellowfin tuna chews 200 hooks at the losunoso resort," Connor wrote in the photo
"Tom Cruise and Nicole Kidman's 26 year old son recently shared a rare picture on instagram of him holding a big fish he caught while fishing in Costa Rica."
“… Life... "
"A very famous actor and director in this industry gave me very bad advice, which helped me a lot, because I just read more about Tom Cruise's son, Connor, who posted his own rare photos on instagram. Connor Kidman cruise rarely saw him..."
"Now, the 36 year old actress and director is explaining the policy and revealing to the outside world what prompted her to adopt it in her film set."
“… There was no policy he violated... "
"A few hours ago, Haley Hyde read more and Olivia Wilde explained her ban policy on the set. As you may remember, Olivia Wilde fired Shiite rabov from the movie "don't worry, honey" last year, when there were several reports that she had a... "
"When Haley arrived at the restaurant, she was wearing a black mask and was safe."



Number  80
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Spoiler: Martha Stewart went in green sparkly pants.”
“Take a look at the hottest styles of the night below!”
“From bright red and blue hues to intricate beaded embellishments these garbs were made to shine.”
“While the gala was attended by many, these ladies definitely brought their style a-game to the event.”
“This year’s list featured many recognizable names such as Nicole Kidman, Jennifer Lopez, Lena Waithe and more.”
“That ranges from artists to activists to leaders to scientists and entrepreneurs.”
“The gala, which was held at Lincoln Center in New York City, celebrates the 100 most influential people in the world every year according to the editors.”
“Millie Bobby Brown, Jennifer Lopez, Emily Blunt and more celebs walked the red carpet on April 24 for the event honoring the magazine’s annual issue.”
“The Time 100’s red carpet style was on point this year!”


"Troublemaker: Martha Stewart is wearing green, shiny pants."
"Take a look at the most popular style of the night below!"
"From bright red and blue to complicated beading, these clothes are all for sparkle."
"Although there were a lot of people at the party, these women definitely brought their own style to the event."
There are many famous names on this year's list, such as Nicole Kidman, Jennifer Lopez, Lina Weiser and so on
"It ranges from artists to activists, from leaders to scientists and entrepreneurs."
According to the editor, the party is held at Lincoln Center in New York City, celebrating the 100 most influential people in the world every year
On April 24, Millie Bob Brown, Jennifer Lopez, Emily Bronte and more celebrities stepped onto the red carpet to take part in the commemoration of the magazine's annual
"The red carpet style of era 100 is the focus of this year!"



Number  81
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Selena is an adult and can make her own choices.””
“I do not control her the way it has been portrayed,” Teefey said.”
““She is 25 years old and knows what is at stake with her health.”
“Bieber could affect the singer s well being Teefey said that while she has her opinions she realizes her daughter has to make her own choices in life...”
“It was no longer fun for any of us like it was when she was younger and we had to be with her because she was a minor READ MORE Justin Bieber celebrated New Year s Eve in Cabo with Selena Gomez Discussing concerns that Gomez s renewed romance with...”
“We lost family time because the only time we saw her, we talked business.”
““We never expected to manage her, her whole life.”
““Every mother and daughter has disagreements,” Teefey admitted.”
“Story continues below advertisementTeefey also denied that a rift formed between her and Gomez when she and her husband stopped managing their daughter’s career.”
“...is beyond blessed that we had Francia in our life and remarking that she s so proud of her daughter s bravery...”


"Selena is an adult and can make her own choice."
"I can't control her as people portray her," Tiffany said
"She's 25 years old and knows what matters to her health."
"Bieber may affect the singer's health, Tiffany said. Although she has her own views, she realizes that her daughter has to make her own choices in life..."
"It's no longer as fun for any of us as she was when she was young, we have to be with her because she's a minor, and it's more about Justin Bieber and Serena Gomez celebrating New Year's Eve in Cabo, discussing Gomez and The fear of rekindling romance. "
"We lost family time because the only time we saw her was business."
"We never wanted to take care of her, for the rest of our lives."
"Every mother and daughter has a different opinion," Tiffany admits
"The story goes on. Tiffany also denied that when she and her husband stopped running their daughter's business, there was a rift between her and Gomez. "
“… It's so lucky that we have Francia in our life. She says she's proud of her daughter's bravery... "



Number  82
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Beyoncé!”
“Who run Coachella?”
“And if her performance at Coachella is anywhere as good as these photos, we can expect 2018 to be the best edition the festival has ever seen!”
“On Friday afternoon, the Single Ladies singer also shared a sneak peek at her rehearsals with her 12 million followers on Instagram.”
“Of course, diet is only one part of her prep work before heading to the desert of Indio, California.”
“It seems that Beyoncé is resorting to all the high powers, including the alimentary ones, ahead of her highly anticipated appearance in Coachella!”
““They walked away with a greater understanding of the powerful benefits of plant-based nutrition,” he said.”
“In 2013, Queen B and her husband Jay-Z undertook a strict vegan regime, which, according to their personal trainer Marco Borges, the powerful couple came to love.”
“This is not the first time that Bey adopts this nutritious lifestyle.”
“Vegan time!,” Beyoncé captioned an image of a not-so-simple avocado toast—as fancy an stylized as any other of the photos shared on the singer’s lavish Instagram.”


"Beyonce!"
"Who runs cochella?"
"If her performance in cochella is as good as these photos, we can expect 2018 to be the best year in the history of the festival!"
"On Friday afternoon, the single singer also shared her rehearsal experience with 12 million fans on instagram."
"Of course, dieting was just part of her preparation for the Indio desert in California."
"It seems that Beyonce is appealing to all powers, including digestion, in her long-awaited appearance in cochella!"
"They have a deeper understanding of the great benefits of plant nutrition," he said
"In 2013, Queen B and her husband, Jay-Z, were vegetarians, and according to their personal trainer, Marco Borges, the powerful couple began to fall in love."
"This is not the first time shellfish have adopted this nutritious lifestyle."
"Vegetarian time! "Beyonce painted the title of a not so simple avocado toast, which is as original as other photos shared by the singer on the luxurious instagram."



Number  83
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The trailer for “Once Upon a Time” Season 7 can be viewed above.”
“ET on ABC.”
““Once Upon a Time” premieres in a new timeslot, Friday, Oct. 6 at 8 p.m.”
“ABC still renewed the show for a 22-episode order despite the changes.”
“Series leads Lana Parrilla, Robert Carlyle, and Colin O’Donoghue remain in the cast.”
““Once Upon a Time” went through a major cast shakeup at the end of Season 6 when Jennifer Morison, Ginnifer Goodwin, Josh Dallas, Jared Gilmore, and Emilie de Ravin all exited.”
“The black-and-white flashback-laden trailer also introduces new cast members Gabrielle Anwar, Adelaide Kane, and Dania Ramirez, as well as other heroes and villains.”
“He is then thrust into the magical world of Storybrooke in a sort of a “reset” on the first six seasons.”
“West portrays an adult version of Henry, who himself finds out he has a daughter (Alison Fernandez) he didn’t know about — just how Emma originally met her son.”
“Andrew J.”


The trailer for "once upon a time" Season 7 can be seen on it
"Et on ABC."
"The past" will premiere at 8 p.m. on Friday, October 6
"Despite the changes, ABC continued the show for 22 episodes."
"The main characters of the series, Lana parrilla, Robert Carlisle and Colin o'donoho, are still on the set."
"The past" experienced a major lineup adjustment at the end of season 6, with Jennifer Morrison, Guinness Goodwin, Josh Dallas, Jared Gilmore and Emily delavin all dropping out
"The shiny black-and-white trailer also features new actors Gabriel Anwar, Adelaide Kane and Dania Ramirez, as well as other heroes and villains."
"Then, he was pushed into the magical world of stolybrook, like a" reset "in the first six seasons."
West plays an adult version of Henry. He discovers that he has a daughter (Alison Fernandez), but he doesn't know - it's just how Emma first met her son
"Andrew J."



Number  84
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“They reached a custody agreement in May 2017 with Barbara maintaining primary custody and Jenelle granted visitation rights.”
“...police responded to her call but no incident report was filed at the time...”
“David posted photos on Instagram on Monday of a family outing to a pumpkin patch that included Jenelle's estranged mother Barbara Evans.”
“He shared snaps of their 20-month-old daughter Ensley sitting on a haystack with pumpkins in the background.”
“Family outing: David Eason shared photos on Instagram with wife Jenelle Evans during a recent pumpkin patch trip following a recent alleged domestic violence incidentDavid, 30, also uploaded pictures featuring the whole family on Sunday on Instagram showing them checking out a selection of gourds.”
“Jenelle, 26 was seen in the foreground of a photo with Ensley and her son Kaiser behind her as well as her mother Barbara.”
“The family outing came a week after Jenelle hysterically dialed 911 for help after her drunken spouse allegedly assaulted her at their home as she recovered from recent nose surgery.”
“A leaked recording of her frantic 911 call revealed that Dave had allegedly pinned her to the ground until she heard her 'collarbone crack.'”
“Pumpkin patch The couple s daughter Ensley sat on a haystack during the family outing Big pumpkin Kaiser wrapped an arm around his sister Ensley as they hauled a giant pumpkin Good times Ensley beamed while hanging out with Kaiser on the pumpkin patch Jenelle was taken to hospital after...”
“A spokesperson for Jenelle downplayed the October 13 incident, insisting that she had tripped and fallen next to a bonfire while hosting friends at home.”


"They reached a guardianship agreement in May 2017, with Barbara maintaining primary custody and Janel granting visitation rights."
“…… The police responded to her phone call, but no incident report was submitted at that time... "
"David posted on instagram on Monday a photo of a family visiting pumpkin land, including Barbara Evans, jennell's separated mother."
"He shared a picture of their 20 month old daughter, ensley, sitting on a haystack with a pumpkin in the background."
"Family outing: on instagram, David Eason shared with his wife, Jenelle Evans, photos of a recent pumpkin field trip because of a so-called domestic violence. The 30-year-old David also uploaded photos of his family on instagram on Sunday, showing that they were picking gourds. "
"Jennell, 26, appears in the foreground of a picture with ensley and her son Caesar behind her, as well as her mother Barbara."
"A week ago, jennell recovered from a recent nose operation and hysterically called 911 for help after her drunken spouse was said to have attacked her at home."
"A leaked recording of her frantic 911 call shows that Dave was said to have pushed her to the ground until she heard" the clavicle is cracked. "
"Ensley, the daughter of the pumpkin land couple, is sitting on the haystack. During the family outing, Caesar puts an arm around his sister ensley and pulls a huge pumpkin. Ensley and Caesar happily stroll on the pumpkin ground. After jennell is sent to the hospital... "
"A jennell spokesman downplayed the October 13 incident, insisting she tripped over a campfire while receiving friends at home."



Number  85
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“While everything in and around Comic Con requires waiting in line this year it was actually worth it for those who ventured out to eat at Taco Bell s Demolition Man restaurant shop for supplies at the Purge City Emporium totally immerse themselves in the DC Universe s new streaming...”
“...up events...”
“Charles Pulliam Moore Doctor Who s Jodie Whittaker Had a Blast Doctor Who fans were already quivering with excitement that the show s Comic Con presence would give us our first ever glimpse of the next season and a chance to see the show s first female Doctor strut her...”
“Not only are Danny’s fights going to be slicker, more technically complicated, and gorgeous to watch, everyone who’s coming back this season is working on a higher level that’s going to make the next chapter of the Iron Fist saga something to legitimately get hyped about.”
“Fist s second season it became immediately clear that Jones got it together...”
“With the first season still clearly in everyone s minds the anticipation during the show s panel at this year s San Diego Comic Con wasn t exactly high but as Marvel s head of television Jeph Loeb gave the audience a look at a number of scenes from Iron...”
“...committed himself to learning his fight choreography...”
“Despite the fact that he s the titular hero of the series Danny Rand was one of the most disappointing parts of Iron Fist s first season for a number of different reasons one of the most egregious being that you could clearly tell actor Finn Jones really hadn t...”
“—James WhitbrookAdvertisementIron Fist Looks...Good?”
“Ahsoka Tano was right: It has been awhile, but it was worth the wait to get this incredible news.”


"Although everything inside and outside this year's comics conference needs to wait in line, it's worthwhile for those who venture to Taco Bell's demolition man restaurant to eat and buy things at the purge City Shopping Mall..."
“… Start event
"Dr. Charles priyam Moore, the super doctor of Judy Whittaker, has made fans tremble with excitement, because the cartoon of the show will let us see the next season for the first time, and also have a chance to see the first female doctor of the show showing off her..."
"Denny's fight will not only be smoother, more complicated technically, but also more gorgeous to watch. Everyone who returns this season is working hard at a higher level, which will make the next chapter of the legend of iron fist something worthy of proper hype."
"In fist's second season, it was clear that Jones was together..."
"The first season is still clearly visible in everyone's mind. This year's San Diego Comics Show is not expected to be high, but marvel TV director jeph Loeb let the audience see some scenes in steel..."
“… Devoted to learning his fight dance... "
"Although Denny Rand is one of the most disappointing characters in the first season of iron fist, one of the most shocking reasons is that you can tell actor Finn Jones clearly that he really didn't..."
"- James whitbrook advertisement iron fist looks like Good? "
"Ahsoka Tano is right: it's been a while, but it's worth waiting to get this incredible news."



Number  86
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“A source exclusively told Us Weekly in October that Davidson “was 1000 percent there” for the “No Tears Left to Cry” crooner, but a second insider noted that Miller’s passing “put a tremendous amount of strain” on the relationship.”
“Earlier this month, Davidson praised his ex as “a wonderful, strong person.”Grande and Davidson’s whirlwind romance hit a rough patch in September following her ex-boyfriend Mac Miller’s death.”
““Oh, welcome home.”Although Davidson hasn’t turned to social media to address his breakup from the “Thank U, Next” songstress, he’s been open with fans during recent episodes of SNL.”
“You guys look great,” he said in the clip.”
“How are you guys doing?”
““Hey, how are you?”
“...or on any social media platform.”However, the Set It Up star returned to Instagram two months later with a video of himself filming paparazzi.”
“Davidson previously deleted his page in July, telling fans via his Story that there wasn’t anything “cryptic” about his decision, he just didn’t “want to be on Instagram anymore.”
“The Saturday Night Live comedian made headlines in October for wiping his Instagram account clean days after he and Grande, 25, ended their four-month engagement, according to Daily Mail.”
““See you at sundance muthaf—kas,” Davidson 25, wrote alongside photos of himself with costars in his upcoming film, Big Time Adolescence.”


One source told us weekly exclusively in October that Davidson "has 1000% support" in the song "no tears to cry", but another person familiar with the matter pointed out that Miller's death "has brought great pressure on their relationship."
Earlier this month, Davidson praised his ex boyfriend as "a great, strong man.". Grand and Davidson's whirlwind love affair suffered in September after the death of former boyfriend Mike Miller
"Oh, welcome home." Although Davidson hasn't turned to social media to express his break-up with the "thank you, next" female singer, he has been open to fans in recent episodes of SNL
"You look great," he said in the clip
"How are you?"
"Hey, how are you?"
“…… Or on any social media platform. " Two months later, however, the self created star returned to instagram with his own paparazzi video
"Davidson previously deleted his website in July and told fans through his story that there was no" mystery "in his decision. He just" didn't want to be on instagram anymore. "
The comedian, who was broadcast live on Saturday night, made headlines in October after cleaning up his instagram account a few days after his four month engagement to 25-year-old grand, the Daily Mail reported
"I'll see you in Sundance mutavkas," Davidson, 25, wrote in his upcoming movie "adolescence in the big time," along with a photo of himself and the hero



Number  87
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ReplyParentThreadLink...”
“ReplyThreadLinkdefinitely.”
“He was good for a while but now i find him insufferable again.”
“ReplyParentThreadLinkHe has peaks & valleys for me.”
“...after his season ended he just started coming across as a huge douche.”
“...cant stand him anymore...”
“Reply Parent Thread Link yup Peter another good example of that lol Reply Parent Thread Expand Link yeah he s gotten pretty obnoxious Reply Parent Thread Link He s def bought into his own hype Reply Parent Thread Link i...”
“...even the ones like Wells that make you stop and think they may be different....they're NO different.”
“...there's no hope within that franchise.”
“Michelle Collins said he was talking trash about her when she was hosting the After Show 'cause he wanted to be the host and now I just think he's annoying and fame hungry.”


“ReplyParentThreadLink…”
"Be sure to reply."
"He used to be very good, but now I find him unbearable."
"He brought me peaks and troughs."
“…… At the end of the season, he began to be seen as a big fool
“… I can't stand him any more... "
"Reply to the parent thread link is another good example for Peter. Ha ha reply to the parent thread extension link. Yes, he got a very annoying reply to the parent thread link. He def bought his own hype to reply to the parent thread link. I..."
“…… Even wells that make you stop and think they might be different They're no different
“… There is no hope in that land. "
"Michelle Collins said that when she finished hosting the show, he was speaking ill of her because he wanted to be the host, and now I just find him annoying and eager to be famous."



Number  88
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...accusations earlier this year...”
“David continues His treatment of women is coming in for greater review as well including his unrelenting grilling of Hillary Clinton at a town hall in the lead up to the presidential elections and the tough stance he took toward Bill O Reilly about the former Fox star s own...”
“Lauer allegedly gave a female colleague a sex toy with an explicit note about how he wanted to use it on her.”
“The three women asked to remain anonymous for fear of professional repercussions.”
“The story is based on a two-month investigation during which the magazine conducted "dozens of interviews with current and former staffers," including three women whose accounts were corroborated by friends and colleagues who were told of the harassment at the time.”
“Variety reports that multiple women at NBC say they were sexually harassed by Lauer.”
“At the time that the one woman came forward with her complaint, NBC also knew that Variety and The New York Times were both "reporting on Lauer's behavior toward women," David reports.”
“"Lauer was the brightest network star there."”
“"NBC is the largest single player at the Olympics — it's the games' longtime American broadcaster and underwriter," David notes.”
“The woman, who has not been identified, said that she was sexually harassed by Lauer at the Olympics and that the harassment continued afterward.”


“…… The charges earlier this year... "
"David's continued attitude towards women will also be subject to greater scrutiny, including his relentless questioning of Hillary Clinton in the city hall before the presidential election, and his tough stance on bill o Reilly about the former Fox Star himself..."
"Raul is said to have given a female colleague a sex toy with a clear description of how he wants to use it on her."
"The three women asked for anonymity to avoid professional repercussions."
"This report is based on a two-month survey in which the magazine conducted" dozens of interviews "with current and former employees, including three women whose stories were confirmed by friends and colleagues when they were told they were harassed."
"According to the variety show report, several NBC women said they were sexually harassed by Raul."
"When a woman filed a complaint, NBC also knew that both variety and the new york times were reporting Raul's behavior toward women," David reported
"Raul is the most dazzling Internet star there."
"NBC is the largest single player in the Olympics, and it's the long-term ABC and underwriter of the Olympics," David said
"The unidentified woman said she was sexually harassed by Raul at the Olympics and the harassment has continued since."



Number  89
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Are you excited about “The Decision?”Scandal’s 100th episode airs April 13th at 9 PM ET on ABC.”
“In Scandal’s current storyline, we’re just trying to figure out if Huck is going to survive those bullet wounds that Abby ordered.”
“~spoiler alert!”
“...normal Scandal episodes To be honest we doubt Olivia and Fitz are together in this alternative universe Liv has always wanted the White House and without it we doubt Fitz has very much appeal to her...”
“...recently attended the PaleyFest conference and gave some small hints about what we can expect to see during The Decision which apparently has a very season one vibe Tony Goldwyn who plays Fitz said It also informs your understanding of all of us now when we get back to our...”
“The official episode summary states With the ugly truth behind Frankie s assassination revealed a torn Olivia Kerry Washington wonders how different her life and the country would be if she Mellie Bellamy Young and Cyrus Jeff Perry had never rigged Fitz s Tony Goldwyn election The cast of Scandal...”
“It seems implausible to consider now, so many years down the line, but this is a Shonda Rhimes show, so she’s going for it.”
“What if the election was never rigged, and Fitz never became the President of the United States?!”
“However, what if that never happened?”
“We all know that Olivia Pope, with the help of Fitz’s then-wife Mellie Grant and Fitz’s campaign manager, turned White House Chief Of Staff, Cyrus Beene fixed the election so that Fitz could take the Presidency.”


Are you excited about the decision? Scandal episode 100 will be broadcast on ABC at 9 p.m. EST on April 13
"In the current story of the scandal, we just want to find out if Huck can survive the gunshot wounds that Abby ordered."
"~ spoiler alert!"
“…… Normal scandal episode to be honest, we suspect Olivia and Fitz are together in this different world. Liv always wants the White House. Without it, we suspect Fitz has great attraction for her... "
“… Recently attended the Paleyfest conference and gave some tips on what we can expect to see in the decision process, which is obviously a very first season atmosphere for Tony Goldwin who played Fitz said, which also informs your understanding of all of us now when we go back to our... "
"The official interlude summary says that the ugly truth behind Frankie's assassination reveals an actor scandal that tore Olivia Kerry Washington apart and wondered how different her life and country would be if Melly bellamyan and Cyrus Jeffrey Perry had never manipulated Fitz's Tony Goldwin election..."
"It doesn't seem credible to think about it for so many years now, but it's a show for seanda Reims, so she'll go."
"What if the election has never been manipulated and Fitz has never been president of the United States?"
"But what if it never happened?"
"We all know that Olivia Pope became White House chief of staff with the help of Fitz's then wife, Melly grant, and Fitz's campaign manager, and Cyrus bean arranged the election so that Fitz could be president."



Number  90
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I think the coolest thing about it was that we got to see our artwork on Apple Music."”
“It's out!'”
“"So we saw some fan posts and were like, 'Yo!”
“But we forgot it comes out earlier in California," the guys told Fuse.”
“"We were caught off guard a little bit because we were waiting until midnight.”
“But prior to the release of "Teacher," PRETTYMUCH was celebrating the success of their first single "Would You Mind."”
“The five members (Brandon Arreaga, Edwin Honoret, Zion Kuwonu, Nick Mara and Austin Porter) all hail from different areas of the U.S. and Canada, but together have created a unifying—and very catchy—sound.”
“We're proud to name the rising boy band our newest Fuse First artist for November.”
“After listening to PRETTYMUCH's new single "Teacher" once, you know it's going to be a hit!”


"I think the coolest thing is that we saw the art of Apple music."
"Out!"
"So when we saw some fan posts, we said 'yo
"But we forgot that it appeared earlier in California," these people told fuse
"We were a bit caught off guard because we waited until midnight."
But before the release of teacher, prettymuch was celebrating the success of their first single, do you mind
"These five members (Brandon arega, Edwin honoret, Zion coovonu, Nick Mara and Austin Porter) are all from different parts of the United States and Canada, but together they create a unified and very attractive voice."
"We are proud to name rising boys as our latest fuse first artist in November."
Listen to prestimuk's new single "teacher" once, you know this song will be very popular



Number  91
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“PEOPLE in response Chyna s attorney said We are confident that we will prevail on this motion and at trial...”
“According to court documents filed Dec 27 in the Superior Court of Los Angeles and obtained by The Blast Rob generally and specifically denies each of the allegations and claimed Chyna did not suffer any injury or harm as a result of any conduct by Kardashian In a statement to...”
“In a preview of Sunday s episode sisters Kim and Khloé Kardashian sit down to discuss their brother s bitter legal battle with his ex fiancée which began after he posted graphic and expletive ridden content about her on social media in July including three naked photos while accusing her...”
“...of drug use alcohol abuse and infidelity...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Did you see how I just went off on Rob in our group text?” says Kim, 37.”
““I couldn’t take it.”Khloé, 33, points out that there’s a “plus and a minus” to the situation — with the plus side being that there’s “no way” Rob, 30, and Chyna, 29, could “get back together after this.”“Let’s focus on the positive,” Khloé says.”
““The negative is all of this other s— right now.”“The negative is just that like, with Rob having sisters, he should just know better,” Kim says.”
““He should have just like, controlled himself.”But Khloé is still in Rob’s corner.”
““It just sucks,” she tells Kim.”


"In response to ziner's lawyer, we are confident that we will win the motion and the trial..."
"According to the court documents submitted to the Los Angeles High Court on December 27 and obtained by the bombing investigation team, rob generally and explicitly denied every charge and claimed that chener had not suffered any injury or injury due to any act of Kardashian in a statement..."
"In the preview of Sunday episode, the Kim sisters and Carol Kardashian sit down to discuss the fierce legal battle between their brother and his ex fiancee, which began when he posted pictures and swearing content about her on social media in July, including three nude photos and accusing her at the same time..."
“…… Drugs, alcohol and infidelity... "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Did you see me getting mad at Rob in our mass texting? Jin, 37, said
"I can't stand it." Khlo é, 33, points out that there are "pros and cons" to this situation - on the plus side, rob, 30, and Chyna, 29, "can't" get back together "after that "Let's focus on the positive," khlo é said
"The negative is all the other s -" the negative is that rob has sisters, and he should know better, "Kim said. “
"He should have controlled himself." But Heroe was still in the corner of rob
"It's too bad," she told Kim



Number  92
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...of public service Response I have much to learn but my goal is and has always been to make sure every member of our party has a safe environment in which to succeed...”
“Response I have made comments on women s appearances and clothes in my capacity as an executive producer but they were not sexualized Response I sincerely regret that my actions and choices have kept me from serving my constituents and our state in a way that reflects the best ideals...”
“Under investigation by the New York Police Department.”
“»Fallout Banned from working with Condé Nast.”
“This is not the way the head of a company like ours should have acted.” »Response “Many of his professional interactions with subjects were sexual and explicit in nature but all of the subjects of his work participated consensually,” a spokeswoman said.”
“»Response Vox Media's chief executive said Steele had admitted to “engaging in conduct that is inconsistent with our core values and will not be tolerated.” »Response “I alone am entirely responsible for my moral failings.”
“»Response “Each of the women who have come forward used grains of truth to sell false narrative.” »Accusation Sexual assault of at least two women and inappropriate behavior with one woman.”
“Accusation Sexual assault of one woman and harassment of several others.”
“Signore unequivocally denies allegations of sexual assault, harassment or retaliation of any kind,” his lawyer said in a statement.”
“»Response “Mr.”


“…… I have a lot to learn about public service response, but my goal is and has always been to ensure that every member of our party has a safe environment in which to succeed... "
"In response, as an executive producer, I have commented on women's appearance and clothing, but these are not sexual responses. I sincerely regret that my actions and choices have prevented me from serving my voters and our country in a way that reflects the best ideals..."
"Under investigation by the New York police department."
"; prohibition of radioactive dust in cooperation with cond é Nast."
"It's not the action that a person in charge of a company like ours should take." "Many of his professional interactions with subjects are sexual and explicit in nature, but all of the subjects he works with are voluntary," a spokesman said
";" responding to vox media CEO, Steele has admitted that "it is intolerable to engage in conduct that is inconsistent with our core values." I am the only one responsible for my moral corruption
"Response" every woman who stands up uses lies to sell false narratives. "At least two women are accused of sexual assault and misconduct with one woman."
"Charges of sexual assault on one woman and harassment of several other women."
"Signore categorically denies any allegation of sexual assault, harassment or any form of retaliation," his lawyer said in a statement
Mr. reply



Number  93
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“However, it’s unclear how long the this romance lasted, as they’ve since broken up.”
“The two celebs took their romance public on Instagram.”
“However, it’s confirmed that the breakup rumours aren’t true.”
“...month old child...”
“...photography by steve granitz contributor getty November 2011 Jelena is over apparently Rumours that Gomez has dumped the Canadian pop star begin to surface after a Bieber fan claimed she had sex with him backstage at a show in October 2010 and that he is the father of her 4”
“Oh, young love.”
“...photography by Kevin Mazur/Contributor/GettyMay 2011: Billboard Music AwardsJelena looked happy and strong at the Billboard Music Awards.”
“Aren’t they adorable?”
“Photography by Jon Kopaloff/FilmMagicFebruary 2011: Jelena steps out on red carpet at the Vanity Fair Oscars partyYup, they finally made our dreams a reality by walking the red carpet together for the first time, thus confirming their young love.”
“But it wasn’t until January 2011 that the pop stars confirmed their romance, namely by partaking in major PDA while on vacation together in St. Lucia.”


"However, it's not clear how long the relationship lasted, because they have broken up."
"The two celebrities made their relationship public on instagram."
"However, it has been confirmed that the rumor of breaking up is not true."
“… One month old... "
“… Photography contributed by Steve granitz Getty in November 2011, jelina was apparently rumored that Gomez dumped a Canadian pop star and began to surface after a Bieber fan claimed that she had sex with him backstage on a show in October 2010 and that he was the father of her four children
"Oh, young love."
“… Photographer Kevin mazul / writer / Getty Mae 2011: Billboard Music Awards: Jenna looks happy and strong at the Billboard Music Awards. "
"Aren't they cute?"
"Jon kopaloff photo / filmmagic February 2011: Jelena stepped on the red carpet of the vanity fair Oscar Party. They walked on the red carpet together for the first time and finally realized our dream, thus proving their young love."
"But it wasn't until January 2011 that the two pop stars confirmed their romance by taking part in a big PDA while on holiday in Saint Lucia."



Number  94
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Only two of the kidnappers served time in prison while the rest were acquitted due to lack of evidence.”
“Then has a violent tantrum after learning that the J. Paul Getty Museum has been reviewed as vulgar and brash in the newspapers.”
“After receiving a faxed copy of the picture, J. Paul Getty dispatches Chace back to Italy to head up the negotiations.”
“Fifty has a no-eye-contact meeting with Gail at a movie theater and gives her a picture of her son posed with the body of one of Primo's dead associates.”
“4 "That's All Folks" Dawn Shadforth Simon Beaufoy & John Jackson April 15, 2018 ( ) 0.495[5] After asking his uncle, Don Salvatore, to participate, Primo enlists his lawyer cousin (code-named “Fifty”) to be the kidnappers’ representative.”
“In the present, Primo, frustrated that J. Paul Getty refuses to pay ransom for what he considers to be a hoax, takes brutal charge of the kidnapping.”
“3 "La Dolce Vita" Danny Boyle Simon Beaufoy April 8, 2018 ( ) 0.602[4] Prior to his kidnapping, J. Paul Getty III enjoys his time in Italy.”
“Chace reports the findings of his investigation, but the boy's mother, Gail, is not convinced that the kidnapping is a hoax.”
“To make precautions so that no one else in his family is kidnapped, Getty has bars placed on the windows of his mansion and advises his relatives to hire bodyguards for their own protection.”
“2 "Lone Star" Danny Boyle Brian Fillis & Simon Beaufoy April 1, 2018 ( ) 0.736[3] J. Paul Getty dispatches his chief of security, James Fletcher Chace, to Italy to investigate his grandson’s disappearance.”


"Only two of the kidnappers were in prison, and the rest were acquitted for lack of evidence."
"When he learned that the J. Paul Getty Museum was criticized as vulgar and reckless in the newspaper, he suddenly lost his temper."
After receiving the faxed photos, Getty sent chase back to Italy to preside over the negotiations
"On the 50th, she had a no eye contact meeting with Gail in a cinema and gave her a picture of her son with a dead body of primo."
"4" Hello everyone "Donne shadforth Simon bofoy and John Jackson April 15, 2018 () 0.495 [5] after inviting his uncle don Salvatore to participate, primo recruited his lawyer cousin (code name" 50 ") to represent the kidnappers."
"At present, primo is frustrated by Paul Getty's refusal to pay ransom for what he believes to be a scam and is therefore responsible for the kidnapping."
"3" la dolce vita "Danny Boyle Simon Beaufoy April 8, 2018 () 0.602 [4] before being kidnapped, j.paul Getty III had a good time in Italy."
Chase reported his findings, but Gail, the boy's mother, did not believe the kidnapping was a hoax
"In order to prevent his family from being kidnapped, Getty installed a fence on the window of his home and advised his relatives to hire bodyguards to protect themselves."
"2" lone stars "Dani Boyle Bryan Phyllis and Simon bovey April 1, 2018 () 0.736 [3] J. Paul Getty sent his security director James Fletcher chase to Italy to investigate the disappearance of his grandson."



Number  95
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“…Related: Some Sleuths Think Taylor Swift's Guitars in Her New Ad Might Be a Clue to 'Reputation'”
“Or perhaps Jake sent it back and the new Taylor buried it in that grave, along with all her other bad memories.”
“And while the Taylor Jake chapter of the pop star s storied dating history was short lived it managed to spur one of Hollywood s greatest mysteries Where in the world is the scarf Taylor sings fondly of in the...”
“...song All Too Well...”
“(Which is rumored to be about her time with Gyllenhaal.)”
“Maggie Gyllenhaal, for one, does not know and would very much like to be excluded from this narrative, one she never asked to be a part of.”
“But before we get into that a quick recap In 2012 Swift released All Too Well from her Red album in it Taylor laments not only the lost love of an autumn romance allegedly Jake The autumn leaves falling down...”
“...like pieces into place And I can picture it after all these days...”
“")—but, even more so, the loss of a scarf.”
“"Left my scarf there at your sister's house / And you still got it in your drawer even now," Taylor sings.”


“…… Related: some detectives think Taylor Swift's guitar in the new ad may be a clue to "reputation."
"Maybe Jack sent it back. The new Taylor buried it in the grave with all her bad memories."
"Although the Taylor Jack chapter in the pop star's legendary dating history is short, it has successfully inspired one of Hollywood's biggest mysteries, where is Taylor's scarf in the world..."
“… Good singing... "
(it's rumored to be her time with Gyllenhaal.)
"Like Maggie Gyllenhaal, she didn't know and wanted to be excluded from the story. She never asked to participate in the story."
"But before we got here, in 2012, Swift's red album" in it "was released so well that Taylor not only lamented the loss of a romantic love in autumn, but also said it was" Jack with autumn leaves falling "..."
“… It's like putting them together. I can imagine what's going on after these days... "
") - but, more importantly, lost a scarf."
Tyler sings, "I left my scarf at your sister's house, and you're still in the drawer."



Number  96
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“There's a reason why season three was so bad.”
“Fox4.”
“"I was told at one point that they really did not like the Seth character early on in the pilot process," Schwartz told TV Guide, "and the way the note was relayed to me was, 'Could the Cohens have had an abortion?'”
“Though he became arguably the show's breakout character, the early draft of Seth was so disliked by Fox that they quite literally wanted to abort him.”
“2 … and the network hated Seth Cohen.”
“But he came back, learned the words, and he was great."”
“He didn't even learn any of the words!"”
“I kind of hated that guy.”
“And I thought, "That guy?”
“Our casting director, Patrick Rush, told me, "I'm telling you, this Adam Brody is very special."”


"There's a reason why the third season is so bad."
"Fox 4."
"I was told once that they didn't really like Seth at the beginning of the audition, and the way this letter was sent to me was, 'will Mr. and Mrs. Cohen have an abortion?'," Schwartz told TV guide
"Although he became a breakthrough character in the play, fox didn't like Seth's early draft draft, so that they really wanted to beat him."
“2…… The Internet hates Seth Cohen. "
"But he came back, learned the language, and he was great."
"He didn't learn a word!"
"I kind of hate that guy."
I thought, "that guy?"
"Our casting director, Patrick rush, told me," I tell you, this Adam Brody is special. "



Number  97
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Alyssa Bailey News and Strategy Editor Alyssa Bailey is the news and strategy editor at ELLE.com, where she oversees coverage of celebrities and royals (particularly Meghan Markle and Kate Middleton).”
“Khloé's mom Kris Jenner revealed last week that Kardashian and True would be back in Los Angeles soon.”
“So, we can’t wait for True to join the crew.” True, of course, has been in Cleveland with Kardashian and True's father Tristan Thompson.”
““Me and Kylie [Jenner] and Khloe are planning one of those kids’ photo shoots, just like a silly shot that we can have all the girls, ‘cause Stormi and Chicago have so many pictures together.”
““We’re so excited,” Kardashian West said.”
“This is adorable baby content at its finest:Khloé's sister Kim Kardashian West told Entertainment Tonight last night that True would be joining her cousins Chicago West and Stormi Webster in a photo shoot the next time Khloé and her sisters Kim and Kylie Jenner reunite.”
“Khloé posted two Instagram Stories of her daughter, dressed in a pink ballerina outfit, fighting back and ultimately succumbing to a sneeze.”
“Ahead of her two-month birthday on June 12, True Thompson made an appearance on social media again—though on her mom Khloé Kardashian's account, not on her own still empty @true Instagram.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Alyssa Bailey, news and strategy editor ELLE.com She oversees coverage of celebrities and royalty, especially Megan markel and Kate Middleton
"Khlo é's mother, Kris Jenner, revealed last week that Kardashian and true will soon return to Los Angeles."
"So we can't wait to get truie on the set." Of course, truie has been to Cleveland with Kardashian and his father, Tristan Thompson
"Kelly (Jenner) and Chloe and I are planning to take a picture of the children. It's like a stupid shot. We can have all the girls because there are so many pictures of Tommy and Chicago together."
"We're so excited," said Kardashian West
"It's lovely baby content at its best: khlo Kelley's sister Kim Kardashian West told entertainment last night that the next time Kelley and sister Kim and Kylie Jenner get together, truer will be with his cousin Chicago West West and stormi Webster. "
"Khlo é posted two stories on instagram about her daughter, who was dressed in Pink Ballet Costume, resisted and eventually succumbed to a sneeze."
"Before her two month birthday on June 12, true Thompson appeared on social media again, although it was on her mother khlo é Kardashian's account, not her own, @ true instagram was still empty."



Number  98
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Water Luis Sequeira Victoria and Abdul Consolata Boyle Visual Effects...”
“Dorota Kobiela Hugh Welchman Sean Bobbitt Ivan Mactaggart Hugh Welchman Animated Short Dear Basketball Glen Keane Kobe Bryant Garden Party Victor Caire Gabriel Grapperon Lou Dave Mullins Dana Murray Negative Space Max Porter Ru Kuwahata Revolting Rhymes Jakob Schuh Jan Lachauer Adapted Screenplay Call Me by Your Name James Ivory...”
“Guillermo del Toro’s “The Shape of Water” continued its awards show streak, leading the pack with 13 nominations.”
““Dunkirk” followed behind with eight nods and Martin McDonagh’s “Three Billboards Outside Ebbing, Missouri”with seven.”
“All three films earned best picture nominations.”
“The rest of the category was rounded out by “Call Me By Your Name,” “Darkest Hour,” “Get Out,” “Phantom Thread,” “Lady Bird,” and “The Post.”The Academy Awards — hosted by Jimmy Kimmel for the second time — will air live on ABC on March 4.”
“Here is the list of 2018 Oscar nominations Best Picture Call Me by Your Name Darkest Hour Dunkirk Get Out Lady Bird Phantom Thread The Post The Shape of Water Three Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri Lead Actor Timothée Chalamet Call Me by Your Name Daniel Day Lewis Phantom Thread Daniel...”
“Kaluuya Get Out Gary Oldman Darkest Hour Denzel Washington Roman J Israel Esq Lead Actress Sally Hawkins The Shape of Water Frances McDormand Three Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri Margot Robbie I Tonya Saoirse Ronan Lady Bird Meryl Streep The Post Supporting Actor Willem Dafoe The Florida Project Woody Harrelson Three...”
“Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri Richard Jenkins The Shape of Water Christopher Plummer All the Money in the World Sam Rockwell Three Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri Supporting Actress Mary J Blige Mudbound Allison Janney I Tonya Lesley Manville Phantom Thread Laurie Metcalf Lady Bird Octavia Spencer The Shape of Water Director...”
“Dunkirk Christopher Nolan Get Out Jordan Peele Lady Bird Greta Gerwig Phantom Thread Paul Thomas Anderson The Shape of Water Guillermo del Toro Animated Feature The Boss Baby Tom McGrath Ramsey Ann Naito The Breadwinner Nora Twomey Anthony Leo Coco Lee Unkrich Darla K Anderson Ferdinand Carlos Saldanha Loving Vincent...”


"Water Louis sequila, Victoria and Abdel Consuela tapboyle visual effects..."
"Dorota kobiela Hugh welchman Sean Bobbitt Ivan MacTaggart Hugh welchman animated short film dear basketball Glen Keane Kobe Bryant garden party winner Caire Gabriel grapperon Lou Dave Mullins Dana Murray negative space Max Porter Ru kuwahata reversing rhyms Jakob Schuh Jan lachauer adapted screenplay" call me your name James ivory "..."
Guillermo del Toro's the shape of water continues its winning streak at the awards ceremony, leading with 13 nominations
Dunkirk followed with eight nods, and Martin MacDonald's three billboards out of Missouri followed with seven nods
"All three films were nominated for best picture."
"The rest of the awards were replaced by" call me your name "," the darkest moment "," go away "," phantom line "," Miss bird "and" post ". The second Oscars, hosted by Jimmy Kimmel, will be broadcast on ABC on March 4
"Here's the list of best picture nominations for the 2018 Oscars. Please call me your name at the darkest moment. Dunkirk goes out Lady Bird mirage line, the shape of water behind three billboards, ebb tide. Missouri chief actor Timothy chalamit, please call me your name Daniel Day Lewis mirage line Daniel..."
"Karuya comes out of Gary Oldman's darkest moment Denzel Washington Roman J Israel ESQ heroine Sally Hawkins water shape Francis mcdorman and three billboards out of the ebb Missouri margotrobi I Tonia sayilsronan lady Kyle Streep supporting actor William Dafoe Florida project woody hallerson III.."
"Missouri billboard Richard Jenkins the shape of water Christopher Plummer all the world's qiansam Rockwell three billboard supporting actress Mary J. blaig confused Alison Jennie Tony Leslie Manville phantom line Laurie Metcalf Lady Bird Octavia Spencer the shape director of water..."
"Dunkirk Christopher Nolan out of Lady Jordan peel bird Greta wig phantom thread Paul Thomas Anderson water Guillermo del Toro shape cartoon boss baby Tom McGrath Ramsey annetto breadwinner Nora Tommy Antonio CoCo Lee Unkrich Dara K Anderson Ferdinand Carlos Saldanha love Vincent..."



Number  99
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She has one childIn her 2015 THR profile, Shookus said her then-2-year-old child was her natural alarm clock in the mornings.”
“She went to the University of North Carolina Chapel Hill before starting at Saturday Night Live.”
“The actor was spotted out with Saturday Night Live producer Lindsay Shookus Thursday night in Los Angeles, and PEOPLE confirms the two are dating.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““They are spending time together in L.A. Lindsay is staying at Ben’s new house,” a source tells PEOPLE of the duo.”
““They had dinner at Giorgio Baldi last night.”
“They arrived in a limo.”
“They looked happy.”
“They had a quick dinner and then returned to Ben’s house.”The two have worked together before, as Affleck is a five-time host of the long-running show and last hosted in May 2013.”
“Read on for more on the TV producer that has captured Affleck’s interest.”


"In her profile in 2015, she had a child, shookus said, whose 2-year-old was her alarm clock every morning."
"She went to the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill before the live broadcast started on Saturday night."
"The actor was found dating Saturday night live producer Lindsay shookus in Los Angeles on Thursday night, and people confirmed that they were dating."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"They spent time together in Los Angeles. Lindsay lives in Ben's new house, "a source told people
"They had dinner in George Baldi last night."
"They came in a limousine."
"They look happy."
"They had a quick meal and went back to Ben's house." The two have worked together before, because Affleck has hosted this long-term TV series five times, the last time in May 2013
"Please continue to read more about the TV producers that are interested in Affleck."



Number  100
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“One of these might have decided to port Renée into someone else’s physique – say, the lissom style princess played here by Michelle Williams – and watched them grapple with their change in fortunes.”
“Brought to mind in a scene when she watches Big (1988) are the high-concept comedies of the 1980s.”
“And she hates the way she looks, trapped in a state of precarious mental health which can’t be helped by her choice of employer.”
“She’s as far from front-of-house as could be imagined, sifting through web orders in a dingy basement that's miles from the gleaming HQ uptown.”
“Renée (Schumer) is a minor employee at a scarily top-end New York cosmetics firm.”
“The only means it can find to be funny is sabotaging its own message, which isn’t a great starting point, let alone finishing point, for a body-positive comedy.”
“The film wants it both ways: to reject the unattainable hierarchies of the beauty industry, but also to ridicule a person who doesn’t know her place within them.”
“12A cert, 110 minsAmy Schumer doesn’t need too many excuses to be funny, and she certainly doesn’t need the trumped-up self-body-shaming of I Feel Pretty, her new vehicle as a producer and star.”
“Cast: Amy Schumer, Michelle Williams, Busy Philipps, Naomi Campbell, Aidy Bryant, Emily Ratajkowski.”
“Dirs: Abby Kohn, Marc Silverstein.”


"One of them may decide to transplant Rene into other people's physique - for example, Michelle Williams Plays lissom style Princess here - and watch them try to cope with the change of fate."
"When she watched big man (1988), the scene that came to her mind was the high concept comedy of the 1980s."
"And she hates her looks and falls into a state of mental instability that she can't help in choosing an employer."
"The furthest away from the house she could imagine, sifting through online orders in a darkened basement a few miles from the glittering headquarters neighborhood."
"Rene (Schumer) is a small employee of a high-end cosmetics company in New York."
"The only interesting way it can find is to destroy its own information, which is not a good starting point, let alone the end point, a physical positive comedy."
"The film wants two ways: to reject the hierarchy that the beauty industry can't match, but also to laugh at someone who doesn't know where he is in it."
"12a Cert, 110 minsamy Schumer doesn't need too many excuses to be funny, and of course she doesn't need me to think she's beautiful, her new car as a producer and star, this kind of fabricated self humiliation."
Cast: Amy Schumer, Michelle Williams, busy Phillips, Naomi Campbell, Eddie Bryant, Emily ratajkovsky
"Director: Abby Cohen, mark Silverstein."



Number  101
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Actually, let us get back to you on that.”
“Wait, no... over-easy eggs.”
“Even after a full night's sleep and a couple of cups of coffee, choosing what sounds better — a cheesy omelet or a pile of sweet pancakes — is one.”
“...tough.”
“...decision.”
“And when we're in an actual breakfast joint trying to hone in on that perfect morning plate... well, the indecision gets real.”
“This is why we're fully convinced that Carole Radziwill just gets it.”
“As shown on a recent episode of The Real Housewives of New York City, the author sometimes has a hard time deciding just how she'd like her eggs to be prepared.”
“When meeting up for some morning eats with her friend Tinsley Mortimer, Carole gave an order to the waitress that we could have said ourselves (and, in fact, probably have).”
“"I want three eggs any style," she said.”


"Actually, let's get back to you."
"Wait, No... It's not a simple egg. "
"Even after a night's sleep and a few cups of coffee, choosing a better sounding omelette or a bunch of sweet pancakes is one of them."
“… It's hard. "
“… The decision. "
"When we're in a real breakfast shop trying to hone on that perfect breakfast plate... Well, indecision has become a reality. "
"That's why we believe Carol Raz will get it."
"As shown in the latest issue of Real Housewives in New York City, it's sometimes hard for the author to decide how to prepare eggs."
"When Carol was having breakfast with her friend Tinsley Mortimer, she gave the waitress an order that we could have said it ourselves (in fact, probably already)
"I'd like three eggs, any style," she said



Number  102
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Top Chef supervising producer Ellie Carbajal also told the jury – whose names will be released later this week – that she was the subject of racist taunts, according to Deadline.”
“Click here to get breaking crime news, ongoing trial coverage and details of intriguing unsolved cases in the True Crime Newsletter.”
“I could feel my heart beat in my chest,” Lakshmi said, adding, “I felt threatened.”• Want to keep up with the latest crime coverage?”
“RELATED VIDEO: Top Chef Winner Jeremy Ford Shows How to Make His Delicious Roasted Chicken Recipe“I felt like he was bullying me, like he was telling me he was going to hit me.”
“What a shame about that pretty face,’ ” according to the Boston Herald.”
“Image zoom Credit: Pat Greenhouse/The Boston Globe/Getty Images (3); Jonathan Wiggs/The Boston Globe/Getty ImagesLakshmi alleged that one of the men leaned his arm into her vehicle while other union picketers stopped it and said, ” ‘Oh, lookie here.”
“Image zoom Credit: Pat Greenhouse/The Boston Globe/Getty ImagesTop Chef stars Padma Lakshmi, Gail Simmons and producers of the show testified that they were subject to threats and racial slurs from the Teamsters, who wanted driver jobs on the nonunion production.”
“...to picket if union members are in pursuit of a job...”
“According to the Boston Herald lawyers for the defendants Robert Cafarelli John Fidler Daniel Remond and Michael Ross had argued that the Teamsters protests outside of a Milton Massachusetts restaurant during Top Chef s filming there in June 2014 had been legal under a federal law that allows union members...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


According to deadline, top chef and producer Ellie Carbajal also told the jury that she was the target of racist ridicule. The name of the jury will be announced later this week
"Click here to get details of breaking crime news, ongoing trials and pending cases in the real crime newsletter."
"I can feel my heartbeat," Lakshmi said. "I feel threatened." Do you want to keep up with the latest crime reports? "
Related video: Top Chef winner Jeremy Ford shows how to make his delicious roast chicken recipe. "I feel like he's bullying me, like he's telling me he's going to hit me."
"That beautiful face is a shame," according to the Boston Herald
"The credit for zooming: Pat greenhouses / Boston Globe / Getty pictures (3); Jonathan wiggs / Boston Globe / Getty pictures claimed that one of the men put his arm into her car, while the other Union pickets stopped and said," Oh, look at this. "
"Photo scaling credit: Pat greenhouses / Boston Globe / Getty imagestop chef stars Padma Lakshmi, Gail Simmons and program producers confirmed that they were threatened and racially defamed by truck drivers and that they wanted drivers to work in non union production."
“… If the trade union members are looking for jobs, they are going to check out... "
"Lawyers for defendants Robert cafarelli, John Federer, Daniel Raymond and Michael Roth believe it is legal for truck drivers to protest outside the dining room during filming" Top Chef "at a restaurant in Milton, Massachusetts in June 2014, according to a federal law that allows union members to participate," the Boston Herald reported
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  103
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We’d love to hear your stories, either way, on Facebook or in the comments belowImages: Instagram/Whitney PortRead more:”
“We have to say, we feel for Whitney and appreciate her honesty on this one.”
“AdvertisementBut that’s not to say it’s always an easy thing to go through.”
“There are challenges – some are physical, some are emotional, and some are a little bit of everything.”
“Former The Hills star Whitney Port, currently in her 3rd trimester, knows all too well that there are tribulations to tackle when it comes to expecting.”
“For her, a lot of it’s do with her body image, and how “uncomfortable” she feels with her changing body, and how that’s left her feeling desperately unattractive to her husband of 2 years, Tim Rosenman.”
““So ready for this pregnancy to be over,” Whitney told the LadyGang podcast in a recent interview.”
““It is so not for me!”
“It’s not.”
“I feel so uncomfortable with my body that I can’t get into the mood.”


"Either way, we want to hear your story on Facebook or in the following comments: instagram / Whitney portread more:"
"We have to say that we sympathize with Whitney and thank her for her honesty in this matter."
"But that's not to say it's always easy."
"There are challenges, some physical, some emotional, and some little things."
"Former hills star Whitney Port is in her third month of pregnancy, and she knows very well that there are still many difficulties to overcome in pregnancy."
"For her, it's largely related to her body image. How uncomfortable she feels about her changing body makes her feel extremely unattractive to her husband, Tim Rosenman, who has been in love for two years."
"Are you ready to end this pregnancy?" Whitney told Lady Gang Podcast in a recent interview
"It's too much for me!"
"No
"I feel so uncomfortable with my body that I can't get into the mood."



Number  104
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Hmm, maybe we'll just start with a few tweaks to the kitchen ...”
“Well, now we're totally inspired to renovate our own place.”
“Prices are subject to change.”
“The Real Housewives of New York City businesswoman shared where she shopped for the goods she used to renovate her stunning home.”
“There must something in the water with The Real Housewives of New York City.”
“Have you ever noticed that these ladies have the best vacation homes?”
“First, we couldn't stop drooling over RHONY alum Jill Zarin's recently renovated Boca Raton pad.”
“And as we know, Dorinda Medley always makes her Berkshires home nice.”
“And now, Ramona Singer is inviting us into her newly-renovated Hamptons home with photos that make us yearn for a tranquil, all-white retreat of our own.”
“But if we can't get a second home at the moment, at least we can take a few decorating tips from the Ageless by Ramona skincare mogul.”


"Well, maybe we should change the kitchen first..."
"Well, now we have the inspiration to decorate our own house."
"Prices change at any time."
"The real housewife of New York City - a businesswoman shared where she went shopping and bought the goods she used to decorate her beautiful home."
"There must be something in the water with the Real Housewives of New York City."
"Have you noticed that these women have the best vacation homes?"
"First of all, we can't help drooling over Ronald alum Jill zarin's recently renovated Boca Raton apartment."
"As we know, Dorinda Medley always makes her Berkshire family good."
"Now, Ramona Singh invites us into her newly renovated Hampton home. The photos make us yearn for a quiet, all white seclusion of our own."
"But if we can't get a second home at the moment, at least we can learn some decorative techniques from Ramona skin care tycoon's" immortality. "



Number  105
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Rob a Train Netflix Original Film Julie s Greenroom Season 1 Netflix Original Marvel s Iron Fist Season 1 Netflix Original Naledi A Baby Elephant s Tale 2016 Pandora Netflix Original Film Samurai Gourmet Season 1 Netflix Original Available March 18 Come and Find Me 2016”
“In fact, several titles hitting Netflix in March 2017 fit this genre.”
“STOP WHAT YOU'RE DOING!”
“BREAKING NEWS!”
“Safe Haven, the delightfully soapy Nicholas Sparks adaptation starring Julianne Hough and Tad Hamilton Josh Duhamel is coming to Netflix in March 2017.”
“Clear your schedule immediately: You need to watch this movie every night for three weeks straight in order to get its full effect.”
“OK, so Safe Haven isn't exactly an Oscar winner, but it's perfect for the entertainment transition happening right now.”
“You're over the weighty prestige films from awards season, but you're not quite ready for the mindless summer blockbusters that will flood the cinema come Memorial Day.”
“Safe Haven—with its melodrama and beachside make-out sessions—is a deliriously happy medium.”
“From another season of the Netflix original series Grace and Frankie to The Craft and the third season of How to Get Away With Murder, Netflix has your "not too heavy but not too mindless" content on lock.”


"Rob a train Netflix original movie Julie s greenroom Season 1 Netflix original Marvel Comics s iron fist Season 1 Netflix original Naledi a baby elephant s Tale 2016 Pandora Netflix original movie Samurai cuisine Season 1 Netflix original launched on March 18, 2016
"In fact, several of the movies hit on Netflix in March 2017 fit this category."
"Stop it
"Breaking news!"
"Haven, the soap opera" Nicholas spark ", starring Julian Hoff and Ted Hamilton Josh Duhamel, will be launched on Netflix in March 2017."
"Schedule now: you need to see the film every night for three weeks in a row to get the most out of it."
"OK, so safe haven isn't exactly an Oscar winner, but it's a great fit for the ongoing entertainment transformation."
"You've seen all the prestige movies of the awards season, but you're not quite ready for the mindless summer blockbusters that will be pouring into the cinema on Memorial Day."
The melodrama of haven and the intimate meeting by the sea are a very happy medium
"From another season of Netflix's original series grace and Frankie to the third season of crafts and how to escape murder, Netflix has locked in your" not too heavy but not too blind "content."



Number  106
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sponsored by BECU, Tito's Handmade Vodka...”
“Hodge has made documentary content with Karlie Kloss, Samsung, NBC, Time Magazine, CBC Music, Disney's Maker Studios, Uber Technologies, and more.”
“He most recently won a Founders Award for Pistol Shrimps at Michael Moore's Traverse City Film Festival.”
“He has been nominated for six Leo Awards for his documentary movies, winning one for A Brony Tale in 2015.”
“Hodge is also the show runner and director for Season 1 and 2 of the series "A User's Guide To Cheating Death" (BBC Earth).”
“Director BiographyBrent Hodge is a filmmaker best known for his documentaries A Brony Tale (Netflix), I Am Chris Farley (Spike TV), Pistol Shrimps (NBC) and most recently Freaks and Geeks (A&E).”
“...people...”
“The show is about failing and how you survive failure explains Apatow in one of the film s many revealing interviews mixed in with remarkable behind the scenes and audition footage in a documentary about the show s long lasting impact on pop culture and its plethora of extremely talented...”
“...are vital parts of our lives...”
“Documentarian Brent Hodge SIFF 2016 s The Pistol Shrimps gets the gang back together 19 years later for a retrospective on a show that dared to break conventions to tell stories of high school kids that hadn t been represented on television before and revealing that adolescent humiliations and heartbreaks...”


"Sponsored by Becco, Tito's Handmade vodka..."
"Hodge has worked with Carly Klaus, Samsung, NBC, Time magazine, CBC music, Disney Studios, Uber technology, etc. to produce documentary content."
"He recently won the founder Award for" pistol shrimps "at Michael Moore's traversecity Film Festival
"He was nominated for six Leo awards for his documentary, one of which was in 2015 for Brownie story."
"Hodge is also the host and director of the first and second seasons of the BBC earth series."
Director biography Britt Hodge is a filmmaker known for his documentaries Netflix, Spike TV, NBC and most recently a & E
“… People
"The play is about failure and how to survive in failure," apato explained in an interview in the film. The interview is mixed with wonderful behind the scenes stories and auditions. The documentary tells about the long-term impact of the play on popular culture and its many talents... "
“… It's a vital part of our lives... "
"Documentary Brent Hodge Schiff's" Pistol Shrimp "in 2016 brought these people together 19 years later to participate in a retrospective exhibition of the program, which dares to break the Convention, tells the story of high school students who have never appeared on TV before, and reveals the humiliation and heartbreak of adolescence..."



Number  107
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For more from the former One Directioner, watch the clip below!”
“If Disney pays this ransom, they could go into Johnny Debt.”Not to be outdone, Corden spent time backstage rocking a tight bright red suit, white cowboy boots, and a butterfly tattoo on his chest.”
“Well, at least it did on Tuesday night.”
“Harry Styles continued his week-long residency on the CBS show, stepping out and pretending to be host, James Corden, delivering the opening monologue.”
“Styles, 23, clad in a velvet green suit, touched on the news, poking fun at both Donald Trump and Hillary Clinton.”
“But the British singer really enjoyed trying out puns while talking about the story involving hackers threatening to release Pirates of the Caribbean 5 unless a ransom was paid.”
“WATCH: Harry Styles Dodges Kendall Jenner Mentions, Teases ‘Carpool Karaoke’ Segment on ‘The Late Late Show’“They could release this movie illegally.”
“I guess you would say it’s a pirated video,” he quipped.”
““They’re holding Pirates of the Caribbean for ransom.”
“Sounds to me like they’re charging them an arm and a peg.”


"To learn more about the previous director, please see the following clip!"
"If Disney pays the ransom, they may owe Johnny a debt." In order not to be outdone, cordon was wearing a tight bright red suit, white cowboy boots and a butterfly tattoo backstage
"Well, at least on Tuesday night."
"Harry stiles continued his week-long internship on CBS when he came out and pretended that the host James Corden made the opening remarks."
"Stiles, 23, wearing a velvet green suit, came into contact with the news and made fun of both Donald Trump and Hillary Clinton."
"But the British singer really likes to pun when it comes to the story of hackers threatening to release Pirates of the Caribbean 5, unless ransom is paid."
"Watch: in the late late show, Harry styles dodges and Kendall Jenner talked about joking about" carpooling karaoke "and" they may illegally distribute this movie. "
"I guess you'd say it's a pirated video," he quipped
"They're holding Pirates of the Caribbean for ransom."
"I feel like they're asking them for money."



Number  108
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Chapter 37 of Riverdale airs on The CW Wednesday, October 17th at 8 PM.”
“J'onn (David Harewood) relishes his peaceful new life, but an outing with an old friend causes him concern.”
“Let's start with the season 7 premiere of Arrow, titled 'Locked Up':Following Oliver's (Stephen Amell) shocking decision to turn himself over to the FBI and reveal his identity as the Green Arrow to the public, Oliver has spent the past five months in Slabside Maximum Security Prison.”
“Determined to keep a low profile to shorten his sentence for the sake of his family, Oliver is tested when he runs into old foes.”
“Meanwhile, Diggle (David Ramsey) and Dinah (Juliana Harkavy) have taken on new jobs and left their costumes behind but not everyone is following suit.”
“With her focus on William (guest star Jack Moore), Felicity (Emily Bett Rickards) tries to start over but when someone from her past resurfaces, things become complicated.”
“James Bamford directed the episode written by Beth Schwartz & Oscar Balderrama.”
“Everyone keeps saying that they think this season will be loosely based on the almost-Green Arrow film Supermax, but I am not buying it.”
“We will find out when it debuts on The CW October 15th at 8 PM.”
“Supergirl is up next, with the season 4 premiere episode ' American Alien', which will debut a new suit for our hero:Diving back into reporting, Kara (Melissa Benoist) welcomes a new cub reporter to CatCo.”


Chapter 37 of Riverdale will air on Wednesday, October 17, at 8 p.m
"John (David Harwood) likes a quiet new life, but an outing with an old friend worries him."
"Let's start with the premiere of season 7 of arrow, which is called lock up: Oliver has been in slabside's highest security prison for the past five months, following his shocking decision to hand himself over to the FBI and reveal his green arrow identity to the public."
Oliver is determined to keep a low profile and shorten his sentence for his family. When he meets his old enemy, he will be tested
At the same time, digger (David Ramsay) and Dina (Juliana hakawi) are starting a new job, no longer wearing their own clothes, but not everyone is following suit
Felicity (Emily bate Ricardo) focuses on William (guest star Jack Moore). She tries to start over, but when someone from her past reappears, things get complicated
"James banford directed this episode by Beth Schwartz and Oscar balderama."
"Everyone is saying that they think this season will be based on the green arrow movie supermax, but I don't buy it."
"We're going to air it for the first time on CW at 8 p.m. on October 15."
"Super girl is the next, with the fourth season premiere 'alien America', which will be our new suit Hero: Diving back for the first time. In the report, Carla (Melissa benova) welcomes a new kid reporter to catco



Number  109
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In 2004, McNeely rang in the New Year with Ryan Seacrest for ABC’s famous Times Square crystal ball drop.”
“He also starred in the show’s spin-off, That’s Amore, in 2008, in which Shot at Love contestant Domenico Nesci searched for love with McNeely’s help.”
“McNeely appeared on A Shot at Love, a bisexual-themed reality dating game show, back in 2007.”
““Close to his body, authorities found drug paraphernalia, prescription medication and other believed to be illegal substances.”“There are no suspicious circumstances surrounding the death and foul play is not suspected,” adds Allard.”
““His body has been transported to the medical examiner’s office for an autopsy, which will determine the cause of death,” says Allard.”
“The 911 call was made by a female acquaintance, possibly a girlfriend.”
“Lieutenant David Allard tells PEOPLE that at approximately 3:30 p.m., officers were dispatched to McNeely’s apartment where he was found to be deceased.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“McNeely, who previously starred on Tila Tequila‘s MTV show A Shot at Love, was found dead on Thursday in his hometown of Beckley, West Virginia.”
“...age of 35 PEOPLE confirms...”


"In 2004, McNally and Ryan Seacrest joined in a new year's call for ABC's famous time square crystal ball show."
"In 2008, he also starred in another film of the show, amore, in which contestant Domenico nesch looks for love with the help of McNally."
"McNally appeared in a bisexual reality dating game show" the lens of love "as early as 2007
"Drug paraphernalia, prescription drugs and other substances believed to be illegal were found near his body." "There is no suspicious situation around the death, and there is no suspicion of mischief," Allard added
"His body has been sent to the forensic office for an autopsy, which will determine the cause of death," Allard said
"It was a female acquaintance, probably a girlfriend, who called 911."
"Lieutenant David Allard told people that at about 3:30 p.m., police were sent to McNally's apartment where he was found dead."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
McNally, who starred in the MTV show a shot at love in Tila tequila, was found dead in his hometown of Berkeley, West Virginia, on Thursday
“… The 35 year old confirmed that... "



Number  110
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ET.”
“… Kevin is such a talented and gifted actor.”
“The Hollywood Foreign Press Association announced the nominees for the 75th annual awards show on Monday, December 11.”
“Plummer is nominated for best supporting actor in a motion picture for his portrayal of billionaire oil tycoon J. Paul Getty.”
“The upcoming historical drama also received nominations for best director (Ridley Scott) and best actress in a motion picture drama (Michelle Williams).”
“Plummer, 87, replaced Spacey, 58, in All the Money in the World after several men accused the House of Cards star of sexual harassment and assault.”
“In an unprecedented move, the Sound of Music actor reshot the character’s scenes in mid-November, just weeks before the film’s scheduled release date, which was slightly adjusted from December 22 to 25.”
““It’s going to be different, naturally,” Plummer told Us Weekly and other reporters at the Man Who Invented Christmas premiere in New York City on November 12.”
““The situation is very sad.”
“It’s just so sad.”


"Wait a minute."
“… Kevin is a very talented actor
The Hollywood Foreign Journalists Association announced the nominations for the 75th annual awards ceremony on Monday, December 11
"Plummer was nominated for best supporting role for his role as J. Paul Getty, a billionaire oil tycoon."
"The upcoming historical play has also been nominated for Best Director (Ridley Scott) and best film actress (Michelle Williams)," he said
Plummer, 87, replaced spicey, 58, as the world's richest man after several men accused house of cards stars of sexual harassment and assault
In mid November, the hero of the sound of music re filmed the scene of the character, an unprecedented move, just a few weeks before the film's scheduled release date, which was slightly adjusted from December 22 to December 25
"Naturally, it's going to be different," plummer, the creator of the Christmas premiere in New York City on November 12, told us weekly and other reporters
"It's a terrible situation."
"It's so sad."



Number  111
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Yes!’ ”Image zoom Taylor Swift and Lexi CavistonCaviston was diagnosed with Stage 4 glioblastoma after her doctors found a tumor the size of three golf balls pushing down on her eye’s optic nerve.”
““I woke my husband up and started crying and said, ‘She met Taylor!”
““I and my family are deeply grateful,” the co-host said.”
“Calling Swift a “class act” and an “incredible artist,” McCain also thanked the singer for making the meeting with Caviston possible.”
““She spoke to our producer and said it was by far the best day of her life.”RELATED VIDEO: Taylor Swift Performs a Surprise Set at Nashville’s Bluebird Cafe — and Does a Fireball Shot!”
““I am so happy that we were able to help Lexi forget about her cancer for one day,” she said.”
“Image zoom Taylor Swift; Meghan McCain | Credit: Steve Granitz/WireImage; Jason LaVeris/FilmMagic“She has the same brain cancer my dad does,” McCain explained during Monday’s episode of The View.”
“Her father John McCain is also battling glioblastoma after being diagnosed in July 2017.”
“McCain quickly joined the effort to help Caviston.”
“We’re going to the #reputationstadiumtour on July 14th in Philly and it’s her dream to meet @taylorswift,” the tweet read.”


"Yes! "The doctors of Taylor swift and Lexi caviston gaviston found a three golf ball sized tumor on the optic nerve of her eye, which was diagnosed as stage 4 glioblastoma."
"I woke my husband up and cried," she met Tyler! "
"My family and I are very grateful," the host said
He called swift "a first-class performer" and "an incredible artist." he also appreciated the possibility of special envoy Swift's meeting with kaviston
"She told our producers it was the best day of her life." Related video: Taylor Swift performs a surprise scene at Bluebird Cafe in Nashville - and makes a fireball shooting! "
"I'm glad we can help Lexy forget her cancer one day," she said
"Zoom in and zoom out Taylor Swift; Megan McCann | source: Steve granitz / WireImage; Jason lafaris / filmmagic" McCann explained on Monday's "point of view" that "she has the same brain cancer as my dad."
"Her father, John McCain, was also struggling with glioblastoma after being diagnosed in July 2017."
"He quickly joined in helping carveston."
"We're going on a reputation tour in Philadelphia on July 14, and she dreams of meeting @ Taylor Swift," tweeted



Number  112
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Markle said she was even more delighted in Season 2 when the producers cast Wendell Pierce, a dark-skinned African-American actor, to play the part of Rachel’s father.”
““In making a choice like that, the ‘Suits’ producers helped shift the way pop culture defines beauty,” she said.”
“Actually, Markle is a “valley girl,” who grew up in a comfortable leafy suburb of Los Angeles’ San Fernando Valley.”
“...grew up in...”
“A Daily Mail columnist speculated on the exotic DNA Markle would bring to the royal family tree and described her mother as a dreadlocked African American lady from the wrong side of the tracks Other tabloids used terms like gangsta and referred to the crime plagued Los Angeles neighborhood Markle...”
“Part of the reason for the lack of discussion could stem from the unfortunate way the British press addressed her background soon after it became known that she was dating Harry, the Huffington Post said.”
“...pic.twitter.com/ijYqJZqmIq — lauren warren (@iamlaurenp) November 27, 2017Actually, Markle’s biracial identity hasn’t been a subject the media has talked about much over the past few months.”
“WE GOT ONE IN THE PALACE, Y’ALL!”
“The celebration came from people who said, among other things, that it was time for someone to shake up Britain’s class system, which has long been accused of elitist and racist ways.”
“But mostly there was celebration, according to Refinery29.”


Marcel said she was even happier in the second season when the producers let the dark skinned African American actor Wendell pierce play Rachel's father
"In making such a choice, 'suit' producers have helped change the way popular culture defines beauty," she said
In fact, markel is a "Valley Girl" who grew up in a comfortable leafy suburb of San Fernando Valley in Los Angeles
“… Growing up in
A columnist in the daily mail speculated on the strange DNA that markel would bring to the royal family, and described her mother as an African American woman in prison, which is the same terminology used by other tabloids, such as gangsters, and referred to the crime ridden Los Angeles neighbor markel... "
"Part of the lack of discussion may be due to the unfortunate British media coverage of her background shortly after learning that she was dating Harry," the Huffington Post said
“... pic.twitter.com/ijYqJZqmIq -Lauren Warren (@ iamlaurenp) November 27, 2017 in fact, in the past few months, Marcel's racial identity has not been a topic of frequent media talk. "
"There is one in the palace, you
"The celebrations were initiated by people who said, among other things, that it was time for someone to shake the British class system, which has long been accused of being elitist and racist."
"But according to the refinery on the 29th, most of the time is celebration."



Number  113
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Photo credit: Twitter / @trueviralnewsRelated:TNT Postpones 'The Last Ship' Season Premiere Due to Nightclub Shooting SceneGet Ready, There's a 'Grey's Anatomy' Spinoff Coming to ABC'Grey's Anatomy' Season 13 Finale Just Ripped out Our Hearts and We May Not Recover...”
“Season four of The Last Ship premieres August 20 on TNT.”
“"Daddy's working in town, so we're going to be hanging close, we'll be in Malibu a lot, a lot of local trips visiting family," she said.”
“News that the family would be staying close in Malibu as Dane was returning to work.”
“Gayheart told E!”
“The outing was Dane's first since briefly stepping away from filming season five of The Last Ship.”
“"I want my girls to know how important it is to give back."”
“"We always make this a family affair," Gayheart wrote on Instagram.”
“The annual event, which raises funds to assist the homeless and impoverished, has been a family event since 2004.”
“MORE: 'Grey's Anatomy' Star Eric Dane's Daughter Steals the Spotlight by Hiding From the CameraDane appeared with his wife Rebecca Gayheart, who co-founded the event, and their daughters Billie, 7, and Georgia, 5.”


Photo source: Twitter / @ trueviralnewst: TNT delays the premiere of the last boat season. As the nightclub shooting scene is ready, "anatomy of grey" will be staged in the finale of ABC's anatomy of grey season 13. Our hearts are torn and we may not be able to recover... "
The fourth season of the last ship premieres on August 20 at TNT
"Dad works in the city, so we'll stay close, we'll be in Malibu a lot, we'll visit relatives a lot," she said
"When the Danes return to work, their family will live in Malibu."
"Gayhardt told me!"
"This is the first time that Danes have left the filming of the fifth season of the last ship for a short time."
"I want my daughters to know how important reward is."
"We always see this as a family event," Gayheart wrote on instagram
"This annual event has been a family event since 2004 to raise money to help the homeless and the poor."
"More: 'Grey's anatomy' STAR ERIC Denny's daughter snatched the spotlight and hid in the camera as his wife Rebecca gaehart, who co founded the event, appeared with their daughter Billy, 7, Georgia, 5."



Number  114
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The of-the-shoulder silhouette of her pale pink, princess-worthy outfit from designer Carolina Herrera was, in fact, not so princess worthy after all.”
“Meghan wears a sleeveless dress to her first Trooping the ColourPhotography via Max Mumby/Indigo/Getty ImagesMeghan Markle made her Buckingham balcony debut on June 9 in celebration of Queen Elizabeth’s birthday.”
“Either way, we plan on copping the look this Christmas.”
“Maybe the burgundy hue is an act of royal rebellion, maybe it’s some mystical lighting mishap, or maybe, she just thought it was a seasonally appropriate winter nail colour.”
“As she cupped the growing royal baby in her black Givenchy gown, royal rule followers were quick to question: is that… dark nail polish on the Duchess of Sussex’s fingers?”
“...of the Year award all eyes were on her pregnancy glow...”
“...magazine there is a rule in place stating that coloured nail polish does not meet royal standards and is considered vulgar Photography via Twitter kensingtonroyal When Meghan Markle made a surprise appearance at the British Fashion Awards to present her wedding dress designer Clare Waight Keller the British Womenswear Designer...”
“According to OK!”
“...colour she ll wear it s the only colour she ll tolerate in Buckingham Palace...”
“It s a nearly sheer light pink polish Essie s Ballet Slippers to be exact and according to the brand s website in 1989 Queen Elizabeth s hairdresser sent the company a letter requesting a bottle of the only colour Her Majesty would wear It s not just the only...”


"The shoulder profile of the light pink princess dress designed by the designer Carolina Herrera is not so suitable for the princess."
"Megan wore a sleeveless dress for her first color tour. On June 9, to celebrate Queen Elizabeth's birthday, Megan markel made her debut on the balcony of Buckingham Palace. "
"Anyway, we plan to wear it this Christmas."
"Maybe the color of Burgundy is a sign of Royal rebellion, maybe some mysterious lighting accident, or she just thinks it's a winter nail color suitable for the season."
"When she was wearing a black Givenchy robe and holding a growing Royal baby, followers of the royal rules soon began to question: it was Dark nail polish on the finger of Duchess of Sussex? "
“…… All eyes of the annual award are focused on the light of her pregnancy... "
“…… There is a stipulation in the magazine that color nail polish is not in line with royal standard, and is considered vulgar by Twitter kensingtonroyal. At that time, Megan Meghan Kerr (Meghan Markle) appeared beyond all expectations in the British Fashion Awards and presented the award to the British women's designer Claire Witt Kay Waight Keller.
"Press OK!"
“… It's the only color she can stand at Buckingham Palace... "
"To be exact, it's a pair of nearly transparent light pink Polish Essy ballet slippers. According to the brand's website in 1989, Queen Elizabeth's Barber wrote to the company asking for a bottle of the only color her majesty will wear - it's not just the only one..."



Number  115
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Exclusive...”
“There’s this feeling of like, ‘It’s not reciprocated.’”“Yeah,” Taryn laments.”
“In ET’s exclusive first look at this week’s episode of Hollywood Medium With Tyler Henry, the Orange Is the New Black star sits down with Tyler hoping for answers about her father, Bill’s, death.”
“Bill died from a suicide when Taryn was 14.”
““When I’m connecting to this energy, and I’m looking toward the end of life, there’s a feeling of not fully knowing the impact that my actions are going to have,” Tyler tells Taryn.”
““Just, so not being in my right state of mind, that I don't even know whether I’m, like, alive or dead.”
“It was just a feeling of, I’m so not in a good headspace that, when I pass, there’s this feeling of, ‘Oh my god, did I just do this?”
“Did this just happen to me?’ It would be that severe of a state in the way that this comes through.”Validating the message for Taryn is Tyler noting a previous attempt at suicide, which Taryn confirms.”
““It’s pretty awful,” she lets out, as she tears up.”
“Yeah it s f ked but I always feel like if he were around everything would be so different Check out the emotional moment here There s a feeling of almost if someone was feuding with someone when they died it s this feeling of like I didn t get...”


Exclusive
"There's a feeling like, 'it's not a reward,' and 'yes,'" tallin sighs
"In the Hollywood media, the first episode of ET with Taylor Henry, the orange is the new black star sits with Taylor, hoping to get an answer about the death of her father bill."
"Bill committed suicide when Tallinn was 14."
"When I'm connected to this energy, when I look to the end of my life, there's a feeling that I don't fully know what the impact of my actions will be," Tyler told Tallinn
"It's just that I'm not in a good mental state. I don't even know whether I'm alive or dead."
"It's just a feeling, my head space is not very good, when I pass by, there will be a feeling," my God, did I just do this? "
"Did it happen to me? Taylor confirmed this by confirming Taylor's previous suicide attempt
"It's terrible," she cried
"Yes, it's a failure, but I always feel that if he is around, everything will become so different. Look at the emotional moments here, there is a feeling that if someone dies, it's almost discord with someone. It's like I didn't get it..."



Number  116
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But back in 2015, she revealed to Ryan Seacrest that she was on Tinder after speculation that her profile was fake.”
“2 on the way and a starring role on the TV show “Younger,” there’s no doubt that Hilary Duff is a busy young woman.”
“Katy PerryIn between her concerts and epic shoe collection, it appears that pop star Katy Perry also finds time to swipe.”
““I am open to human connection, so whether that’s through a male or a female, it doesn’t matter to me.”4.”
“Demi LovatoIn her 2017 documentary “Demi Lovato: Simply Complicated,” Lovato opened up about using dating apps to connect with both men and women.”
“3.”
““[We’ve] been talking for the past seven months” and then “started to hang out a little bit more, because we were both really busy,” Rippon said in April.”
“He told People that the relationship was still “fresh” — but that he’s “fresh,” too.”
“Adam RipponEarlier this year, figure skater Adam Rippon revealed that he met his boyfriend, Jussi-Pekka Kajaala, on Tinder.”
“Vanessa [Bayer] and I posted our profiles at the same time and scream-giggled like little girls.”2.”


"But back in 2015, she revealed to Ryan Seacrest that she was adding fuel to the fire after speculation that her profile was fake."
"2 on the road with a starring TV show" young ", there is no doubt that Hilary Duff is a busy young woman."
"Katie Perry is between the concert and the epic shoe series. It seems that pop star Katie Perry has time to swipe her card."
"I'm open to relationships, so it doesn't matter to me whether it's through men or women."
"Demi Lovato in her 2017 documentary Demi Lovato: simple and complex, Lovato openly uses dating apps to connect with men and women."
“3.”
"We've been talking for seven months," Rippon said in April, and then "start dating a little bit more because we're all busy."
He told people that the relationship was still "fresh" - but he was also "fresh."
Earlier this year, figure skater Adam Rippon revealed that he met his boyfriend, Giuseppe KaKaLa, on tinder
"Vanessa (Bayer) and I posted our profile at the same time, screaming and giggling like little girls."



Number  117
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“What do you think of Cheryl Cole’s first Father’s Day Tribute to her baby daddy Liam?”
“A post shared by Cheryl (@cherylofficial) on Jun 18, 2017 at 8:09am PDTOn Wednesday 22nd March Liam and I became parents to an incredibly beautiful, healthy baby boy, weighing 7lb 9 and looking like a dream.”
“As fans may already be aware, the singer gave birth to their son Bear back in March.”
“Cheryl posted a black and white photo of the former One Direction singer and captioned it: ‘Happy 1st Father’s Day Liam.”
“You are the most amazing daddy and the best example for our son.”
“The way he looks at you says it all.”
“Your relationship melts my heart.”
“You are the center of his world and we adore you.’Happy 1st Father's Day Liam.. You are the most amazing daddy and the best example for our son.”


"What do you think of Cheryl Cole's first father's Day tribute to her little father Liam?"
"Cheryl (@ cherylofficial) posted a post at 8:09 a.m. on June 18, 2017 (Wednesday, March 22, Pacific time). Liam and I became the parents of a very beautiful and healthy baby boy, who weighed 7 pounds and 9 and looked like a dream."
Fans may have known that the singer gave birth to their son bear in March
"Cheryl posted a black-and-white photo of a former one-way singer with the title:" Liam, happy first father's day. "
"You are the best dad and the best role model for our son."
"The way he looks at you says everything."
"Your relationship melts my heart."
"You are the center of his world, we worship you.".. You are the best dad and the best role model for our son. "



Number  118
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Maniac star went on: 'But the friendship is shifting and changing, you know, so that part is something that we're both very proud of.'”
“Wow!”
“And on Monday, Justin Theroux, 47, cut a casual figure as he was spotted out and about in Paris with American actress and model Laura Harrier, 28.”
“The actor looked sombre as he strolled through the streets of the French capital clad in a muted ensemble.”
“Who's that girl?”
“Justin Theroux, 47, cut a casual figure as he was spotted out and about in Paris with American actress and model Laura Harrier, 28Justin teamed black skinny jeans with a coordinating T-shirt, and wrapped up with a khaki bomber jacket.”
“The Mute star donned well-worn black biker boots as he hunted down take-away coffee with his female companion.”
“The handsome actor sported a full moustache and beard, styled his hair into messy spikes, and shielded his eyes with gold-framed shades.”
“In stark contrast to Justin's low-key look, Laura ensured that she didn't go unnoticed by opting to wear a bold pillar-box red outfit.”
“Standing out: In stark contrast to Justin's low-key look, Laura ensured that she didn't go unnoticed by opting to wear a bold pillar-box red outfitWhat's on your mind?”


"The crazy star continued: 'but friendship is changing, you know, so we're all very proud of this part.'"
"Wow
"On Monday, Justin Theroux, 47, was found dressed casually while hanging out in Paris with American actress and model Laura Harrier, 28."
"The actor, dressed in a silent costume, strolled through the streets of the French capital with a gloomy look."
"Who is that girl?"
"Justin Theroux, 47, looks casual as he walks up and down with American actress Laura harrier in Paris. Justin Theroux, 28, matches black skinny jeans with a coordinated T-shirt and wraps them in a khaki Baseball Jacket."
"The mute star was wearing worn-out black motorcycle boots and was looking for takeout coffee with his girlfriend."
The handsome actor had a bushy beard, his hair was combed into messy spikes, and his eyes were covered with gold frames
"In sharp contrast to Justin's low-key style, Laura chose to wear a bold red column box suit to ensure that she would not be ignored."
"Stand out: in sharp contrast to Justin's low-key look, Laura chooses to wear a bold red suit with a pillar box to make sure she won't be ignored. What are you thinking?"



Number  119
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Watch the Avengers croon their new theme song above.”
““Shut up!” Hemsworth pitched back from his own Brady Bunch box.”
“Hello brother thrown Hemsworth s way...”
“And this group was labeled the Avengers that s the way we all became the Marvel Bunch The super crew got a last minute addition from the one and only Loki Tom Hiddleston who punctuated the song with a signature...”
“...simple singing Wakanda Forever So then one day all the heroes were assembled to fight a villain who packed much more than a punch the cast chorused...”
“In comes Chris Pratt claiming Star Lord as the greatest to ever walk the Earth by far Anthony Mackie and Benedict Cumberbatch sang their own introductions a falcon and a magic doctor respectively while Chadwick Boseman kept it sweet and...”
“Downey was joined by a former Russian spy (Scarlett Johansson), a God of Thunder (Chris Hemsworth), and one who “fought in World War II,” (Chris Evans).”
“The song began at the beginning, and in the beginning, there was Robert Downey Jr. “Here’s the story of a playboy genius who was gearing up to form some sort of crew,” he sang.”
“On The Tonight Show Starring Jimmy Fallon, the cast of Avengers: Infinity War proved they were Earth’s Mightiest Heroes by doing double duty, showing off their musical chops and explaining the origin of the Marvel Cinematic Universe.”
“Avengers: Infinity War type MovieThe Avengers really are one big, happy family.”


"Watch the Avengers murmur over their new theme song."
"Shut up! "Hansworth dropped it from his own Brady box."
"Hello, hansworth's brother..."
"These people are labeled Avengers. That's how we became miracle. The super crew got a new member from the only rocky Tom sidleston at the last minute, who signed the song..."
“… Simply sing vakanda forever, so one day all the heroes gather together to fight a villain, who has more fists than the actors in the chorus... "
"Chris Pratt claims that the star Lord is the greatest man to walk on earth so far. Anthony McKee and Benedict Cumberbatch sang their own introductions of Falcon and magician respectively, while Chadwick Bosman kept sweet and
Along with Downey are a former Russian spy (Scarlett Johansen), a Thor (Chris Hemsworth) and a man who "participated in World War II" (Chris Evans)
"This song started from the beginning. At the beginning, it was Robert Downey Jr." "It's the story of a playboy genius who's getting ready to form some kind of team," he sang
In the tonight show starring Jimmy Fallon, the actors of Avenger: Infinite War prove that they are the most powerful heroes on earth through their dual responsibilities, demonstrating their musical talents and explaining the origin of the miracle movie world
Avengers: Infinite War type Avengers are a happy family



Number  120
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““It’s not serious, but they have fun together.”But according to a second source, Wilkinson is “playing the field.”“Kendra’s been talking to a bunch of different guys and having fun after her split,” that source told PEOPLE about the Kendra On Top star.”
““They met earlier in the summer and Kendra thought he was cute.”RELATED VIDEO: Kendra Wilkinson Files for Divorce from Hank Baskett After Almost 9 Years of Marriage“They’ve just been getting to know each other,” the insider added.”
“Wilkinson gave an update on her split from husband Hank Baskett on Monday, saying she signed her “last divorce paper” on Friday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Signed my last divorce paper Friday.”
“Brutal,” she tweeted.”
““I gave it all I got.”
“Truly did.”
“I’m beyond proud of myself!!”
“Fought to save til the last second.”


"It's not serious, but they're happy together." But according to another source, Wilkinson is "playing games." "Kendra has been chatting with a group of different men and is very happy after the breakup," the source told people about Kendra in top star
"They met early in the summer and Kendra thought he was cute." Related video: Kendra Wilkinson filed for divorce with hank Bassett, and nearly nine years after her marriage, "they're just beginning to get to know each other," people familiar with the matter added
Wilkinson revealed on Monday the latest news of her breakup with her husband Hank Basquet, saying she signed "the last divorce agreement" on Friday
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"My last divorce agreement was signed on Friday."
"Cruel," she tweeted
"I gave it all."
"Really."
"I'm very proud of myself!"
"Fight to save until the last second."



Number  121
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““At that moment I felt very powerless and scared but didn’t want to act that way hoping that I was wrong about the situation.”
“She said it wasn’t and wouldn’t be for a bit and I should go to his room.”
“"I still got the part for the film and always thought that he gave it to me because of what happened."”
“I stopped him and managed to get out of the room.”
“Cara said she told Weinstein she had to leave, adding: "He walked me to the door and stood in front of it and tried to kiss me on the lips.”
“At first she was "relieved" to discover another woman in the hotel room, but he then asked the pair to "kiss" and the other woman "began some sort of advances upon his direction."”
“5 Hollywood producer Harvey Weinstein is at the centre of sexual harassment and assault claims by a string of women Credit: AP:Associated PressCara said she felt "powerless and scared" but hoped she was "wrong about the situation" so she followed him up.”
“"He then invited me to his room."”
“The model wrote: "As soon as we were alone he began to brag about all the actresses he had slept with and how he had made their careers and spoke about other inappropriate things of a sexual nature.”
“She explained how she met up with him a year later to discuss a film at the hotel with him and a director, who left - leaving Cara, who came out as bisexual in 2015, and Weinstein alone.”


"At that moment, I felt very weak and afraid, but I didn't want to do that. I hope my view of the situation is wrong."
"She said not at all. I should go to his room."
"I still got the part in this movie, and I always thought that he gave it to me because of what happened."
"I stopped him and managed to get out of the room."
Carla said she told Weinstein she had to leave, adding: "he walked me to the door, stood in front of it and tried to kiss my lips."
At first, when she found another woman in the hotel room, she felt "relieved", but then he asked them to "kiss", and the other woman "made some request to him."
"5 Hollywood producer Harvey Weinstein is at the center of a series of female sexual harassment and assault charges: Credit: Associated Press: The Associated Press said she felt" powerless and scared "but hoped she" had the wrong view of the situation, "so she followed him
"Then he invited me to his room."
"When we were alone, he began to brag about all the actresses he had slept with and how he had achieved their careers, as well as about other inappropriate sexual matters," the model wrote
"She explained how she met him a year later and discussed a movie with him and a director in a hotel, who left - leaving Carla, who made her debut as bisexual in 2015, and Weinstein was alone."



Number  122
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sign up for our newsletter to get the latest updates on Kate Middleton, Meghan Markle and more!”
“Can’t get enough of PEOPLE’s Royals coverage?”
“On Friday, before heading to Windsor ahead of their wedding, Prince Harry picked several flowers from the couple’s private garden at their home at Kensington Palace.”
“He gave them to florist Philippa Craddock to be added to her bespoke bridal bouquet.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Don’t miss out!”
“Tune in to Meghan and Harry – a Fairy-Tale Wedding on Saturday, May 19, starting at 6 a.m. ET/ 3 a.m. PT on PeopleTV — now available on PeopleTV.com and on your favorite streaming device.”
“Her beautiful bouquet also had a tribute to Princess Diana, Harry’s mother: the inclusion of Forget-Me-Nots, Diana’s favorite flowers.”
“According to the palace, the use of the Forget-Me-Nots was intentional to honor Diana’s memory on the couple’s wedding day.”
“Image zoom Prince Charles and Meghan Markle walking down the aisleIt’s the event of the year!”


"Sign up for our newsletters and get the latest news from Kate Middleton, Megan markel and others!"
"Is there not enough coverage of the royal family?"
On Friday, Prince Harry went to Windsor before his wedding and picked some flowers in their private garden at Kensington Palace
"He gave them to Philippa Craddock, the florist, and added them to her custom bridal bouquet."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Don't miss it!"
"Listen to Meghan and Harry – the fairy tale wedding on Saturday, May 19, starting at 6:00 a.m. EST / 3:00 a.m. Pacific time – now watch people's TV network on your favorite streaming device on peopletv."
"Her beautiful bouquet also pays tribute to Princess Diana and Harry's mother, including Princess Diana's favorite flower, forget me not."
"According to the palace," forget me "is used to commemorate the memory of the Diana couple's wedding day."
"Picture zooming Prince Charles and Megan markel are walking down the aisle. It's a big event of the year!"



Number  123
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Regardless of their purpose in The Walking Dead Season 9, it will just be nice to have Shane, Sasha, and Hershel back.”
“But if a show’s most important character is leaving said show, what better way to do so then to have him shepherded off into the sunset (metaphorical or literal) by a host of specters from the show’s past?”
“Maybe nothing!”
“What do Shane, Sasha, and Hershel’s arrivals have to do with Andrew Lincoln as Rick Grimes leaving?”
“Kang then went a step further and revealed that Scott Wilson and Sonequa Martin-Green will be returning as their respective characters, Hershel and Sasha.”
“At The Walking Dead‘s appearance at New York Comic Con 2018 on Saturday night, new showrunner Angel Kang confirmed that former Walking Dead cast member Jon Bernthal will reprise his role of Shane in the show’s ninth season.”
“It’s starting to really sound like Rick Grimes may get the sendoff he deserves in The Walking Dead Season 9.”


"Whatever their purpose in season 9 of walking dead, it's great to get Shane, Sasha and Herschel back."
"But if the most important character of a show is going to leave said, what better way is there for him to be brought into the sunset (metaphorically or literally) by a lot of ghosts of the past?"
"Maybe nothing!"
"When Rick Grimes leaves, what does the arrival of Shane, Sasha and Herschel have to do with Andrew Lincoln?"
Later, Kangjian further revealed that Scott Wilson and Sonica Martin Green will play Herschel and Sasha respectively
"On Saturday night, rookie host Angel Kang confirmed that former" walking dead "actor Jon Bernthal will play Shane again in the ninth season of the show at the 2018 New York comics conference."
"It sounds like Rick Grimes might get the punishment he deserves in season 9 of the walking dead."



Number  124
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“According to People, Kardashian will be wearing a dressed designed by Vivienne Westwood, and although West won't be by her side, I'm definitely looking forward to seeing Kardashian on the red carpet.”
“Everything is great with him and Kim and he’s supportive of her going solo."”
“Well, according to People and confirmed by her rep to Bustle, Kardashian will be in attendance, but she'll be walking the red carpet without West, who will reportedly be staying in home with the couple's children, North and Saint.”
“Bustle has reached out to a rep for West for comment, but did not receive a response at the time of publication.”
“West and Kardashian first attended the Met Gala together in 2013 and were probably the most talked about attendees that year because of the internet's obsession with the floral print dress Kardashian wore.”
“Each subsequent year the two have been side by side on the red carpet, so it's a little surprising that West won't be joining his wife for what many call the fashion event of the year.”
“"Kanye West will not be attending the Met Ball," a source claimed to People.”
“"He’ll be staying back in L.A. with their kids.”
“Although she'll be walking the red carpet without her husband, Kardashian probably won't be going to the gala all by herself, as other members of her famous family are also said to be going to the event.”
“The theme of this year's exhibit is Rei Kawakubo/Comme des Garçons: The Art of the In-Between, and pieces in the museum will be arranged by contrasting themes like East/West, male/female, and past/present, according to Vogue.”


"According to people familiar with the matter, Kardashian will wear a dress designed by Vivian Westwood. Although West will not be with her, I am definitely looking forward to seeing Kardashian on the red carpet."
"Everything is fine with him and Kim. He supports her to fly alone."
"Well, according to people, and confirmed by Kardashian's representative bast, Kardashian will attend the wedding, but she will walk the red carpet without West, who is reported to be staying at home with the couple's children, North and saint."
"Bustle has contacted a West representative for comment, but did not get a response at the time of publication."
"The first time west and Kardashian attended the metropolitan party together was in 2013, and they were probably the most watched participants that year because of the Internet's obsession with Kardashian's printed dress."
"Every year after that, the two will walk on the red carpet side by side, so it's a bit surprising that west won't go to what many people call the annual fashion event with his wife."
"Kanye West is not going to the met," a source told people
"He will stay in Los Angeles with their children."
"Although Kardashian will walk the red carpet without a husband, she may not go to the party alone because it is said that other members of her family will also go to the event."
"The theme of this year's exhibition is REI Kawakubo / comme des Gar à ons:The Art  According to vogue magazine, the works in the museum will be arranged according to different themes such as East and West, male / female, past / present, etc



Number  125
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Whatever the occasion, browse the 91 best gift ideas for women until you’ve ticked them all off your list (and maybe, just maybe, stumbled across a few great gift ideas for yourself too).”
“A “just because” gift is always welcome—and arguably more impactful than a prompted one.”
“And might we add: You definitely don’t need a special occasion like an anniversary, Valentine’s Day, or even the start of her zodiac season to bust out the ribbons.”
“From sustainable jewelry to face mask accessories, we corralled dozens of thoughtful gifts for women—no matter whom you’re shopping for or what your budget is.”
“...worst of times...”
“After all with so much that s happened over the last year a truly thoughtful present sent from afar or handed off from a safe six foot distance proves you can be her silver lining even in the weirdest and...”
“When it comes to gifting your mom, sister, work wife, or any other leading lady in your circle, the best gifts for women are more about making a considerate gesture than finding a shiny object for the ’Gram.”


"No matter what the occasion, browse through 91 gift ideas that are most suitable for women until you check them out of your list (maybe, just maybe, you also come across some good gift ideas that are suitable for you."
"A 'just because' gift is always popular, which can be said to be more influential than a suggestive gift."
"We can add: you absolutely don't need special occasions like anniversaries, Valentine's day, or even the beginning of the zodiac season to untie the ribbon."
"From sustainable jewelry to mask accessories, we collect dozens of thoughtful gifts for women, no matter who you shop for or how much you budget."
“… At the worst... "
"After all, so much happened last year that a truly thoughtful gift from a distance or from a safe place six feet away proves that even in the strangest and most dangerous situations, you can be a glimmer of hope for her..."
"When you want to give a gift to your mother, sister, working wife or other heroine in your circle, the best gift for a woman is more to make a thoughtful gesture than to find a shining object for Ke."



Number  126
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But in case you're missing her long lengths already, here's a look back at her most memorable hair looks...”
“Kudos to Kate for mixing things up.”
“It's been styled in her trademark bouncy waves, or as he'd call it: a Chelsea blowout.”
“The evidence?”
“AdvertisementBy our expert eye we're going to guess it was the work of her long-term hairdresser Richard Ward.”
“Getty ImagesThe Duchess of Cambridge arrived to kick off the tennis tournament today with her dark locks cut into a sleek, long bob.”
“So the new look she debuted at Wimbledon classifies as a pretty major makeover.”
“Over the years - bar a few extra highlights and a grown out fringe - she's stuck to her guns with her long, bouncy curls.”
“Kate Middleton definitely falls in the camp of famous people with a signature hairstyle.”


"But in case you have missed her long hair, let's review her most unforgettable hairstyle..."
"It's wonderful that Kate has mixed things up."
"It's her signature jump wave style, or as he put it: the blowout at Chelsea."
"Evidence?"
"Our professionals speculate that this is the work of Richard Ward, who has been working in hairdressing for a long time."
The Duchess of Cambridge came to the tennis tournament today. Her dark hair was cut into a long smooth one
"So the new look that she made her debut at Wimbledon is considered a considerable makeover."
"Over the years, in addition to some extra highlights and mature tassels, she has been sticking to her gun with her long, elastic curly hair."
"Kate Middleton is definitely a celebrity with a signature haircut."



Number  127
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“The actress-pop star attended Thursday night's Billboard Latin Music Awards, where she accepted two honors, including the Telemundo Star Award, an accolade reserved for a musician with accomplishments far outreaching the musical world.”
“And while Jennifer has built an impressive acting career — Selena and The Wedding Planner are classics — she also deserves a moment of appreciation for her ~fierce~ red-carpet contributions.”
“As seen last night.”
“Getty ImagesThe 47-year-old wore a dress from Welsh designer Julien Macdonald's fall 2017 ready-to-wear collection — if you could even call it a dress.”
“Getty ImagesHow does it stay up?”
“How does it stay put?”
“What is this garment made of?”
“Is it itchy?”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
The actress and pop star took part in the billboard Latin Music Awards on Thursday night, and she won two awards, including the telemundo Star Award, an honor reserved for a musician who has made great achievements in music
"Although Jennifer's acting career is impressive - Selena and the wedding planner are classics, her contribution on the red carpet deserves a moment's appreciation."
"Just like I saw last night."
"Getty Images this 47 year old woman is wearing a dress from Welsh designer Julien MacDonald's fall 2017 ready to wear collection - if you can call it a skirt."
"Getty imageshow can it stay up late?"
"How does it stay the same?"
"What is this dress made of?"
"Itchy?"



Number  128
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““But that’s not the case.””
““In my mind, you are and there would be nothing wrong with that.”“There would be nothing wrong with that,” Cannon replied.”
““Are you and Mariah still sleeping together?” Williams asked the former America’s Got Talent host.”
“That said, they’re not that close.”
““It was a ‘Fantasy.’ They was dancing … to ‘Fantasy.’”The exes, despite their 2014 split, are still the “best of friends,” Cannon told Williams.”
““When they was born, she made me play her music as they was coming out,” he continued.”
““She shut the whole hospital down!”Cannon, who shares 5-year-old twins Monroe and Moroccan with the “We Belong Together” singer, added that Carey had specific requests while in the delivery room as well.”
““Have twins,” Cannon told Williams when asked the “60 degree” question.”
“Nick Cannon revealed to Wendy Williams during an appearance on her talk show on Thursday, April 26, the “most diva” thing he’s ever seen the self-proclaimed diva do.”
“When you’ve been married to Mariah Carey, you’ve likely seen it all.”


"But that's not the case."
"In my opinion, if you are like this, there's nothing wrong with that." "There's nothing wrong with that," cannon replied
"Are you still sleeping with Maria?"? "Williams asked the former American talent host."
"In other words, they're not that close."
"It's a fantasy. They are dancing For fantasy. " Cannon told Williams that although they broke up in 2014, the two ex girlfriends are still "best friends"
"When they were born, she asked me to play her music when they came out," he continued
"She shut down the whole hospital! Cannon, who shares five-year-old twins Monroe and Moroccan blood with the "we belong together" singer, added that Kelly also had special requirements in the delivery room
"Twins," cannon told Williams when asked about "60 degrees."
On Thursday, April 26, Nick Cannon revealed to Wendy Williams on her talk show that it was the "most beautiful" thing Wendy Williams, who claimed to be the queen, had ever done
"When you marry Maria Kelly, you may have seen everything."



Number  129
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Fantastic Woman First They Killed My Father In the Fade WINNER Loveless The Square Best Animated Feature Film The Boss Baby The Breadwinner Ferdinand Coco WINNER Loving Vincent Advertisement...”
“And Steve really did have his chest waxed for the scene.”
“And the singer, 35, and actor, 55, seemed to hit it off as they were spotted laughing during a commercial break at the Beverly Hilton Hotel in Los Angeles.”
“Steve had famously yelled Kelly's name in 2005's 40-Year-Old Virgin during a chest waxing scene and she has always wanted to discuss it with him.”
“Finally!”
“Kelly Clarkson finally met Steve Carell at the 2018 Golden Globes on SundayDuring an interview with Sunday Today in November, Kelly said: 'I have yet to meet Steve Carell and I want to be like, "So, was it a compliment?"”
“'Like, I dunno, like, you're in pain and you think of Kelly Clarkson.'”
“'It was pretty hilarious,' she said.”
“'I do feel gypped though, 'cause I never met him and I'm a huge fan.'”
“And now that the two have met, fans of both entertainers took to social media to express their delight.”


"Amazing woman first they killed my father in fading champion loveless Plaza best animated feature boss baby breadwinner Ferdinand decoco champion love Vincent advertisement..."
"Steve did wax his chest for the scene."
The 35 year old singer and 55 year old actor were found laughing at a business event at the Beverly Hilton Hotel in Los Angeles. They seemed to get along well
"Steve yelled Kelly's name when he waxed his chest in 2005's 40 year old virgin, and she always wanted to discuss it with him."
"At last
"Kelly Clarkson finally met Steve Carrell at the 2018 Golden Globe Awards on Sunday. In an interview on Sunday today, November, Kelly said: 'I haven't met Steve Carrell yet. I want to say,' so, is this a compliment? '"
"For example, I don't know. For example, if you are in pain, you will think of Kelly Clarkson."
"It's so funny," she said
"But I'm really confused because I've never met him and I'm a big fan of him."
"Now that they have met, fans of both artists have expressed their joy through social media."



Number  130
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Anything he needs me to do, I'll do it.”
“I'm not only there to be a pretty face -- I'm actually contributing to the tour, handling the merch, etc.”
“We can be around each other non-stop and not be at each other’s throats like, 'Oh my gosh, I gotta get away from you.'”
“He makes me laugh, which is really important.”
“We're also both adventurous, outdoorsy.”
“Family is really important to him and it's really important to me as well.”
“"I love the way he treats his family, he takes care of his mother, he takes care of his father.”
“"I'm always proud of him," she continued.”
“I ended up just giving in one day, and honestly, we've been inseparable ever since."”
“"He kept pressing our mutual friend like, 'Just tell her to come chill with me at the studio, I just want to meet her.'”


"I'll do whatever he wants me to do."
"I'm not just there to have a beautiful face - I'm actually contributing to the tour, dealing with merchandise and so on."
"We can be together all the time, not like, 'oh my God, I have to leave you.'"
"He makes me laugh, which is really important."
"We all like adventure and outdoor activities."
"Family is really important to him and to me."
"I like the way he treats his family, he takes care of his mother, he takes care of his father."
"I'm always proud of him," she continued
"One day I gave in. To be honest, we've been together ever since."
"He kept urging our mutual friend to say," tell her to go to the studio with me. Calm down. I just want to see her. "



Number  131
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Grade the ladies’ performance below, then drop a comment with your full review.”
“So, did Pink and Clarkson’s duet live up to the hype?”
““If I did a song with Kelly Clarkson, I would get outsung,” Pink told host Andy Cohen — a fear she apparently conquered prior to Sunday’s performance.”
“...for the original American Idol winner...”
“Here s one possibility During a recent episode of Bravo s Watch What Happens Live a fan basically begged Pink to team up with Clarkson for a remake of Barba Streisand and Donna Summer s 1979 jam No More Tears Enough Is Enough which prompted Pink to profess her admiration...”
“Online Brasil (@eonlinebrasil) November 20, 2017–But to whom should we give credit for inspiring this magical mashup?”
“#TapeteVermelhoE #AMAs pic.twitter.com/xtqiL4seoZ — E!”
“...a nation Watch footage of their duet below which we ll update with an official video when it becomes available Kelly Clarkson e Pink uma dupla poderosa mostrando pro mundo todo o poder de suas vozes...”
“They ran towards the danger when it would have been so easy to run away Lastly before introducing the singers he said We look forward to 2018 with hope for even as we mourn those who we lost we know this Together we can unite as a people and as...”
““In those moments of crisis, heroes emerged,” he said, before introducing several first responders.”


"Rate the performance of the lady below and leave a message in the full comment."
"So, does Pinker and Clarkson's duet live up to expectations?"
"If I sing a song with Kelly Clarkson, I'll make it," Pinker told host Andy Cohen, who apparently overcame that fear before Sunday's performance
“… For the original American idol champion... "
"Here's a possibility. In the latest episode of what happened at Bravo's observation scene, a fan basically asked Pinker to work with Clarkson to remake Baba Streisand Donna summer's 1979 jam no more tears, which is enough for Pinker to express his admiration..."
"Online Brazil (@ eonlinebrasil) November 20, 2017 - but who should we credit for inspiring this magical mashup?"
"# tapetevermelhoe # AMAS pic.twitter.com/xtqiL4seoZ -E！”
“… A country to watch their duet, below we'll update with the official video when it becomes available with kailik laksen e pink UMA Dupla podro SA mostrando Pro Mundo todo podsuyas vomit... "
"They rushed to danger, it was easy to escape, and finally introduced the singer, he said, we look forward to 2018 with hope, even if we mourn those who lost, we know that we can unite as a nation and as..."
"In those moments of crisis, heroes appeared," he said, and then introduced several emergency personnel



Number  132
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Be sure to follow Zimbio (@zimbio) on Twitter and Instagram for all the latest 2018 TV Couples March Madness Challenge updates!”
“The full tournament schedule is listed below.”
“Scroll down and click through our interactive bracket to vote, and don’t forget to spread the word to help determine which of our 64 first-round teams will advance to Round 2.”
“So grab some snacks and start building your voting den because now’s the time to compete and represent your glorious fandoms, people!”
“Whatever the outcome may be, one thing’s for sure: This is going to be one hell of a competition!”
“Of course, there’s always room for a surprise upset, thanks to heavy-weight couples and first-time nominees Betty and Jughead from Riverdale and Waverly and Nicole from Wynonna Earp.”
“Will Supergirl’s Kara and Lena continue their impressive dominance, or will last year’s beloved runners-up, Emma and Regina from Once Upon a Time, finally get their moment in the spotlight?”
“Of course, 2018 is shaping up to be more competitive than ever, so anything can happen this time around!”
“The 100’s Clarke and Lexa snagged the much sought-after top spot last year for their second, consecutive win.”
“Well, that’s totally up to you.”


"Be sure to follow Zimbio (@ Zimbio) on Twitter and instagram to learn about all the latest TV couple March 2018 crazy challenge updates!"
"The full schedule of the competition is listed below."
"Scroll down and click on our interactive brackets to vote, and don't forget to spread information to help determine which of the 64 first round teams will make it to the second round."
"So, grab a snack and start building your voting room, because it's time to compete and represent your fans, everyone!"
"Whatever the outcome, one thing is for sure: it's going to be a hell of a competition!"
"Of course, there are always surprises, thanks to overweight couples and first-time nominees Betty and jahid from Riverdale, as well as Weasley and Nicole from winonaupe."
Will super girl Kara and Lina continue their impressive dominance, or will last year's favorite runners up Emma and Regina finally become the focus of attention
"Of course, 2018 is more competitive than ever, so anything can happen this time!"
"Top 100 players Clark and LexA won the second consecutive title last year and won the most sought after position at the top of the list."
"Well, it's up to you."



Number  133
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She wore her shoulder length hair down, and appeared to have just a minimal amount of makeup upon her striking complexion...”
“Low-key!”
“But Katie Holmes proved she is still grounded after 20 years in showbusiness as she hopped onto the subway in New York City on Thursday.”
“Despite being worth an estimated $25m, the actress, 39, joined scores of other commuters as she travelled from Manhattan's Downtown towards Uptown, kicked back in a sweltering subway car.”
“Scroll down for video Commuter life Katie Holmes proved she is still grounded after 20 years in showbusiness as she hopped onto the subway in New York City on Thursday Pulling out the 1968 tome Slouching Towards Bethlehem by Joan Didion the Dawson s Creek star blended in with her...”
“...fellow travellers as she leaned her head to one side...”
“Looking casually cool for the journey, the brunette beauty donned a peach blouse and flared jeans.”
“Her chestnut bob was styled in loose waves while her pretty features were enhanced with a minimal dusting of make-up.”
“Stepping off the subway, the ex-wife of Tom Cruise looked radiant as she met up with a pal.”
“Blending in Despite being worth an estimated 25m the actress 39 joined scores of other commuters as she travelled from Manhattan s Downtown towards Uptown kicked back in a sweltering subway car Keeping it casual Stepping off the subway the ex wife of Tom Cruise looked radiant as she met...”


"She has shoulder length hair, and seems to have very little makeup on her striking complexion..."
"Low key!"
"But Katie Holmes jumped on the subway in New York last Thursday, proving that she's still grounded after 20 years in the show business."
The 39 year old actress, who is worth about $25 million, returned on the sultry subway with dozens of other commuters on her way from downtown Manhattan to a residential area
"Rolling video commuter life of Katie Holmes proves that she is still grounded after 20 years of acting career, she jumped on the subway in New York City on Thursday, pulled out most of 1968, listless and headed to Bethlehem by Joan Dion Dawson stream star to blend in with her..."
"When she leans her head to one side, her colleagues..."
"On this trip, the brunette looks casual and cool in a peach coat and bell bottoms."
"Her maroon Bob shows off in loose waves, and her beautiful looks are enhanced with minimal makeup."
Walking off the subway, Tom Cruise's ex-wife glowed when she saw a friend
"The 39 year old actress, who is worth about 25 million pounds, went from downtown Manhattan to a residential area with dozens of other commuters, sat in a stuffy subway car and inadvertently stepped down the subway. Tom Cruise's ex-wife was radiant when she saw her.... "



Number  134
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“On the TV side, she recently guest-starred Fox’s musical drama Empire, which just wrapped its third season, and co-starred in the BBC/AcornTV miniseries Decline and Fall.”
“Repped by CAA and Brillstein Entertainment Partners, Longoria can currently be seen on the big screen in BH Tilt/Universal’s Lowriders opposite Demian Bichir.”
“MGM’s Cassidy Lange is overseeing the project, which is slated to begin production this week in Canada.”
“Fisher is producing with Ben Odell and Derbez via their 3Pas Studios banner.”
“Longoria will play Theresa, Kate’s employer at the pizza restaurant as well as her closest family friend and trusted confidant.”
“The role-reversal adaption follows a spoiled playboy (Derbez) from one of Mexico’s wealthiest families who falls overboard off his yacht and develops amnesia only to be convinced by Kate (Faris), a single, working class mom that he is her husband.”
“EXCLUSIVE: Desperate Housewives alum Eva Longoria is set to co-star opposite Anna Faris and Eugenio Derbez in Bob Fisher and Rob Greenberg’s romantic comedy Overboard, the MGM/ Pantelion Films re-imaging to the 1980s pic that starred Goldie Hawn and Kurt Russell.”


"On television, she recently made a cameo appearance in the fox musical Empire, which just ended its third season, and co starred in the BBC / acorn TV miniseries decline and fall."
"Represented by CAA and brillstein entertainment partners, langlia can now see BH tilt / Universal's lowrites vs. Demian bichir on the big screen."
Cassidy Lange of MGM is overseeing the project, which is due to start production in Canada this week
"Fischer is working with Ben Odell and debez to create banners through their 3pas studio."
"Longoria will play Theresa, Kate's employer at the pizza restaurant, as well as her closest family friend and trusted confidant."
"Character reversal" is adapted from a spoiled Playboy (debez), who comes from one of Mexico's richest families. He falls off a yacht and suffers from amnesia. As a result, he is convinced by his single working-class mother Kate (Faris) that he is her husband
Exclusive: Desperate Housewives alumni Eva Longoria will co star with Anna Faris and Eugenio debez in Bob Fisher and rob Greenberg's romantic comedy falling into the water, and MGM / pantellion's films will reproduce the films starring Goldie horn and Kurt Russell in the 1980s



Number  135
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““He seems fine with it.”Image zoom Hailey Baldwin and Justin Bieber | Credit: Jon Kopaloff/FilmMagic; Jason Merritt/GettyImage zoom Justin BieberOn Sunday, Bieber honored his dad for Father’s Day by sharing throwback photo on Instagram, which was liked by the model.”
““Justin has no contact with Selena now,” added the source.”
“Days after a source told PEOPLE that the 24-year-old singer and the 21-year-old model are not an item despite spending a ton of time together in recent weeks, the two were spotted passionately kissing in Brooklyn’s Domino Park in a video obtained by TMZ.”
“Leaning against a handrail next to New York City’s East River, the duo wrapped their arms around each other in front of parkgoers.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The stars continued their PDA spree in Manhattan later that night, kissing in Rockefeller Park as Baldwin sat on Bieber’s lap, according to another photo posted by the outlet.”
“Bieber even shared a photo of the Big Apple outing via Instagram.”
“However, Baldwin’s head is cropped out of the photo of him crouching while appearing to chat with a child.”
“The pair were seen in N.Y.C.”
“...earlier this week, when they left the pop star’s hotel and made a Starbucks run, waving at the paparazzi.”


"He looks good." Photo zooming Hayley Baldwin and Justin Bieber | photo source: Jon coparov / filmmagic; Jason Merritt / gettyimagezoom Justin Bieber shared his father's Day retrospective photo on instagram on Sunday, which was loved by the model
"Justin is not in touch with Selena right now," the source added
"In recent weeks, a source told people that although the 24-year-old singer and the 21-year-old model spent a lot of time together, they were not the same thing. A few days later, in a video obtained by TMZ, they were kissing in domino Park in Brooklyn."
"The two leaned on the handrails of the East River in New York City, embracing each other in front of park visitors."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
According to another photo released by the media, the stars continued their palmtop Carnival in Manhattan later that night, kissing in Rockefeller Park, with Baldwin sitting on Bieber's lap
"Bieber even shared a photo of big apple on the road through instagram."
"However, Baldwin's head was cut from a picture of him squatting and chatting with a child."
"They were seen in New York City."
“…… Earlier this week, when they left the pop star's Hotel, ran into Starbucks and waved to the paparazzi



Number  136
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She now stands as a powerful symbol of what all famous women are subjected to -- and offers an impressive example of how to fight back.”
“Then there was the pièce de résistance: the Amber Rose SlutWalk.”
“Rose is, after all, an unforgettable-looking woman, one who had been making a name for herself as a video and print model before Kanye had even met her.”
“(He went out of his way to get an introduction after her striking appearance in the "What Them Girls Like" video by Ludacris.)”
“As it stands, it is true that real, paparazzi-level celebrity only arrived on Rose's doorstep when Kanye did, and then her relationship with Khalifa kept her in the spotlight as a trophy wife until their split in 2014.”
“During this time, Rose tried her hand at everything from music and random reality TV guest spots, to a clothing line -- all with limited success.”
“Rose appeared, for years, like a genetically-blessed celebrity girlfriend who had little to offer the world other than her stunning style and penchant for fueling gossip.”
“So it's ironic that Rose seemingly only found her footing and her calling once she was single and after she'd been raked over the coals in public one too many times.”
“Remarkably, in the last two years, Amber Rose hasn't just landed on her feet, she's strapped some spiky high-heeled boots on those suckers and trampled over every hater in her vicinity, in an astonishingly defiant manner.”
“The shift started when she showed up to 2015's VMAs wearing a body suit covered in female-specific insults.”


"She is now a powerful symbol of the suffering of all famous women and provides an impressive example of how to fight back."
"And then there's the resistance: Amber and rose silt."
"After all, rose is an unforgettable woman. Before Kanye met her, she became famous as a photocopy model."
"(in Ludacris's" what do they like "video, after her dramatic appearance, he went out of his way to find someone to introduce her.)
"At the moment, it's true that real paparazzi Celebrities only show up when Kanye comes to Ross's house, and then her relationship with Halifa keeps her in the spotlight as a trophy wife until they break up in 2014."
"During this time, rose tried everything from music to random reality show guest shows to clothing series - but with little success."
"Over the years, rose has appeared like a genetically lucky celebrity girlfriend. Apart from her amazing style and love of gossip, she has little to offer to the world."
"So, ironically, rose seems to have found her foothold and sense of belonging only when she was single, after she was ransacked too many times in public."
"It's worth noting that in the past two years, amber rose has not only stood up, but also tied some pointed high-heeled boots to those idiots, trampling on every hater around her in a surprising provocative way."
"The transformation began when she appeared on Vmas in 2015 wearing a tights insulted by women."



Number  137
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
“Later, the star posted a sexy rear-view photo to Instagram with a lyrical reference caption: “This is how we do it down in Puerto Rico.”One thing’s for sure, this girls trip is nothing short of down and dirty!”
“The clip was shot from a distance and blurred over, but it’s obvious Kourt was naked from head to toe.”
“After videos featuring nipple clamps and sex toys alongside sister Kim, the 38-year-old mother of three posted a NSFW video of herself rolling around naked in a shallow pool.”
“Kourtney Kardashian‘s Mexican birthday getaway just hit the maximum level of wet and wild!”
“Kourtney Kardashian Rolls Around NAKED In Mexico Pool Is the star getting out of control?”
“Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)Click to share on Facebook (Opens in new window)Wet & Wild Skinny Dipping!”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"We pay for interesting information!"
"Later, the star posted a sexy back view photo on instagram with a lyrical reference:" that's what we did in Puerto Rico. " One thing's for sure, this girl's journey is just dirty
"This video was taken from a distance, and it's blurred, but it's clear that Kurt is naked from head to foot."
The 38 year old mother of three released a video of herself rolling naked in a shallow pool after playing a video
"Kurtany Kardashian's birthday trip to Mexico has just reached the highest level of humidity and wildness!"
"Kurtany Kardashian rolls naked in a Mexican swimming pool. Is the star out of control?"
"Click Share on twitter (open in a new window) Click share on Facebook (open in a new window) wet & Wild nude swimming!"



Number  138
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This story originally appeared on the New York Post and is republished here with permission.”
“5 long before he popped the question to McPhee.”
“While celebrating her first marriage to Nick Cokas in February 2008, McPhee serenaded Cokas with a rendition of Nat King Cole and Natalie Cole’s Unforgettable at their lavish wedding reception, with Grammy-winning producer Foster on the keys, People reported this week, resurfacing a photo of the performance.”
“In May 2014, McPhee filed for divorce from Cokas after six years of marriage.”
“The 34-year-old “American Idol” alum confirmed her engagement to Foster, 68, on Tuesday.”
““He did it at the top of this mountain in Anacapri [Italy].”
“Totally dark only stars,” she revealed in a text exchange (via Instagram) with Just Jared’s Jared Eng, before joking: “Thankfully he didn’t push me off the cliff.”
“He said it was one or the other.”
“And in the end he spared me.”Following news of the engagement, Foster’s daughters took to social media, where Erin, 35, jokingly called her future stepmom “Mommyyyy.” Sara, 37, also wrote, “Out of the country.”
“What did I miss?”This isn’t the first time Erin and Sara have played around with Foster and McPhee’s relationship status.”


"This story first appeared in the New York Post and was reprinted here with permission."
"Five minutes before he proposed to McPhee."
"In February 2008, while celebrating his first marriage to Nick kokas, McPhee serenaded him, singing Nat King Cole and Natalie Cole's "unforgettable," with Grammy award winning producer foster as the lead singer, and this week people magazine reported that the picture of the performance appeared again
"In May 2014, McPhee filed for divorce after six years of marriage with corcas."
The 34 year old "American Idol" alumnus confirmed her engagement to foster, 68, on Tuesday
"He did it on the top of Anacapri (Italy)," he said
In a text message exchange with Jared eng of just Jared, she revealed: "there are only dark stars at all," and then joked, "fortunately, he didn't push me off the cliff."
"He said this or that."
"At last he let me go." When Foster's daughters learned of the engagement, on social media, Irene, 35, jokingly called her future stepmother "mommyyy.". Sarah, 37, also wrote, "went abroad."
"What did I miss? "It's not the first time Erin and Sarah have played with foster and McPhee."



Number  139
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“• Starbucks to Eliminate Plastic Straws Globally by 2020 [Official]Related The state of straws around the world...”
“Plastic straws are kind of like a gateway plastic for every day citizens.”
“The chain, with more than 28,000 locations, is officially the largest food company in the world to make this promise, and has the power and influence to spur other restaurants of all sizes to follow in its footsteps.”
“Starbucks estimates that this move will eliminate the use of 1 billion plastic straws per year.”
“Starbucks says it will replace plastic straws with paper or compostable plastic straws for blended drinks like Frappuccinos.”
“These alternative straws will be available by request for customers who need or wish to use a straw.”
“Otherwise, for cold brew, nitro, and other iced drinks, the coffee company will offer strawless lids, which it designed and manufactures.”
“Already in use at more than 8,000 Starbucks stores, these lids look exactly like the tops to adult sippy cups, and, curiously are also made of plastic.”
“Still, environmentalists seem to be supporting Starbucks’ move.”
“As the founder of strawfree.org told the New York Times: “I think a lot of people feel overwhelmed by the magnitude of the plastic problem … Giving up plastic straws is a small step, and an easy thing for people to get started on.”


"Starbucks will phase out plastic straws worldwide by 2020 (official) is related to the global status of straws..."
"Plastic straws are a bit like plastic passageways for everyday citizens."
"With more than 28000 outlets, the chain has officially become the largest food company in the world to make this commitment, and has the ability and influence to encourage restaurants of other sizes to follow suit."
"Starbucks estimates that this move will eliminate the use of one billion plastic straws a year."
"Starbucks said it would replace plastic straws with paper or compostable plastic straws for mixing drinks such as ice cream."
"For customers who need or want to use straws, these alternative straws can be provided on request."
Otherwise, for cold brewed, nitro and other iced drinks, the coffee company will offer tubeless lids it designs and manufactures
"These covers as like as two peas in the adult straw cup have been used in more than 8000 Starbucks stores, and they are also made of plastic.
"However, environmentalists seem to support Starbucks' move."
"As a free website, he told the New York Times:" I think a lot of people are overwhelmed by the gravity of the plastic problem Giving up plastic straws is a small step and an easy thing for people to start with



Number  140
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Preview, below.”
“You can catch the full reading Wednesday at 8/7c.”
“It was very comforting to know that you know that she's still present in the universe, and she's somehow connected to me still," Lisa reflected about the supernatural encounter.”
“We learn that sometimes when we lose people.”
“"Life is so short, really.”
“It's a reveal that hits Lisa hard.”
“During the sit-down, Tyler reveals to the 90210 entrepreneur that while she may not always see evidence that her grandma is watching over her, she definitely is.”
“So you could imagine how emotional it was for The Real Housewives of Beverly Hills mom to reconnect with her late grandmother when she sat down with Tyler Henry on an upcoming episode of Hollywood Medium.”
“She's a devoted wife and mother who basically treats the crew of Vanderpump Rules like they are actually her own kids.”
“Lisa Vanderpump certainly knows how important family is.”


Preview, as shown below
"You can catch up to read the full text at 8:7 on Wednesday."
"It's very comforting to know that she still exists in the universe and that she still has some connection with me," Lisa recalled
"We know that sometimes we lose people."
"Life is really short."
"It's a big blow to Lisa."
"In the process of sitting down, Taylor revealed to 90210 entrepreneurs that although she may not always see evidence that grandma is taking care of her, she certainly is."
"So you can imagine how exciting it is for the Real Housewives of Beverly Hills to re-establish contact with their late grandmother when she and Tyler Henry sit down in an upcoming episode of the Hollywood media."
"She's a loyal wife and mother, basically treating the van der Pol crew as her own children."
"Lisa vandepham certainly knows how important family is."



Number  141
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Spider-Man soars because Holland gives him wings.”
“That’s the basic plot.”
“He may have the stuff to be an Avenger.”
“As for Peter’s mentor Tony Stark (Robert Downey, Jr.), the man known as Iron Man is reluctant to take the training wheels off this hormonal loose cannon.”
“But the film’s core relationship is between Peter and his best friend, Ned (Jacob Batalon), a science nerd who loses his shit when he finds out his buddy is Spider-Man.”
“For our hero, the guiding light in his life is his unusually attractive Aunt May (Marisa Tomei).”
“Even his genius schoolmate Michelle (Zendaya) laughs at his attempts to be cool.”
“As Peter Parker, the Queens, NY, sophomore who’s crushing on the school’s prettiest senior, Liz (Laura Harrier), Holland finds the agony of simply talking to the object of his affections.”
“Holland, who just turned 21, is a British actor who gets inside the role in ways that go beyond a spot-on American accent and a voice that squeaks when he’s excited.”
“Homecoming gives his character and his teen trauma genuine context.”


"Spiderman flies because Holland gives him wings."
"That's the basic plot."
"He may have a knack for revenge."
"As for Peter's mentor, Tony Stark (Robert Downey Jr.), the man known as the iron man is not willing to take the training wheel off this hormonal cannon."
"But the core relationship of this movie is between Peter and his best friend Ned (Jacob batalon). Ned is a science nerd. When he finds out his friend is spider man, he will be disappointed."
"To our hero, the guiding light in his life is his charming Aunt May (Marissa tome)."
"Even his gifted classmate, zendaya, ridiculed him for trying to keep calm."
"Just as Peter Parker of queens, New York, is a sophomore of the school's most beautiful senior, Laura Harrier, Holland finds the pain of talking to someone he loves."
"Holland, who has just turned 21, is a British actor, and his way of acting in the play goes beyond the American accent and the scream of excitement."
"Homecoming gives him a real background of character and adolescent trauma."



Number  142
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That it was done through an opioid overdose lent an unnecessary grim and morbid dimension to an otherwise happy family show.”TVLine readers gave The Conners premiere an average grade of “B-,” with 67 percent saying they will keep watching.”
““Should she have a sudden heart attack, a mental breakdown or go off into the sunset on a boat with her son Jerry Garcia?”
“— kill off the character of Roseanne Conner.”
“In Tuesday night’s debut, the Conner family was still in mourning three weeks after the death of its former matriarch.”
“The family believed Roseanne had died of a heart attack but a phone call from the coroner s office revealed that she actually was felled by an opioid overdose stemming from a prescription painkiller addiction she developed during last spring...”
“...s Roseanne revival...”
“In a column for The Hollywood Reporter Helford who was an executive producer on the original series and also served as co showrunner on the revival says that the decision to end Roseanne Conner s life was to give the...”
“...character as respectful a sendoff as possible while also affording the series and its titular family the chance to evolve without her...”
““There was a lot of chatter in the ether about how we should explain Roseanne’s absence,” Helford says.”
“But back in the writers room, we firmly decided against anything cowardly or far-fetched, anything that would make the fierce matriarch of the Conners seem pathetic or debased.”


"It's done by overdosing opioids, which adds unnecessarily sinister and morbid color to the original happy family show." Tvline readers gave Connors an average rating of "B -" and 67% said they would continue to watch
"Should she have a heart attack, a mental breakdown, or a boat ride to sunset with her son Jerry Garcia?"
"Kill the character Rosanna Connor."
"In the premiere on Tuesday night, the Connors are still mourning three weeks after the death of the former patriarch."
"The family thinks Rosanna died of a heart attack, but a phone call from the coroner's office shows that she actually fell down because of an opioid overdose caused by her addiction to prescription painkillers last spring..."
“… The Renaissance of Roseanne... "
"In his column for Hollywood journalist Helford, who was the executive producer of the original series and co host of Renaissance, he said the decision to end Rosanna Connor's life was for her
“… The character respects a farewell as much as possible, but also provides opportunities for the series and its nominal family to develop without her. "
"There's a lot of talk about how we can explain Rosanna's absence," says Helford
"But back in the writing room, we firmly oppose any cowardly or far fetched behavior, any behavior that will make the female parents of the Connors family look sad or despicable."



Number  143
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This break-up is the second for a “Winter Games” couple; “Bachelor” favorite Ashley Iaconetti and Canadian firefighter Kevin Wendt split in March.”
“What followed was a surprise engagement — that included a custom Neil Lane ring — on “The Bachelor Winter Games: The World Tells All” reunion show.”
“He reached out via text after the show and the duo reconnected.”
“Beauséjour-Savard, 31, didn’t let a little rejection get him down, though.”
“Crawley, 36, ended up breaking things off with the distraught Canadian in favor of getting to know Rauch, but that relationship ended up falling apart too.”
“...appeared on Juan Pablo s season of The Bachelor and the first two seasons of Bachelor in Paradise she was infatuated with German contestant Christian Rauch...”
“We still care for each other very deeply After asking for privacy the pair concluded their statement with a thank you to their supporters writing Thank you for your understanding and love while we have shared our vulnerability with the world While Canadian Beauséjour Savard fell hard for Crawley who...”
“I’m sorry that this may not be what you want to hear, but it’s our truth.”The post continued: “Just know there are no negative feelings here, we are simply two people who believed in love, and were open enough to give it a chance.”
““We think the world of each other, and we were both hoping we could make this work.”
““It’s with a heavy heart that we have mutually decided to end our relationship,” the statement read alongside a photo of the couple’s feet.”


"This is the second time that the couple of the Winter Olympics broke up. Ashley aconetti, the bachelor's favorite, and Kevin winter, the Canadian firefighter, broke up in March."
Then there was an unexpected engagement - including a custom-made Neil Lane ring - to the "singles Winter Games: the world tells it all" reunion show
"He got in touch by text message after the show and the two reestablished contact."
"However, bosyol saward, 31, did not disappoint him by a single refusal."
"Crowley, 36, finally broke up with the anxious Canadians and got to know Rauch, but the relationship broke down."
“…… Appearing in the first two seasons of Juan Pablo's "Bachelor" and "Bachelor of paradise", she is infatuated with German player Christian Rauch... "
"After asking for privacy, we are still very concerned about each other. At the end of their statement, they expressed their gratitude to their supporters for their understanding and love. At the same time, we shared our vulnerability with the world, while beaujol saward of Canada had a special preference for Crowley.... "
"I'm sorry, it may not be what you want to hear, but it's our truth." The post went on: "we only know that there are no negative emotions here. We are just two people who believe in love. We are very open and give it a chance."
"We think of each other's world and we all hope that we can make this work."
"We decided with a heavy heart to end our relationship," the statement added, along with a photo of the couple's feet



Number  144
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“The US host jokingly advised: 'When you get home you should look for it.”
“It's so hard to sing!”
“'I thought I sang, I was like, 'Yeah, I sing'.”
“Speaking of the 2017 Super Bowl singer, Cooper revealed she's 'really incredible'.”
“Born in which he stars and directs in opposite singer Lady Gaga...”
“However while we all waited in baited breath for the 42 year old to elaborate on fatherhood the relatively private star s conversation with the DeGeneres moved swiftly on to his remake of the musical romantic drama A Star is...”
“It's somewhere in your house.'”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"The American host jokingly suggested," when you get home, you should look for it. "
"It's hard to sing!"
"I thought I did, and I thought," yes, I did. "
"Speaking of the Super Bowl singer of 2017, Cooper revealed that she was" really incredible. "
"He played and directed another singer, Lady Gaga..."
"However, when we all hold our breath and wait for the 42 year old to tell us his father's identity in detail, the conversation between the relatively private star and Mr. and Mrs. DeGeneres quickly turns to his remake of the musical" the star is... "
"Somewhere in your house."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address



Number  145
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Submit...”
“Heard had just gone through a rough divorce with actor Johnny Depp while Musk was in the process of divorcing his wife, "Westworld" actress Talulah Riley.”
“There have been speculations going around the Internet that Amber Heard and her billionaire ex-boyfriend Elon Musk have gotten back together when photos of them hanging out began to circulate online.”
“Just recently these rumors were even more intensified when the pair were caught kissing after spending lunch together in Los Angeles last week.”
“This comes four months after the couple split.”
“However, according to a source close to the couple, this isn't exactly the case.”
“"Amber invited Elon to her favorite Texas-breakfast spot," said the source who happened to be close to Musk.”
“"They shared a quick kiss goodbye.”
“They're still just friends, not trying to get back together," the insider added.”
“Heard and Musk first got together just after the end of their previous relationships.”


Submit
"Hurd has just had a difficult divorce from actor Johnny Depp, while musk is divorcing his wife, Western Hemisphere actress tarula Riley."
"There's a lot of speculation on the Internet that Ambo and her former billionaire boyfriend, Elon Musk, got back together when they heard that photos of them hanging out on the Internet began to circulate."
"Just recently, when they were caught kissing after lunch in Los Angeles last week, the rumors intensified."
"It's four months after they broke up."
"However, according to sources close to the couple, this is not the case."
"Amber invited Elon to her favorite Texas breakfast," said a source who happened to be close to musk
"They soon kiss goodbye."
"They are still just friends and don't want to get back together," the source added
"Hurd and musk were together just before the end of their relationship."



Number  146
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Next: This former model had no problem talking smack about her ex …9.”
“But that didn’t stop the two from contradicting each other’s stories to the public.”
“(Reynolds ended up paying Anderson an exorbitant amount of money after their divorce, too.)”
“Anderson alleged that Reynolds beat her, while the Smokey and the Bandit actor criticized his ex-wife’s penchant for spending money.”
“Burt Reynolds and Loni AndersonNot only was their divorce incredibly public, but it spanned over a couple decades.”
“Next: This divorce was as nasty as they get …3.”
“There have also been multiple “tell-alls” from the Friends actress regarding the divorce.”
“Once it was speculated that Pitt had cheated Aniston with Angelina Jolie — more on them on page 15 — the tabloids had a field day that has yet to end.”
“Brad Pitt and Jennifer AnistonWith how the tabloids cover it, you would think that these two celebrities are still going through a breakup!”
“Next: One of the most talked about breakups in modern Hollywood …2.”


"Next: the ex model has no problem talking about her ex girlfriend Nine years old. "
"But that doesn't stop them from contradicting each other's stories to the public."
(Reynolds also paid Anderson a lot of money after the divorce.)
Anderson claimed Reynolds hit her, while smoky and the robber actor criticized his ex-wife for spending money
"The divorce of Bert Reynolds and Ronnie Anderson is not only incredibly public, but also spans decades."
"Next: this divorce is as bad as they got 3。”
The heroine of friends also "informs" about the divorce many times
"There was speculation that Pitt and Angelina Jolie had cheated Aniston - see page 15 for more information - the tabloid day is not over."
"What about Brad Pitt and Jennifer Aniston tabloids? You think they're still going through a breakup!"
"Next: one of the most talked about breakups in modern Hollywood 2。”



Number  147
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Please give an overall site rating:”
“How can we improve?”
“المملكة العربية السعودية العربية مصر العربية ไทย ไทย 한국 한국어 中华人民共和国 简体中文 台灣 繁體中文 日本 日本語 香港特别行政區 繁體中文 Feedback Home Style Family Relationships Horoscopes Quiz Food Drink Health Fitness Travel Send MSN Feedback We appreciate your input...”
“...polski Portugal Português Schweiz Deutsch Singapore English South Africa English Suisse français Suomi suomi Sverige svenska Türkiye Türkçe United Arab Emirates English United Kingdom English United States English United States español Venezuela español Viê t Nam Tiê ng Viê t Ελλάδα ελληνικά Россия Pусский ישראל עברית الإمارات العربية المتحدة العربية”
“España español France français India English India मर ठ India ह द India ব ল India త ల గ Indonesia Bahasa Indonesia International Edition English Ireland English Italia italiano Magyarország magyar Malaysia English México español Nederland Nederlands New Zealand English Norge norsk bokmål Österreich Deutsch Perú español Philippines English Polska...”
“...msn lifestyle powered by Microsoft News web search Skip To Navigation Skip To Content Sign in Change language content Afrique francophone français América Latina español Argentina español Australia English België Nederlands Belgique français Brasil português Canada English Canada français Česká republika čeština Chile español Colombia español Danmark Dansk Deutschland Deutsch...”


Please give the overall rating of the website:
"How can we improve?"
At present, the strength of the armed forces in various regions is investigated from various aspects, while the armed forces in various regions are armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed Arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms Arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms arms Armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed armed
“…… Polski Portugal Schweitzer Germany Singapore English South Africa English Switzerland France Sumi sumis vilitsvinska t ü rkiye t ü rkiye t ü rkiye t ξ K ξ e United Arab Emirates English United Kingdom English American English Spanish Venezuelan Spanish Vietnamese Spanish ייתمرا العربية المتحدة العربية”
"Spain Spain France India English india india india india india india india india india india india india india india india india india india india india india india india india india india india india india india india india india india india india india india india india india india india India Indonesia Bahasa Indonesia International Edition English Ireland English Italy Language magyarosag Malaysia English Mexico Spain Netherlands New Zealand English Norway Norwegian bokmar Spanish Philippines English Polska
“… MSN lifestyle by Microsoft News provides support for web search jump to navigation jump to content login change language content Africa French French French Latin America Spanish Argentina Spanish Australia English Belgium Netherlands Belgium French Brazil Portuguese Canadian English French Canada French Republic of seshtina Chile Spanish Colombia Spain Denmark Germany



Number  148
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Now, with National Geographic and with the latest research, science and technology, I’m going to reassess.””
“But did I really get it right?”
““I was creating a living history; I had to get it right out of respect for the many who died and for their legacy.”
“...in a statement...”
“When I wrote the film and when I set out to direct it I wanted every detail to be as accurate as I could make it and every harrowing moment of the ship s final hours accounted for said Cameron...”
“...surpassed by the director s own Avatar...”
“The Oscar winning director and National Geographic have joined forces for Titanic 20th Anniversary a one hour documentary special commemorating the 1997 release of Cameron s iconic film which had been the highest grossing film of all time before being...”


"Now, with national geography, with the latest research, science and technology, I want to reassess."
"But did I really do it right?"
"I'm making a living history; I have to write it right, because I respect many dead people and their legacy."
“… In the statement
"When I wrote the film, when I started directing it, I wanted every detail to be as accurate as possible, and every painful moment of the ship's last moment was said by Cameron..."
“… Being transcended by the director's own incarnation... "
"The Oscar winning director and National Geographic jointly produced an hour long documentary special for the 20th anniversary of Titanic to commemorate the release of Cameron's iconic film Titanic in 1997, which was the highest grossing film in history before its release..."



Number  149
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“After the late-night host wept over his loss, they settled their differences by dueting on Gloria Gaynor’s “I Will Survive.”Watch the riff-off in the clip above.”
“She then dropped the mic after riling up the crowd with a hit of her own, “Heart Attack.”“Can you just pick my mic up…b—-,” she told Corden.”
“...s Roar Even Corden had to admit her belting rendition was top notch...”
“The Body Say songstress kicked things off by performing Adele s Rolling in the Deep which Corden followed with Turner s River Deep Mountain High Wow that was terrible just really awful bad Lovato said as they proceeded to trade off covers of Aretha Franklin s Respect and Katy Perry...”
““And, um, I got hits that are my own,” Lovato fired back.”
““I got hits from before you were born,” Corden said.”
“So, she brought out a cappella group Level to see which songs hold up.”
“The pop singer heard Corden telling his Late Late Show audience on Wednesday that divas from the age of Tina Turner and Cher are better than ones from today.”
“It’s what happened when Demi Lovato challenged James Corden to sing diva hits with an a cappella accompaniment.”
“The Late Late Show With James Corden Close Streaming OptionsWhat is an a cappella diva “riff-off”?”


After the late night hosts cried over their failure, they used Gloria Gino's "I will live" duet to resolve their differences
She put down the microphone after making a sensation in the crowd with her song "heart attack". "Can you pick up my microphone B - "she said to cordon
“… Even cordon has to admit that her belt performance is first-class... "
"Body said, the female singer started the performance of things, Adele's rolling in the deep, Corden and Turner's River, deep mountain and high wow, it's terrible, just really terrible bad, Lovato said, as they continue to exchange cover, Aretha Franklin's respect and Katie Perry..."
"And, well, I've got my own percentage," Lovato replied
"I received something before you were born," cordon said
"So she took out the level of an unaccompanied choir to see which songs were held."
"On Wednesday, the pop singer heard Colden tell the audience later in the show that the days of Tina Turner and Cher are better than they are today."
"Demi Lovato challenges James Colden to sing pop songs in an unaccompanied chorus, and that's it."
"James cordon's evening program is close to streaming media options. What is the improvisation of the unaccompanied chorus Queen"



Number  150
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Kournikova and Iglesias are famously private, and rarely photographed out and about together — likely why there were no bump sightings ahead of the twins’ arrival.”
“RELATED VIDEO: New Parents Enrique Iglesias and Anna Kournikova Share First Photos of TwinsOne month later, in January, the pair, who have been together for nearly 11 years, shared the first pictures of their newborns, confirming the news that they are now parents.”
“The couple named their son and daughter Nicholas and Lucy, according to TMZ.”
“Kournikova and Iglesias, 42, welcomed the twins in December 2017.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“And the song the pair was dancing to was extra special: A snippet of Kournikova’s longtime partner Enrique Iglesias‘ new Pitbull-assisted song “Move to Miami” played in the background.”
““Little one, please don’t inherit my dance moves,” the mom of two captioned the footage.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“In a new video shared on Instagram Wednesday, the retired athlete, 36, showed off some playful arm and hip choreography as she held one of her five-month-old twins in a baby carrier.”


"Kournikova and Iglesias are notoriously private and rarely photographed together - which may be why they didn't see the crash before the twins arrived."
"Related video: new parents Enrique Iglesias and Anna Kournikova shared the first picture of twinsone. A month later, in January, the couple, who have been together for nearly 11 years, shared the first picture of their newborn, confirming that they are now parents."
According to TMZ, the couple named their son and daughter Nicholas and Lucy
"Kournikova and 42 year old Iglesias welcomed the twins in December 2017."
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"The song they danced with was also very special: the clip of Enrique Iglesias' new song" move to Miami "was played backstage."
"Little fellow, please don't follow my steps," the mother of two wrote in the video
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"In a new video shared on instagram on Wednesday, the 36 year old retired athlete shows some interesting arm and hip dances, holding a pair of five month old twins in a pram."



Number  151
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We don’t feel any pressure to do anything grand or big, I think it’s just continuing to tell stories of these really, really great people.”
““We’re just excited to be there.”
“I think we, on the creative end, are approaching it the same way,” he told us.”
“To be really honest I feel zero pressure on season two.”
“Don’t just watch them for Jack, watch them for every character and understand, let’s say what the adversity is and the challengers are and how they’re met with bravery.”
“I think—look, go back and watch the episodes.”
“News: “I always tell people to focus more on the way the man lived than how he died.”
“Milo Ventimiglia, who plays Jack, recently told E!”
“September 26th.” If our estimations are good, the upcoming season is about to bring lots of tears, but also some laughs.”
“Season 2.”


"We don't feel any pressure to do anything big or big, I think it's just to continue to tell the story of these very, very great people."
"We're just happy to be there."
"I think in terms of creativity, we are approaching it in the same way," he told us
"To be honest, I don't think there's any pressure in the second quarter."
"Don't just look at them for Jack, look at them for each character, understand what adversity is, what challengers are, and how they face it bravely."
"I think, you see, go back to those shows."
News: "I always tell people to pay more attention to this person's way of life than to his way of death."
"Milo Wendy Miglia, who plays jack, recently told e!"
"September 26." If our estimate is good, the coming season will bring a lot of tears, but there will also be some laughter
"Second season."



Number  152
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Before entering the NFL he scored a 34 on the Wonderlic Test, which was one of the highest scores ever for his position.”
“English appears on the reality television series WAGS with his fiancée Nicole Williams.”
“During his career he had 103 tackles, 12 sacks, and two forced fumbles.”
“English played for the Chargers from 2009 to 2013 and for the Tampa Bay Buccaneers from 2014 to 2015.”
“He was drafted #16 by the San Diego Chargers in the 2009 NFL Draft.”
“English played his college football at Northern Illinois and was named two time MAC Most Valuable Player, MAC Defensive Player of the Year, and three time All-MAC.”
“He was a defensive end and outside linebacker who played at Marmion Academy.”
“Larry English was born in Aurora, Illinois in January 1986.”
“Larry English net worth: Larry English is an American former professional football player who has a net worth of $8 million.”


"Before entering the NFL, he scored 34 points on the Wonderlic, one of the highest in the history of his position."
"English appeared in the reality TV series wags with his fianc é e Nicole Williams."
"In his career, he has 103 tackles, 12 sacks and two forced misses
"England played for Charles from 2009 to 2013 and for the Tampa Bay pirates from 2014 to 2015."
"He was picked in the 2009 NFL draft by the 16-year-old San Diego Chargers
Inglish played college football in Northern Illinois and was named McGrady's most valuable player twice, McGrady's defensive player of the year and all McGrady three times
"He is a defensive and outside defender who played at mamion college
Larry ingrish was born in Aurora, Illinois, in January 1986
"Larry English net worth: Larry English is a former professional football player in the United States with a net worth of $8 million."



Number  153
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Hubbards posed shirtless as they gazed down at Hayley’s baby bump, while in another photo Tyler bent down to kiss his smiling wife’s stomach, which was exposed by a black turtleneck crop top.”
“I’ve seen it since the first time I met her.”And as they counted down the days until they would meet their baby girl, the pair posed for a series of gorgeous pregnancy photos.”
“The Florida Georgia Line singer, 30, and his wife Hayley welcomed their first child on Saturday, Dec. 23, his rep confirms to PEOPLE exclusively.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Daughter Olivia Rose Hubbard was born in Nashville at 4:56 p.m., weighing 7 lbs., 13 oz.”
“She measured 19¼ inches long.”
““We’re so overwhelmed with joy and already more in love than we could have ever imagined with this little angel that God has given us,” the proud new dad tells PEOPLE.”
“He adds Olivia is the best Christmas gift we could have ever asked for Image zoom Credit Nathan Chapman Image zoom Tyler Olivia Rose and Hayley Hubbard Credit Nathan Chapman The couple exclusively revealed their baby news to PEOPLE back in June and dished on some of the things they...”
“...were looking forward to with their new addition...”
““There’s a lot that we’re going to get to learn,” Tyler said.”


"Mr. and Mrs. Hubbard are naked, staring down at Haley's lump, while in another photo, Tyler bends down to kiss his smiling wife's stomach, which is revealed by a black turtleneck jacket."
"I've seen her since I first saw her." As they counted down the days when they would see the baby girl, they put out a series of beautiful pregnancy photos
"The 30-year-old Florida Georgia frontline singer and his wife Hayley have their first child on Saturday, December 23, and his agent confirmed exclusively to people."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Daughter Olivia rose Hubbard was born in Nashville at 4:56 p.m., weighing 7 pounds and 13 ounces."
"She's 19 / 4."
The proud new dad told people: "we are ecstatic, and we love this little angel more than we can imagine."
"He added that Olivia is the best Christmas present we can ask for, thanks to Nathan Chapman, Taylor Olivia Ross and Haley Hubbard. Nathan Chapman, the couple, revealed their treasure news exclusively in June and introduced something about them..."
“… We are looking forward to their new addition... "
"We're going to learn a lot," Taylor said



Number  154
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The couple, who wed in April 2003, share two children: sons Charles, 13 and Tennyson, 11.”
“It’s been joyful.”Image zoom Credit: Lisa Maree Williams/GettyNews broke of Crowe and Spencer’s split in October 2012, more than 20 years after the couple met playing lovers in the 1990 movie The Crossing.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Called “The Art of Divorce,” the auction marks the end of a chapter after Crowe split from Danielle Spencer, his wife of nine years.”
“News of the couple’s separation emerged in 2012, and their divorce is nearly finalized.”
““In case anyone is interested … $3.7m at the coal face and around $350k of conversations ongoing … and a bunch of stuff I didn’t really want to sell coming home … not a bad hourly rate for a 5 hour shift .”
“Hope you are happy and busy,” Crowe tweeted Saturday.”
“Crowe told Good Morning Britain on Friday that the jock strap surprisingly turned out to be “one of the most popular items” leading up to the event.”
““It was my jock strap when I won the heavyweight championship of the world as the character James J. Braddock in the film Cinderella Man,” he said.”
““I put it in the collection as a piece of whimsy and a bit of a gag.”


The couple married in April 2003 and have two children: 13-year-old son Charles and 11 year old Tennyson
"I'm glad." Photo zooming credit: Lisa Marley Williams / Getty's news agency reported in October 2012 that Crowe and Spencer broke up. The couple met their lover in the 1990 movie "through" more than 20 years later
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
The auction, called "the art of divorce," marks the end of a chapter after Crowe broke up with his wife of nine years, Danielle Spencer
"In 2012, the news came that they were separated, and their divorce was almost finalized."
"If anyone is interested $3.7 million in coal mining and $350000 in conversation And a lot of things I don't want to sell When I get home The hourly rate for a five hour shift is not bad. "
"I hope you are happy and busy," Crowe tweeted on Saturday
Crowe told good morning Britain on Friday that it was surprising that the sports harness was "one of the most popular items" that triggered the event
"When I played James Braddock in the movie cinderella man," he said（ jamesj.Braddock ）When I won the world heavyweight championship, it was my sports belt
"I put it in my collection as a whim and a gag."



Number  155
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It’s so surreal and crazy and unbelievable that my mom has a brain tumor—and now I have one too?”She remained at the hospital for six days after the June 8 surgery before returning home to heal alongside her mother, Litsa,who has stage 4 brain cancer.”
“I actually laughed,” she recalls of hearing the news.”
“News After Brain Tumor Diagnosis: 'I'm Gonna Take Some Time and See What's Next'Maria Menounos has announced that she is leaving E!”
“News following her February brain tumor diagnosis.”
““My deal ends this August and after that I’m gonna take some time and focus on some passion projects and see what’s next,” the 39-year-old tells PEOPLE.”
““I’m not rushing into anything.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The Sirius XM radio host had been with the company for three years after first joining the E!”
“News team in 2014.”
“In a statement, E!”
“...officials thanked Menounos for her “many contributions” over the years.”


"My mother has a brain tumor, and now I have a brain tumor, too. It's weird, crazy, incredible?"? "After the operation on June 8, she stayed in the hospital for six days and then went home to recover with her mother Lisa, who had stage 4 brain cancer."
"I really laughed," she recalled hearing the news
"The news after the diagnosis of brain tumor:" I'll take a moment to see what happens next. "Maria menunos announced that she was leaving e!"
"News after she was diagnosed with a brain tumor in February."
"My deal ends in August, and after that I'll spend some time focusing on some passion projects and see what happens next," the 39 year old told people
"I'm in no hurry." Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Sirius XM radio host joins e for the first time!"
"The news team of 2014."
"In a statement, e!"
“…… Officials thank menunos for his "many contributions" over the years. "



Number  156
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related: Reintroducing Lindsay Lohan: The Actress Has Found a Sense of Calm, and Is Now Ready to Launch a Beauty Brand...”
“I love her.”
“One month after Hilton revealed that Lohan will not be invited to her upcoming wedding with Chris Zylka, explaining "If you don't have anything nice to say, don't say anything at all," Hilton has become more specific about her issues with Lohan.”
“The heiress called the actress a "pathological liar" on Instagram after the fan account @paris2000s posted a few old videos of Lohan talking about their relationship.”
“The videos, taken in 2006, show Lohan exhibiting conflicting feelings about Hilton.”
“In one clip, Lohan says, "This is a video that Paris Hilton... and I'm saying this on tape... she hit me last night, for no reason, apparently at my friend's house and I didn't know she'd be there.”
“She hit me; she hit me with a drink and poured it all over me and it hurts and it's not okay."”
“In another video, though, the pair are still together.”
“As Hilton is getting into a car, she shouts at Lohan who is approaching the vehicle, "Lindsay, tell them the truth," to which Lohan replies, "Paris is my friend," Lohan says, "She's a nice person.”
“Please leave us alone...she never did that, she's a good girl."”


"Related reports: re introducing Lindsay Lohan: the actress has found a sense of calm and is now ready to launch a beauty brand..."
"I love her."
"Hilton revealed that Rohan would not be invited to her upcoming wedding with Chris zelka. A month later, she explained," if you have nothing to say, don't say anything. "Hilton became more specific about her and Rohan's problems
The heiress called the actress "a sick liar" on instagram because @ paris2000, a fan account, released some old videos of Rohan talking about their relationship
"The video taken in 2006 shows that Rohan shows contradictory feelings towards Hilton."
In one video, Rohan said, "this is a piece of Paris Hilton... I said on the tape... She hit me last night for no reason, obviously at my friend's house. I don't know where she will be
"She hit me; she hit me with a drink and poured the wine on me. It hurt like hell."
"However, in another video, the two are still together."
"When Hilton got in the car, she called to Rohan who was near the car," Lindsay, tell them the truth, "Rohan replied," Paris is my friend, "Rohan said," she's a good person. "
"Please leave us alone She's never done that. She's a good girl



Number  157
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“And yes, we're already coming up with many a theory as to the meaning behind such intruiging track titles.”
“Earlier this morning, the 27-year-old posted a black and white close-up image of herself with the track list, featuring hits such 'Ready For It?”
“', 'Gorgeous' and 'Call It What You Want'.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“She captioned the post: '3 days until #reputation.'”
“The singer's announcement came shortly after identical photos of the album and the backside of its cover art surfaced on the internet.”
“From the looks of it, Reputation will be the singer's second-longest album behind her 2012 album Red with a whopping 15 tracks in total.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"Yes, we have put forward a lot of theories to explain the meaning behind these interesting song titles."
"Earlier this morning, the 27 year old posted a black-and-white close-up with his own repertoire, including some popular songs such as" are you ready? "
"Gorgeous and whatever you say."
"This content was imported from instagram."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"She wrote in the title of the post: 'three days to fame.'"
"Not long before the singer announced the news, the same photo on the back of the album and its cover art appeared on the Internet."
"Outwardly, reputation will be the singer's second longest album, second only to her 2012 album red, with an amazing 15 songs."



Number  158
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She is repped by Beth Rosner Management and BRSGage.”
“Barrett, who plays Megan on Netflix’s Iron Fist, will be seen in the upcoming feature Marshall and was just seen on Broadway in Groundhog Day as Rita.”
“The 10-episode drama, which follows a group of heroic firefighters, hails from Grey’s Anatomy creator Shonda Rhimes’ Shondaland.”
“Primetime-Panic Your Complete Guide to Pilots and Straight-to-Series orders See AllCourtesy of DisneySet in a Seattle firehouse, the spinoff is being written by Grey’s executive producer/co-showrunner Stacy McKee.”
“From the captain to the newest recruit, the show revolves around the brave men and women who risk their lives and their hearts both in the line of duty and off the clock.”
“All four new cast additions will play firefighters, Lieutenant Jack (Damon), Dean (Onaodowan), Maya (Savre) and Victoria (Doss).”
“Start of production on the spinoff was pushed back a week or so to finish casting.”
“The lead characters are expected to be introduced in an episode of Grey‘s Anatomy this fall before the offshoot series launches midseason.”
“McKee executive produces the spinoff with director Paris Barclay and Shondaland’s Rhimes and Betsy Beers for ABC Studios and Shondaland.”
“Friday Night Lights alum Damon has co-starred on Aquarius, The Nine Lives Of Chloe King, Twisted and Star-Crossed.”


"Beth rossner's management and busgach represent her."
"Barrett plays Megan in Netflix's iron fist, will appear in the upcoming feature Marshall, and will play Rita on Broadway in groundhog day."
"This 10 episode TV series is about a group of brave firefighters, from" shoda Rand "by shoda Reims, creator of Gray's anatomy."
"For a complete guide to the prime time panic your pilot and direct to series orders, see all Disney TV stations in Seattle fire station. The by-product was written by Gray's executive producer / CO performer Stacy McKee."
"From the captain to the recruits, the show revolves around brave men and women who risk their lives and hearts, both at work and after work."
"All four new actors will play firemen, Lieutenant Jack (Damon), Dean (onawan), Maya (sapphire) and Victoria (DOS)," he said
"In order to complete the casting, the start time of split production was delayed by about a week."
"These characters are expected to appear in an episode of Gray's anatomy this fall, and then the series will be released in the middle of the season."
"McKee executive and directors Paris barray and shondaland produced Rhimes and Betsy beers for ABC Studios and shondaland."
"Friday night's bright alum Damon has co starred in Aquarius, Chloe King's nine lives, twist and the stars"



Number  159
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Write to Raisa Bruner at raisa.bruner@time.com.”
“If you don't get the confirmation within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder.”
“Best known as Kit Harington’s character’s wildling love interest and fellow fighter Ygritte in the popular HBO show, Leslie and Harington first sparked dating rumors back in 2012 before appearing publicly together for the first time in spring of 2016.”
“Now, however, PEOPLE reports that a source has confirmed the two are engaged.”
““If you’re already attracted to someone, and then they play your love interest in the show, it becomes very easy to fall in love,” Harington told L’Uomo Vogue back in 2016.”
“Leslie moved in with him this year according to a June appearance on James Corden’s show.”
“At that time, fellow guest Nicole Kidman prodded Harington about his proposal plans — but he said he was taking things “step by step.”Harington and Leslie are major fan favorites, thanks to some seriously memorable (and steamy) scenes they’ve shared in the fantasy show.”
“While Daenerys Targaryen may have caught Jon Snow’s eye onscreen for now, it’s clear that Ygritte has been the one for him all along.”
“Game of Thrones returns with its final season next year.”
“Until then, we’ll have to satisfy ourselves with the real-life drama these actors are happily playing out.”


"To Lisa Bruner, La Bruner @ time."
"If you are not confirmed within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder."
"What Leslie and Harrington are best known for is the role played by kit Harrington, her wild love interest and her HBO hit comrades igrit, who first sparked rumors of a date in 2012 and then made their first public appearance in the spring of 2016."
"However, it is now reported that a source has confirmed that the two are engaged."
"It's very easy to fall in love if you've been attracted to someone and they play you on the show," Harrington told L'uomo vogue in 2016
"According to an appearance on James cordon in June, Leslie moved in with him this year."
"At the time, fellow guest Nicole Kidman revealed his proposal to Harrington, but he said he was advancing it" step by step. ". Harrington and Leslie are fans' favorites, thanks to some of the unforgettable scenes they shared on the fantasy show
"Although Denise tangorian may have caught Jon Snow's eye on the screen by now, it's clear that igritte has always been his man."
"The game of power will be in its last season next year."
"Until then, we can only be satisfied with the real-life drama that these actors happily perform."



Number  160
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...email digishowbiz@the-sun.co.uk or call us direct on 02077824220”
“A clearly mortified Ms Kidman threw her hands over her head and exclaimed: "Ellen!"”
“Ellen called her bluff, however, replying: "The lens didn't do it to anybody else's fingers.”
“That is a weird lens."”
“I do not clap like that!”
“Denying she claps the way she was caught on camera, Nicole pleaded: "I don't clap like that!”
“Ellen then asked.”
“6 The A List star was left cringing after appearing on Ellen Credit: EllenTube6 Host Ellen DeGeneres demanded an explanation for the unusual moment Credit: EllenTube"Well, I'm just... did you know ahead of time that you clapped in a different way?"”
“And you got a lot of attention for the way you were clapping," Ellen said - ambushing Nicole with video of the moment.”
“You're not even really clapping."”


“… E-mail digishowbiz@the-sun.co.uk Or call 0207782420 directly
A clearly ashamed Ms. Kidman put her hand on her head and called out, "Ellen!"
Ellen said she was bluffing, but replied, "the lens didn't do it on anyone's fingers."
"That's a strange shot."
"I didn't clap like that!"
Nicole denies being photographed clapping. She pleads, "I won't clap like that!"
"Alan continued
The A-list star balked after appearing on Credit: Allan tuber, and host Ellen DeGeneres asked for an explanation for the unusual moment in credit: Allan tuber... Do you know in advance that you clap in a different way? ""
"The way you clapped attracted a lot of attention," Allen said, ambushing Nicole with the video at the time
"You don't even clap."



Number  161
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“"People can impact you in different ways … the important ones enter your life for a reason a season or a lifetime #keepthefaith," Christina captioned the photo.”
“The Flip or Flop star officially ended her relationship with the businessman after he reportedly checked into an in-patient rehabilitation center for addiction issues, according to an In Touch exclusive posted Wednesday.”
“Multiple media outlets also confirmed the news.”
“"Doug has had a huge history of drug and alcohol abuse, and Christina was warned when they first started dating," a source told E!”
“News.”
“"It has gotten pretty bad this past month and Christina's friends urged her to end the relationship."”
“Despite the circumstances, Christina has remained supportive of her now ex-boyfriend and is still in contact with him during his recovery period, a source told People.”
“"Christina didn't just turn her back on him," a second inside source told In Touch.”
“"She respects and supports Doug's decision to take the steps to make changes in his life.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"People can influence you in different ways Important people come into your life for a reason, a season or a lifetime of faith, "Christina wrote in the title of the photo
"According to reports, the star in flip flops officially ended her relationship with the businessman after she was admitted to a hospital rehabilitation center for drug abuse and released an exclusive" in touch "report on Wednesday."
"A number of media also confirmed the news."
A source told e
"News."
"Things got really bad last month and Christina's friends advised her to end the relationship."
"Despite this, Christina still supports her current ex boyfriend and keeps in touch with him during his recovery," a source told people
"Christina didn't betray him," another insider told the contact
"She respects and supports Doug's decision to take steps to change his life."



Number  162
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The duo appeared to have patched up their differences and were seen buddying up at the Grammy Awards in 2014 before Swift presented an award to West at the MTV VMAs later that year.”
““He promised to play the song for me, but he never did.”Swift and West have had a complicated relationship since 2009, when the rapper interrupted the singer’s best female video acceptance speech at the MTV Video Music Awards.”
““You don’t get to control someone’s emotional response to being called ‘that bitch’ in front of the entire world,” she captioned her post.”
“In the edited clips of the call, Swift appeared to give West her blessing over a line referencing her in his song, “Famous.”However, Swift hit back at the couple afterwards on Instagram, saying West never told her he was going to call Swift “that bitch” in his song.”
“Last summer, Swift’s feud with West, 40, exploded after Kim Kardashian West, 36, leaked a phone call between the “Shake It Off” singer and her husband on Snapchat.”
“In a sneak peek of Swift’s music video, she can be seen sitting on a throne with the words “ET TU BRUTE” etched onto the arm.”
“The lyrics “I don’t like your kingdom keys / They once belonged to me” could also be a reference to West’s album with JAY-Z, titled Watch the Throne.”
“Though Swift doesn’t mention him by name in the song, the rapper used a tilted stage while on his Saint Pablo tour.”
“...stage saying it was a reference to West...”
“Some accused Swift of being vindictive while others stood up for the singer saying she wouldn t stoop that low As soon as Look What You Made Me Do was released fans reacted to the specific lyrics I don t like your little games I don t like your tilted...”


"The two seem to have bridged their differences. At the 2014 Grammy Awards, people saw them coming to the fore, and then swift presented the award to west at the MTV Vmas awards later that year."
"He promised to play the song for me, but he never did." Swift and West have had a complex relationship since 2009, when the rapper interrupted the singer's best female video award-winning speech at the MTV Video Music Awards
"You can't control a person's emotional reaction to being called 'that bitch' in front of the world," she wrote in her post
In the edited conversation clip, swift seems to quote a sentence in his song "fame" to bless West. However, swift later hit back at the couple on instagram, saying that West never told her he was going to call swift "that bitch" in his song
Last summer, Swift's feud with West, now 40, broke out after Kim Kardashian West, 36, leaked the singer's phone call with her husband on snapchat
In Swift's music video, you can see her sitting on the throne with the words "et Tu brute" engraved on her arm
The lyrics "I don't like your kingdom keys / they used to belong to me" may also be a reference for West and Jay-Z's album "watch the throne."
Although swift didn't mention his name in the song, the rapper used a sloping stage during his tour of San Pablo
“… On the stage, it's a reference to the West... "
"Some people accused swift of vengeance, while others stood up to support the singer, saying that she would not bow her head after what you asked me to do was announced. I don't like your little game, I don't like your tilt..."



Number  163
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know your thoughts in the comments below!”
“Thank you @julienmacdonald"What do you think of Jenna Dewan-Tatum's AMAs look?”
“Because it’s one of my favorites ever.”
“She shared a picture of herself in the dress, saying, "Shameless dress pic.”
“[Photo: Instagram]Dewan-Tatum even called this dress one of her favorite gowns ever via Instagram.”
“News' red carpet round-up and Vogue's compilation of best dressed celebs.”
“She made several Best Dressed lists, including E!”
“[Photo: Splash]Macdonald wasn't the only one who praised Dewan-Tatum for her amazing red carpet fashion.”
“"@jennadewan looked every inch the smouldering superstar at last night’s @amas wearing a sparkly @Swarovski crystal embellished plunge-neck #JulienMacdonald gown that had every head turning," designer Julien Macdonald wrote on Instagram.”
“The actress/dancer wore this gorgeous gold Julien Macdonald gown and looked absolutely stunning.”


"Please let us know what you think in the comments below!"
"Thank you @ Julien MacDonald." what do you think of Jenna Dewan Tatum's Armas
"Because it's one of my favorites."
She shared a picture of herself in a skirt and said, "shameless skirt picture."
"[photo source: instagram] Dewan Tatum even called the dress one of her favorite dresses through instagram."
"News red carpet review and best dressed celebrity collection for fashion magazines."
"She made several best dressed lists, including e!"
"(photo: splash) MacDonald is not the only one to praise Dewan Tatum's amazing red carpet fashion."
Designer Julien MacDonald wrote on instagram that "@ jennadewan looks like a smoldering superstar on @ AMAS last night in a sparkling Swarovski Crystal Robe."
"The actress / dancer looks very attractive in this gorgeous gold Julian MacDonald dress."



Number  164
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Siddig, for his part, has no end of suggestions about what might have motivated his earlier exit:”
““That’s what I remember, everything was so huge.”
“Who wouldn’t be upset at being written off one of the most popular shows on TV?”
“Back in Season 5, actor Ian McElhinney was vocally annoyed when his character, Ser Barristan Selmy, was killed off long before the book version kicked the bucket.”
“Now it’s a Dornishman’s turn.”
“Actor Alexander Siddig—beloved by many for his years on Star Trek: Deep Space Nine—abruptly met his end at the start of Season 6.”
“But, according to Sidding, that wasn’t always the plan.”
“Speaking with StarTrek.com, Siddig admitted that originally being cast on the show as Prince Doran Martell was a thrill to him.”
““It was such a huge thing, and there was so much publicity money,” he recalls.”
“And actors praying they weren’t going to be killed.”But no amount of praying could save Siddig from Season 6, Episode 1, in which his character took a dagger to the chest and bled out on the exquisite flagstones of Dorne.”


"Sidiger has put forward endless suggestions on the possible reasons for his early resignation
"That's what I remember. It was so huge."
"Who wouldn't be upset about being eliminated from one of the most popular shows on TV?"
"As early as season five, actor Ian mcelhinney was annoyed that his character ser barristan selmy was fired in the book."
"Now it's donisman's turn."
"Actor Alexander siddiger, who has played in Star Trek: Deep Space 9 for many years and is loved by many people, suddenly ushered in his own ending at the beginning of the sixth season."
"But, according to siding, it's not always a plan."
"Speaking to me, startrek sidiger admits that it was exciting for him to play Prince Doran Martel in the first place."
"It was too big, too much publicity," he recalled
"And the actors pray they won't be killed." But no amount of prayer can save Siddig's performance in season 6, Episode 1, when his character stabs his chest with a dagger and bleeds on Donne's delicate slate



Number  165
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“CNN reports...”
“...case a month ago The back and forth about Pitt s child support payments In legal documents filed on August 7 Jolie s attorney claimed Pitt has paid no meaningful child support since separation Jolie also asked the court to order Pitt to pay her the money she is owed...”
“That “incident,” which reportedly involved Pitt and son Maddox Jolie-Pitt, is said to be what prompted Jolie to file for divorce.”
“Back in September 2016, we learned that an “incident” reportedly went down on a private plane, and that the Los Angeles Department of Child and Family Services and FBI got involved.”
“So what went wrong?”
“They were involved for 12 years, and had six kids and a French vineyard together.”
“But despite their, erm, salacious start, Pitt and Jolie proved to be the real deal.”
“Eventually, he and Aniston split up, and his relationship with Jolie (officially) came to light.”
“Rumors about what may or may not have gone down between Pitt and Jolie on set ran rampant.”
“The pair met while filming Mr. and Mrs. Smith in 2004 — back when Pitt was still married to Jennifer Aniston.”


"CNN report..."
“…… In the case one month ago, before and after Pitt paid child support in the legal document submitted on August 7, Julie's lawyer claimed that Pitt did not pay any meaningful child support because Julie also asked the court to order Pitt to pay the money she owed... "
It is reported that the "incident" between Pitt and her son, Maddox Jolie Pitt, is the reason for Julie's divorce
"As early as September 2016, we learned that there was a reported" incident "in a private plane, involving the Los Angeles Department of children and family services and the FBI."
"What's wrong?"
"They've been dating for 12 years, with six children and a French vineyard."
"But, even though they, er, started off as lewd, Pete and Julie proved to be a real deal."
"In the end, he broke up with Aniston and his relationship with Julie came to light."
"There's a lot of talk about what happened or didn't happen to Pete and Julie on the set."
"The couple met when filming the Smiths in 2004, when Pitt was still married to Jennifer Aniston."



Number  166
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  167
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For the latest on their wedding plans, watch our interview below.”
“ET was with Nikki and John just a couple of weeks ago at the premiere of John’s new movie, The Wall.”
“Total Bellas returns this fall with all-new episodes, but first you can check out the season finale of Total Divas on Wednesday night at 9 p.m. ET/PT on E!”
“WATCH: ET Goes Wedding Dress Shopping With Nikki Bella!”
“Season two will document a big move to Phoenix, Brie’s pregnancy and Nikki’s surprise engagement.”
“The new season features a lot of life changes for sisters Nikki and Brie and their men, John Cena and Daniel Bryan.”
“ET has your exclusive first look at season two of Total Bellas, which promises to bring the drama -- big time.”
“The Bellas are back!”


"For the latest news about their wedding plans, please see our interview below."
"Just a few weeks ago, et was with Nicky and John at the premiere of John's new film the wall."
"Total Bellas will launch a new series this fall, but first you can see the season finale of total divas on e at 9:00 p.m. ET on Wednesday night!"
"Look: ET and Nikki Bella are going to buy wedding dresses together!"
"The second season will record a big move to Phoenix, Bree's pregnancy and Nicky's surprise engagement."
"In the new season, the lives of Nicky and Bree sisters and their men, John senna and Daniel Bryan, have changed a lot."
"Et premiered the second season of total Bella exclusively, which is expected to bring a dramatic ending."
"The Bellas are back!"



Number  168
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But there’s still that evening-wear dream, you know?””
“The British designer also designed Kate Middleton‘s dress and is a go-to for Vogue editor-in-chief Anna Wintour’s daughter Bee Shaffer at all the Met Galas.”
“Meanwhile, her groom wore an Armani suit at the fête, which was planned by Jennifer Zabinski of JZ Events.”
“In addition to her strapless, belted gown, Williams sparkled thanks to jewelry by XIV Karats, worth $3.5 million in total.”
“I felt like a princess and superwoman all at once,” she captioned the photo below.”
“Thanks Sarah.”
““For the first dress When Anna Wintour asked me what I wanted to wear I said “a cape” I just want to wear a cape” she said: “well Sarah Burton with @alexandermcqueen is the one for you.” Thanks Anna.”
“Williams also thanked Wintour and Burton for their wedding dress guidance in a sweet message on Instagram.”
““I loved the idea of doing a really spectacular ball gown, and it has turned out to be such an incredibly special piece,” she said.”
““In school, I realized how much work that was, so at the end of school, I just got really smart and was like, evening wear is so intricate, and I love things that an everyday woman can wear and still feel good and look good, so I started [there].”


"But there was a dream that night, you know?"
"The British designer also designed Kate Middleton's dress, which is a popular choice for bee Shaffer, daughter of Anna Wintour, editor in chief of vogue, at all metropolitan celebrations."
Meanwhile, her groom wore an Armani suit at f ê te, which was planned by Jennifer zapinski of JZ
"In addition to the strapless and girdle dresses, Williams also sparkled with $3.5 million worth of XIV krats jewelry."
"All of a sudden I felt like a princess and Superman," she wrote in the photo below
"Thank you, Sarah."
"When Anna Wintour asked me what I wanted to wear, I said" Cape "I just wanted to wear a cape," she said, "Sarah Burton and @ Alexander McQueen are for you." Thank you, Anna
"Williams also wrote a sweet note on instagram thanking Wintour and Burton for their guidance."
"I love making a very spectacular prom dress, which is very special," she said
"In school, I realized how hard it was, so at the end of school, I became very smart, I thought, evening clothes are so complicated, I like what everyday women can wear, and still feel good and look good, so I started (there)."



Number  169
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Auditorio Citibanamex Wed 14”
“Brazil Esplanada Do Mineirao Tue 30 JUNE Bogota Colombia Parque Simon Bolivar Fri 2 San Juan Puerto Rico Coliseo De Puerto Rico Sun 4 San Jose Costa Rica Parque Viva Amphitheater Tue 6 Mexico City Mexico Palacio De Los Deportes Sat 10 Guadalajara Mexico Arena VFG Mon 12 Monterrey Mexico...”
“Mon 1 Tue 2 Lima Peru Estadio Nacional Sat 13 Santiago Chile Movistar Arena Mon 15 Buenos Aires Argentina Estadio Unico De La Plata Sat 20 Curitiba Brazil Pedreira Paulo Leminsky Tue 23 Rio de Janeiro Brazil Rio Arena Thu 25 Sao Paulo Brazil Allianz Parque Sun 28 Belo Horizonte...”
“Arena Wed 12 Thu 13 Glasgow UK SSE Hydro Sun 16 Mon 17 Newcastle UK Metro Radio Arena Wed 19 Thu 20 Manchester UK Arena Sat 22 Sun 23 Nottingham UK Motorpoint Arena Tue 25 Wed 26 Birmingham UK Barclaycard Arena Fri 28 Sat 29 MAY London UK The O2”
“Sweden Ericsson Globen Thu 30 APRIL Herning Denmark Jyske Bank Boxen Sat 1 Amsterdam The Netherlands Ziggo Dome Mon 3 Tue 4 Antwerp Belgium Sportpaleis Wed 5 Paris France Accor Hotels Arena Thu 6 Madrid Spain WiZenk Center Sat 8 Barcelona Spain Palau San Jordi Sun 9 Dublin Ireland 3”
“MARCH Turin Italy Pala Alpitour Fri 17 Zurich Switzerland Hallenstadion Sun 19 Munich Germany Olympiahalle Mon 20 Mannheim Germany SAP Arena Wed 22 Cologne Germany Lanxess Arena Thu 23 Hamburg Germany Barclaycard Arena Sun 26 Berlin Germany Mercedes Benz Arena Mon 27 London UK Royal Albert Hall Tue 28 Stockholm...”
“Check out his full tour schedule below.”
“...to June...”
“Read more Ed Sheeran s new album tour dates release date new songs and everything you need to know As well as announcing details of a special London gig at Royal Albert Hall for Teenage Cancer Trust Sheeran will play dates in the UK Europe and South America from March...”
“He has recently been spotted filming Carpool Karaoke with James Corden.”


"Wednesday, 14th, auditorium of Citi Stock Exchange"
"Brazil Marina Boulevard June 30 Tuesday Bogota Columbia Park Simon Bolivar Friday 2 San Juan Puerto Rico corisode Puerto Rico sun 4 San Jose Costa Rica Park Viva arena Tuesday 6 Mexico City Palacio dellos Saturday 10 Guadalajara Mexico arena VFG Monday 12 Monterey, Mexico..."
"Monday 1 Tuesday Lima Peru National Stadium Saturday 13 Santiago Chile cinema Monday 15 Buenos Aires Argentina National Park La Plata Saturday 20 Curitiba Brazil pedrella Paulo lemminski Tuesday 23 Rio de Janeiro Brazil arena Thursday 25 Sao Paulo Brazilian Allianz Plaza Sunday 28 Belo Horizonte..."
"Arena Wednesday 12 Thursday 13 Glasgow Scotland and Southern Energy UK hydropower Sunday 16 Monday 17 Newcastle UK MTR radio arena Wednesday 19 Thursday 20 Manchester UK arena Saturday 22 Sunday 23 Nottingham UK circuit Tuesday 25 Wednesday 26 Birmingham UK buckleca arena Friday 28 Saturday 29 London UK may 2"
"Ericsson global, Sweden, Thursday, April 30, Henning, Denmark, jyske bank, Boxen, Saturday 1 Amsterdam, Netherlands, Ziggo dome, Monday 3, Tuesday 4, Antwerp, Belgium, sportpaleis, Wednesday 5, Accor hotel arena, Paris, France, Thursday 6, wizenk center, Madrid, Spain, Saturday 8, Barcelona, Palau, Spain, San Jodi sun 9, Dublin, Ireland 3"
"March Turin, Italy, Pala appito, Friday 17 Zurich, Switzerland, harlenstadion, Sunday 19 Munich, Germany, Olympia, Halle, Monday 20 Mannheim, Germany, SAP arena, Wednesday 22 Cologne, Germany, Lancaster arena, Thursday 23 Hamburg, Germany, buckleca arena, Sunday 26 Berlin, Mercedes Benz arena, Monday 27 London, UK, Royal Albert Hall, Tuesday 28 Stockholm..."
"Look at the full schedule below him."
“… By June... "
"Learn more about ED Sheeran's new album tour dates, release dates, new songs and everything you need to know, as well as the details of the announcement of a special London concert for the youth Cancer Trust at Royal Albert Hall. Sheeran will perform dates in the UK, Europe and South America from March..."
"He was recently photographed carpooling with James Corden in karaoke."



Number  170
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ET.”
“Lip Sync Battle airs on Paramount Network on Thursdays at 10:30 p.m.”
“You Better Work in April 2016”
“Other Bravolebrities who have competed on Lip Sync Battle in past include Real Housewives of Beverly Hills Erika Jayne who performed Christina Aguilera s Fighter and Genie in a Bottle this January and Real Housewives of Atlanta s NeNe Leakes who did Aretha Franklin s Respect and RuPaul s Supermodel...”
““If she can see her tits and camel toe, she’s happy,” her costar Bethenny Frankel said on the Bravo reality series at the time.”
“Singer previously wore Spears’ iconic costume while celebrating Halloween in New York City in October 2017.”
“… I Did It Again.” She even slipped into the Princess of Pop’s red latex jumpsuit from the 2000 track’s space-themed music video.”
“Later in the episode, the RHONY star channeled her inner Britney Spears with a performance of “Oops!”
““I mean, I knew she was gonna bring it,” the Cravings cookbook author, 32, told the “Mama Said Knock You Out” rapper, 50, after the performance.”
“...words to Milkshake but her unique dance moves still brought smiles to the faces of host LL Cool J and color commentator Chrissy Teigen...”


"Wait a minute."
"Lip sync will be broadcast on paramount at 10:30 p.m. on Thursday."
"You'd better work in April 2016"
"Other stars who have participated in the oral battle in the past include Erica Jan, the real housewife of Beverly Hills, who performed Christina Aguilera's" fighters and elves "in a bottle in January this year, and Nene likes, the real housewife of Atlanta, who played Aretha Franklin's" respect "and rupaul's" supermodel "...."
"If she can see her nipples and camel toes, she's happy," said her partner, Bethany Frankel, at the time of the Bravo reality series
"The singer wore the Spear's signature costume to celebrate Halloween in New York City in October 2017."
"I did it again." She even wore the red latex Jumpsuit of the pop princess from the 2000 space theme music video
At the end of the episode, the Lonnie singer uses "Ouch!"
"I mean, I know she'll bring it," the 32 year old author of craving recipes told the 50 year old rapper after the show
“… To the milkshake, but her unique dance moves still bring smiles to the host LL Cool J and color commentator Chrissy Teigen... "



Number  171
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Associated Press contributed to this report.”
“He was banned for 10 months after claiming he and three other American swimmers were robbed at gunpoint at the 2016 Games.”
“It is the swimmer’s second suspension since the Rio Olympics.”
“Lochte’s suspension began on May 24, 2018 and he'll be eligible to return to the water in July 2019.”
“The photo has since-been deleted.”
“Lochte was set to race in four events this week at the national championships in California.”
“The 12-time Olympic medalist posted a photo of himself getting the IV in May, which prompted the investigation.”
“...a press release...”
“A subsequent investigation by USADA with which Lochte fully cooperated revealed that Lochte received an intravenous infusion of permitted substances at an infusion clinic in a volume greater than 100 mL in a 12 hour period without a Therapeutic Use Exemption TUE the U S Anti Doping Agency said in...”
“Athletes can only receive IVs through hospital treatment under anti-doping regulations.”


"The associated press contributed to this report."
"He claimed that he and three other American swimmers were robbed with guns at the 2016 Olympics and suspended for 10 months."
"This is the swimmer's second suspension since the Rio Olympics."
"Rochett's suspension will begin on May 24, 2018, and he will be eligible to return to the water in July 2019."
"This picture was later deleted."
"Rochette will compete in four events at the national championships in California this week."
"The 12 time Olympic medalist sparked an investigation in May when he released a photo of himself receiving an intravenous injection."
“… Press release... "
"The U.S. Army Department then conducted a comprehensive cooperative investigation with Rochette. The results showed that Rochette received intravenous infusion for 12 hours at an infusion clinic, with the infusion volume of more than 100 ml, while the U.S. Anti Doping Agency said on Tuesday that it did not obtain the exemption for therapeutic use..."
"According to the Anti Doping regulations, athletes can only receive intravenous injections through hospital treatment."



Number  172
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Fantastic Beasts: The Crimes of Grindelwald” hits theaters Nov. 16.”
“His is set to direct the remaining three movies rounding out the “Fantastic Beasts” saga, with Rowling continuing on as a screenwriter.”
“He previously directed the last four movies in the original Harry Potter franchise, as well as the first “Fantastic Beasts” installment.”
““Fantastic Beasts: The Crimes of Grindelwald” marks Yates’ fifth foray into the Wizarding World.”
“J.K. Rowling, the Harry Potter author who wrote the screenplays for both “Fantastic Beasts” movies, has since defended the decision to cast Depp on Twitter, citing both Heard’s and Depp’s desires to move on.”
““It has to be you.”The trailer debuted amid casting controversy surrounding Depp, who was accused of domestic abuse by his ex-wife, Amber Heard, in court filings.”
““I can’t move against Grindelwald,” Dumbledore tells Scamander in the clip.”
“The David Yates film follows Dumbledore and Scamander, his former student, as they join forces to recapture an escaped Gellert Grindelwald, played by Johnny Depp, who is on a mission to dominate all non-magical people with the help of his pureblood wizard followers.”
“It’s teased that Scamander is acting under orders from Dumbledore to head to Paris, but as the future-Hogwarts headmaster notes, Scamander isn’t one for taking orders well.”
“Warner Bros. put a spell on Harry Potter fans Tuesday with the release of the first trailer for “Fantastic Beasts: The Crimes of Grindelwald.”In the trailer, Eddie Redmayne returns as the charmingly clumsy Newt Scamander, while Jude Law makes his Wizarding World debut as a young Albus Dumbledore.”


Monster: the crime of Greenwald will be released on November 16
He will direct the remaining three films, telling the legend of the "magical beast," and Rowling will continue to be a screenwriter
He previously directed the last four films in the Harry Potter series and the first monster series
"Monster: the crime of Greenwald" marks Yates's fifth entry into the wizarding world
Harry Potter author J.K. Rowling wrote scripts for both monster films, and later defended the decision to choose Depp on twitter on the grounds that both Hurd and Depp wanted to move on
"It must be you." The trailer premieres in the controversy over Depp, who is accused of domestic abuse by his ex-wife amber Hurd in court documents
"I can't fight against Greenwald," Dumbledore tells scarmand in the clip
David Yates's film is about Dumbledore and his former student scarmand joining hands to recapture Johnny Depp's role as the runaway Garrett Greenwald, whose mission is to rule all non magical people with the help of his followers of pure blood wizards
"Some people jokingly say that scarmander went to Paris on Dumbledore's order, but as the future headmaster of Hogwarts said, scarmander is not good at taking orders."
Warner Bros. released the first trailer of monster: the crime of Greenwald on Tuesday, bringing a surprise to Harry Potter fans. In the trailer, Eddie Redman plays a charming and clumsy newt scamand, and Jude Law makes his debut as a young Albus Dumbledore



Number  173
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Next.”RELATED VIDEO: The Real Housewives of New York City Go Makeup-Free For PEOPLE’s Beautiful Issue...”
““I will remember this entire experience with delight, humor, and a veracious accuracy.”
“My original curiosity about reality television has waned over the years and I am focusing on TV and writing projects that better suit my more steady temperament.”“I have worked with amazing producers, made great friends, and I’m thrilled to leave frenemies behind,” she concluded.”
““I am sure this does not come as a surprise to any of the viewers, all of whom have been supportive, encouraging, and kind.”
““After six seasons on Bravo’s RHONY, I have decided to return to what I do best — journalism and producing,” she said in a statement.”
“My faith is in Bravo, so I’m sure whoever they pick will be great.”Radziwill, an award-winning journalist and best-selling author who had been a Housewife since season 5, announced her departure from the show on Wednesday exclusively to PEOPLE.”
““I know I brought some girls to Bravo’s attention.”
“...said...”
“It s going to be a void for me Image zoom Ramona Singer left and Carole Radziwill Credit Charles Sykes Bravo Getty 2 Asked who she thinks should replace Radziwill Singer said network executives at Bravo are pretty perceptive They bring somebody on that some of the girls know she...”
““It’s going to be a void.”


"Next." Related video: Real Housewives in New York City make up for people's beauty for free
"I will remember the whole experience with pleasure, humor and accuracy."
"Over the years, my initial curiosity about reality shows has faded, and I'm focusing on TV and writing projects that are better suited to my more stable personality." "I've worked with great producers and made a lot of good friends, and I'm happy to leave them behind," she concluded
"I'm sure it won't surprise any audience. They are supportive, encouraging and kind."
"After six seasons of Bravo's" Rona, "she said in a statement," I decided to go back to what I do best - Journalism and production. "
"My faith is good, so I believe that whoever they choose will be great." Radziwill, an award-winning journalist and best-selling author who has been a housewife since the fifth season, announced on Wednesday that she would leave the show and just tell people
"I know I got some girls to get Bravo's attention."
“… Say... "
"It's going to be a blank image for me to zoom in on La Mona singer left and Carol laziwell credit Charles Sikes bravogeti 2 was asked who she thought should replace the laziwell singer and said that the network directors in Bravo were quite sharp and they brought some people to know about some girls about her..."
"It's going to be a blank."



Number  174
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Write to Kate Samuelson at kate.samuelson@time.com.”
“If you don't get the confirmation within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder.”
“The auction will take place on April 27-28, following performances of the musical Ryan Raftery Is the Most Powerful Woman In Fashion, which stars Ryan Raftery and parodies Wintour’s decision to place Kim Kardashian and Kanye West on the cover of Vogue.”
“The show originally premiered three years ago, but was revived by Raftery after President Donald Trump rolled back bathroom guidelines for transgender students.”
“In an interview with V Magazine Raftery described Wintour s decision to donate her sunglasses to the auction which also includes a 1 000 gift certificate for the men s clothing store Bergdorf Goodman as thrilling He added I m very happy that the proceeds will benefit this organization so...”
“...dear to me and necessary to thousands of LGBT youth across the country H T Refinery29 Get our Health Newsletter...”
“Sign up to receive the latest health and science news, plus answers to wellness questions and expert tips.”
“Please enter a valid email address.”
“* The request timed out and you did not successfully sign up.”
“Please attempt to sign up again.”


"To Kate Samuelson. Kate Samuelson @ time.com."
"If you are not confirmed within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder."
"The auction will be held from April 27 to 28, after the musical" Ryan Raftery is the most power woman in fashion "starred by Ryan Raftery and imitating Wintour's decision to put Kim Kardashian and Kanye West on the cover of" vogue. "
"The show first premiered three years ago, but after President Donald Trump lifted the bathroom guidelines for transgender students, Raftery relaunched it."
"In an interview with V magazine, Raftery described Wintour's decision to donate her sunglasses to the auction, which also included a 1000 gift certificate from Bergdorf Goodman, a men's clothing store. He was very exciting, and he added," I'm glad the proceeds will benefit the organization, so... "
“…… Dear, it is necessary for thousands of LGBT youth across the country to obtain our health communication.... "
"Register for the latest health and science news, as well as answers to health questions and expert tips."
Please enter a valid email address
"* the request timed out. You did not register successfully."
"Please try to register again."



Number  175
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But that’s not what you’re saying, Jessica.”
“But it seems like Jason is saying that this is part of the process.”
“Again, there is context.”
“What we do for a living is not normal, and therefore the process is not normal sometimes, and to expect it to be normal is to not understand what happens on set.”
“Again, not to excuse it, Alia, but to be surprised by people having a wobbly route to their goal, their process — it’s very rarely predictable.”
“All I can say, personally, is I have never learned more from an actor that I’ve worked with than Jeffrey Tambor.”
“And I consider him one of my favorite, most valued people in my life.”
“CROSS I agree with everybody.”
“And I think it’s important to note — and it hasn’t been noted — that this kind of behavior that’s being described, it didn’t just come out of the blue.”
“It wasn’t zero to 60.”


"But that's not what you mean, Jessica."
"But Jason seems to be saying it's part of the process."
"Again, there is a background."
"It's not normal what we rely on to make a living, so sometimes this process is not normal. To expect it to be normal is to not understand what happened on the set."
"Again, not for excuses, especially to surprise people at their goals, their process is a shaky path - it's almost unpredictable."
"Personally, what I can say is that I've never learned more from an actor I've worked with than Jeffrey Tambor."
"I think he is one of my favorite and most valuable people in my life."
"I agree with you."
"I think it's important that we don't notice that the behavior that people describe doesn't come out of the blue."
"Not 0-60."



Number  176
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“3.”
“And also an actual tribute to the real Alex Trebek and not the parody.”
“Icon.”
“JLo?”
“Sorry, that’s the way the cookie crumbles.”
“...iconic singers of which the Weeknd is not...”
“Address the elephant in the room the elephant that I m referring to is of course the fact that just anyone can purchase their spot at the Super Bowl now and a stage that large should be exclusively reserved for...”
“I get that the world is crumbling and people just want reasons to celebrate and act like shit’s normal but this has a real dad just hit mom at the dinner table and everyone be quiet vibe to it.”
“Everyone needs to slow their roll.”
“(Related note: all of this can also apply to LiveNation who thinks they’re going to reboot the concert industry through an app to verify if you’ve been vaccinated.)”


“3.”
"It's also a tribute to the real Alex trebeck, not an imitation."
"Icon."
“JLo？”
"Sorry, that's how the biscuits break."
“… Iconic singer, this week is not... "
"To solve the problem of elephants in the room, I mean elephants, of course. Now anyone can buy their position in the super bowl, so the big stage should be reserved for..."
"I know the world is collapsing and people just want to have a reason to celebrate and behave like shit, but there's a real dad here, just beating mom at the dinner table and everyone is quiet."
"Everyone needs to slow down."
"(Note: all of this applies to live nation who thinks they're going to use an app to verify that you're vaccinated and restart the concert industry."



Number  177
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“New chapter: Jenelle is marrying her fiance David Eason on September 23”
“'My mom just took the role as mom and dad growing up, she was very hostile and yelling and screaming all the time.'”
“In a new interview with E!”
“News Jenelle Evans talks about her troubled childhood, struggle with drug addiction and her hostile relationship with her mother.”
“The 25-year-old reality star admitted she once came close to killing herself as her substance abuse spiraled out of control.”
“'I think my low point was with my drug issue and the whole heroin thing,' the North Carolina native said.”
“Scroll down for video Teen Mom 2 s Jenelle Evans opens up about her struggle with drugs and troubled relationship with her mother in a new interview I think my low point was with my drug issue and the whole heroin thing the North Carolina native said I almost overdosed...”
“...and died...”
“I was trying to run away from my problems' she admitted.”
“Jenelle recalled the moment that she realized she had to get help.”


"New chapter: Janel will marry her fiance David Ethan on September 23"
"My mother just played the role of mom and dad when she was growing up. She was very hostile and kept yelling."
"In a new interview!"
News jeanel Evans tells about her childhood troubles, her struggle with drug addiction and her hostile relationship with her mother
"The 25-year-old reality TV star admitted that she nearly committed suicide because of out of control drug abuse."
"I think my bottom line is the drug problem and the whole heroin problem," the North Carolina said
"Scrolling down video teen Mom 2's Janel Evans opened up her fight against drugs and her relationship with her mother in a new interview, I think my low point is my drug problem and the whole heroin thing, North Carolina says I'm almost overdose..."
“… And then he died... "
"I'm trying to avoid my problems," she admits
"Janel recalled the moment when she realized she had to ask for help."



Number  178
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She and Sudeikis, who is nine years his wife-to-be's senior, initially began dating in 2011 and have since played opposite each other in the 2013 film Drinking Buddies.”
“Their firstborn was a son called Otis Alexander Sudeikis and was born in April of 2014, about three months after his parents got engaged.”
“...by her fiancé Jason Sudeikis...”
“The way it was Her previously longer and more solidly brown hair did indeed rather resemble that of Melania Trump who on January 20 will become America s First Lady Daisy Josephine Sudeikis who wound up entering the world on October 11 is Wilde s second child and first daughter...”
“In September, she'd revealed that her then-impending baby would be a girl in a tweet criticising Trump's remarks about women.”
“The 32-year-old's made no secret of her disgust for Melania's husband Donald Trump, having told Page Six in October that his candidacy was 'really sickening.'”
“Lady...”
“Feelin myself apparently The 32 year old herself posted a GIF in which she played with her no hairdo her caption including the hashtag nomoremelaniahair Her previously longer and more solidly brown hair did indeed rather resemble that of Melania Trump who on January 20 will become America s First...”
“Josh captioned: 'When you blow @oliviawilde 's mind with a hair chop and highlights,' adding two heart emojis at the end.”
“Wearing a comfortable-looking knit jumper, the House actress held her mouth slightly agape and flicked her tongue upwards inside it.”


"She and sudaikis, who are nine years older than his wife to be, first dated in 2011, and then played opposite roles in the 2013 movie" drinking friends. "
"Their eldest son, Otis Alexander sudeikis, was born in April 2014, three months after his parents got engaged."
“…… By her fiance Jason sudikis... "
"She used to grow longer and stronger brown hair, which is really like Melania trump. She will become the first lady of the United States on January 20, Daisy Josephine sudeikis. She entered the world on October 11, and is Wang Erde's second child and first daughter..."
"In September, she revealed in a tweet criticizing Trump's remarks about women that her child to be born at that time would be a girl."
"Melania, 32, made no secret of her disgust with her husband, Donald Trump, who told page 6 in October that her candidacy was disgusting."
"Lady..."
"It's obvious to me that at the age of 32, she has posted a GIF of her own, in which she has no hairstyle. Her title includes the label nomoremalania hair. Her longer and stronger brown hair is really like Melania trump. She will be the first one in the United States on January 20..."
Josh's title is: "when you hit @ Olivia Wilde's mind with haircuts and highlights, add two heart-shaped expressions at the end."
The family actress wore a comfortable looking knitted pullover with her mouth slightly open and her tongue bouncing up



Number  179
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Find the full dates of Lady Gaga's Las Vegas MGM Park Theater residency here.”
“Check out what they said!”
“...https://t.co/pv0Ib9sGnV #GAGAVEGAS pic.twitter.com/DsZhRH79KH — Lady Gaga (@ladygaga) August 7, 2018The Backstreet Boys even had some advice for the "Poker Face" singer in a recent interview.”
“Gaga tweeted the announcement:LADY GAGA ENIGMATHE LAS VEGAS RESIDENCY AT @PARKTHEATERLVPLUS 4 EXCLUSIVE JAZZ & PIANO ENGAGEMENTSLITTLE MONSTERS PRE-SALE TOMORROWON SALE 8/13.”
“The Mother Monster's new show, Enigma, is described as a “brand-new odyssey of her pop hits built as an experience unlike any other.” She will also be playing "stripped-down versions of her hits" on her Jazz & Piano show dates.”
“She'll be performing at the MGM Park Theater beginning on December 28, 2018, and lasting through November 8, 2019.”
“Pop superstar Lady Gaga has officially landed her first Las Vegas residency.”


"Find the full date of Lady Gaga's stay at the MGM Park theater in Las Vegas here."
"Look what they said!"
“... https://t.co/pv0Ib9sGnV# Vegas, GA pic.twitter.com/DsZhRH79KH -Lady Gaga (@ ladygaga) August 7, 2018 backstreet boy even made some suggestions to the "poker face" singer in a recent interview
"Gaga wrote on her micro blog that singer: Lady Gaga mystery live in Las Vegas @ parktheaterlvplus 4 exclusive jazz and Piano activities monster pre-sale will be on sale tomorrow, August 13."
The monster mother's new play enigma is described as "a new Odyssey of her pop songs, a unique experience.". She will also perform "a simplified version of her pop songs" on jazz and piano day
"She will start performing at MGM Park Theatre on December 28, 2018 and continue until November 8, 2019."
"Pop star Lady Gaga's first residence in Las Vegas."



Number  180
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“— you’ve been warned of your fate:For more on True American, click here to find out what happened when an EW writer tried to play.”
“...legal drinking age and to play responsibly...”
“True American is a fictional drinking game played on New Girl where the floor is lava you drink from a bottle of whiskey that s surrounded by beers and you shout JFK FDR sometimes...”
“There’s more to it than that, but not much more — the rules are a little unclear, to say the least.”
“In attendance at the series’ 100th episode party in Los Angeles last week, EW asked the cast of the Liz Meriwether comedy to weigh in on the game and bestow some insight into how to play.”
“No surprise, all of their answers reflected the ambiguity — and absolute insanity — of the game.”
“WANT MORE EW?”
“Subscribe now to keep up with the latest in movies, television, and music.”
““The first person to get drunk wins,” said Lamorne Morris, who stars as quirky cop/cat owner Winston.”
““Obviously, there are no rules for True American.”


"- you've been warned of fate: for more on real America, click here to learn what happens when an EW writer tries to play a game
“…… Legal drinking age and responsible play... "
"The real American is a fictional drinking game. In the new girl, the floor is lava, you drink a bottle of whisky, surrounded by beer, you sometimes call Kennedy Roosevelt..."
"It's more than that, but it's not much - at least, the rules are a little unclear."
At a party in Los Angeles last week for episode 100 of the series, EW asked the actors of the Liz Merriwether comedy to comment on the game and give some insights on how to play it
"Not surprisingly, all of their answers reflect the fuzziness and absolute madness of the game."
"Want more?"
Subscribe now to keep up with the latest movies, TV and music
"The first drunk won," says lamoun Morris, who plays the eccentric cop / cat owner Winston
"It's clear that real Americans have no rules."



Number  181
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here...”
“...to keep you informed about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here INDY LIFE Newsletter Be inspired with the latest lifestyle trends every week The Independent would like to keep you informed...”
“INDY LIFE Newsletter Be inspired with the latest lifestyle trends every week Please enter your email address Please enter a valid email address Please enter a valid email address SIGN UP Thanks for signing up to the INDY LIFE newsletter verifyErrors message verifyErrors verifyErrors message verifyErrors The Independent would like...”
“Then enjoy comfortable shoes that are molded to your feet and won’t pinch, squeeze or rub your toes.”
“If you have time, ideally do this a couple of times.”
“Walk around your house at least until the shoes have cooled - the longer you can keep them on the better.”
“Repeat with the other shoe.”
“Put the shoe on your foot.”
“Blast one of the shoes all over with a hair dryer for around a minute, until it’s warm and soft.”
“Here’s what to do:Put thick socks on your feet.”


“… Please check the box for activities and updates provided by email. If you would like to contact, please read our complete mailing list and agree to terms... "
“… In order to let you know about the offer and the latest news through email, please check the box. If you want to contact, please read our complete mailing list agreement terms. Here, Indy life news is inspired by the latest lifestyle trends. The weekly independent wants to let you know... "
"Inspired by the latest lifestyle trends every week, Indy life newsletters please enter your email address please enter a valid email address please enter a valid email address registration thank you for registering in Indy life newsletters verifyerrors message verifyerrors message verifyerrors message verifyerrors the independent hope..."
"Then enjoy the comfort of the shoe, which is molded into your feet without pinching, squeezing or rubbing your toes."
"If you have time, you'd better do it a few times."
"At least walk around the house until the shoes are cold - the longer you wear, the better."
"Repeat with the other shoe."
"Put your shoes on your feet."
"Blow a shoe all over with a hair dryer for about a minute until it's warm and soft."
"What to do: put thick socks on your feet."



Number  182
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The gym erupted in cheers, with students jumping up and down with joy as green and white confetti poured down — Rockport-Fulton’s school colors.”
“As soon as the break was over, DeGeneres revealed the $1 million gift.”
“Five Rockport-Fulton girl volleyball players shared their painful stories and commitment to helping their community.”
“DeGeneres surprised the high school’s students on her show after playing a special video.”
“Rockport-Fulton is the only high school in the town — and its gym nicknamed Gold Gym was leveled by the storm.”
“The area was severely impacted, with $55 million in damages.”
“The eye of the storm passed directly over Rockport.”
“When the Category 4 storm made landfall in Rockport on August 25, Aransas County ISD suffered some of the most devastating damage of any of the Texas school districts.”
“...https://t.co/BvCKTiX1J5 — JJ Watt (@JJWatt) April 16, 2018Last August, DeGeneres committed $50,000 of her own money to Harvey relief and presented a $1 million check from Walmart to J.J. Watt’s fundraising efforts.”
“Keep spreading the power of positivity!!”


Cheers broke out in the gymnasium, students jumped up and down with joy, green and white confetti poured in - this is the school color of Lockport Fulton
"As soon as the break was over, DeGeneres revealed a million dollar gift."
"Five Rockport Fulton women's volleyball players shared their painful stories and promised to help their community."
"After playing a special video, DeGeneres surprised high school students in her program."
"Rockport Fulton is the only high school in town, and its stadium, nicknamed golden stadium, was razed by the storm."
"The region has been severely affected, with losses of $55 million."
"The eye of the storm passed directly over Lockport."
"On August 25, when storm 4 made landfall at Lockport, the alanthas County ISD suffered some of the most devastating of all the school districts in Texas."
“... https://t.co/BvCKTiX1J5-JJ  Watt (@ jjwatt) April 16, 2018. In August last year, DeGeneres promised to donate his $50000 to Harvey relief and presented a $1 million check from Wal Mart to j.j.watt's fund-raising activities. "
"Continue to spread positive power!"



Number  183
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“More From In TouchBeyoncé's Twins Experienced the Ultimate Diva Delivery, Obviously (EXCLUSIVE)Beyoncé Had a “Harder Time” With This Pregnancy, Source ClaimsBeyoncé's Security Team Conducted Trial Runs for Twins' Birth (EXCLUSIVE)”
““She is fearful that he’ll show up uninvited like he did with [their five-year-old daughter] Blue.”
“Beyoncé gave birth to twins — a boy and a girl — on Monday, June 12, but the delivery didn't go as smoothly as she and husband JAY-Z had planned.”
“Despite conducting trial runs with her security team, the day was chaotic — In Touch exclusively learned.”
“"There was a lot of drama, specifically with the Knowles family,” says a source.”
“"Beyoncé made it clear that she wanted this day to run smoothly, but her family just did not listen."”
“MORE: Beyoncé and JAY-Z's Twins Are Still in the Hospital After Suffering "Minor" Medical IssueThe superstar, who stayed at UCLA Medical Center with her twins following an unspecified health issue, was reportedly furious.”
“"This was supposed to be one of the most touching and beautiful days of her life," adds the source.”
“"But Beyoncé was so stressed out because of all the fighting."”
“Bey's estranged father, Mathew Knowles, was one of the day's biggest stressors.”


"More twins from touchbeyonc é experienced the final Diva delivery, and it is clear that (exclusive) Beyonc é had a" hard time "in this pregnancy. The safety team from claims Beyonc é conducted a trial run (exclusive) for the birth of twins."
"She was worried that he would come uninvited, just like he did to (their five-year-old daughter) blue."
"Beyonce gave birth to twins, a man and a woman, on Monday, June 12, but the delivery was not as smooth as she and her husband Jay-Z planned."
"Despite the trial run with her security team, the day was still a mess - totally in contact."
"There's a lot of drama, especially with the Knowles family," one source said
"Beyonce made it clear that she wanted the day to go well, but her family just didn't listen."
More information: Beyonce and Jay's twins are still in hospital after experiencing "minor" medical problems. The superstar was at UCLA Medical Center with her twins because of an unknown health problem, and she was reported to be very angry
"It should be one of the most touching and beautiful days of her life," the source added
"But Beyonce was under a lot of pressure because of the fight."
"Beth's estranged father, Matthew Knowles, was one of the biggest stressors of the day."



Number  184
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The effect is kind of ludicrously seedy, and MacLachlan is a little uncomfortable there; he’s better in the moments where he is called on to emote silently while trapped in the Black Lodge.”
“MacLachlan is doused in spray tan and wearing snakeskin; Lynch’s manifestation of evil appears to be a guy wearing leather with a half-ponytail.”
“But Showtime gave David Lynch nearly carte blanche for this new production, and as a result, it really doesn’t have that low-budget patina.”
“It’s one of the reasons “Twin Peaks” is so aesthetically unique.”
“Part of that mood was a low-budget sensibility, which translated to artfully deliberate poor quality.”
“Much of the odd, creepy charm of the original “Twin Peaks” was that Lynch was shoehorning his bizarre vision into a murder arc of a soap opera — with its interminable pacing, melodramatic music, and small-town archetypal characters.”
“At the same time, the Black Lodge is also where one of the first obvious differences between the old and new “Twin Peaks” emerges: the simple fact of production values.”
“Lynch, throughout “Twin Peaks,” is at his absolute best in Black Lodge scenes, and there is a bit of relief in seeing that even in this Showtime interpretation, the Black Lodge is still eerie and destabilizing.”
“The new “Twin Peaks” uses grounding footage from the old “Twin Peaks” to establish some of the basics of the mythology: Cooper is stuck in the Lodge while his doppelgänger — inhabited by Bob (Frank Silva), an evil spirit — is in the world.”
“Lynch, who directed the episode and co-wrote it with Mark Frost, begins with the Black Lodge, which he explored extensively in the second-season finale and in “Twin Peaks: Fire Walk With Me,” the prequel film.”


"The effect is a bit absurd, McClaren is a bit uncomfortable there; he's better when he's trapped in a black hut, when he's asked to express his feelings quietly."
"McClaren was splashed brown and dressed in snakeskin; Lynch's evil performance seemed to be a guy with half ponytail."
"But Showtime gives David Lynch almost full responsibility for the new work, so it's really not that low budget bronze."
"That's one of the reasons why shuangfengji is so unique in aesthetics."
"Part of the mood is low budget sensitivity, which translates into well planned low quality."
"The original" bimodal "has a lot of strange, creepy charm, that is, Lynch put his strange illusion into the murder arc of soap opera - with endless rhythm, dramatic music and town archetypal characters."
"At the same time, black Lodge is also one of the first obvious differences between the old and new" twin peaks ": the simple fact of production value."
"Lynch is absolutely in the best state in the scene of" black lodge "in the whole bimodal. It's a bit relieved to see that even in the interpretation of the performance time," black lodge "is still weird and unstable."
"The new bimodal uses the grounded lens of the old bimodal and builds some basic myths: Cooper is trapped in the hut, while his cover singer Bob (Frank Silva) lives in the world, an evil soul."
Lynch directed the episode and co authored it with mark frost, who began with the black house and explored it extensively in the season 2 finale and the prequel movie bimodal: go off with me



Number  185
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In the meantime, check out all of her latest pics in our gallery above.”
“We’ll keep you posted on all of the latest news about Taylor.”
“Maybe she’ll receive a new suitcase for the holidays!”
“Who knows?”
“In a new interview for the December issue of Vogue U.K Zayn admitted, “She was traveling around in a suitcase,” in order to avoid the paparazzi while she was recording Reputation.”
“Way back in 2017, there was a lot of speculation that Taylor had been transported outside of her apartment in a suitcase.”
“...have seemingly confirmed a wild theory about Taylor...”
“They always live the best life but they are definitely going to be very much spoiled this year and their holiday season is going to be awesome because Taylor loves them so much We reported earlier how Zayn Malik may...”
““As for gifts for the holidays she really wants to and will spoil Olivia and Meredith, her cats,” our source went on to say.”
“Things are pretty good.”However, despite not wanting any presents herself, Taylor is all about treating her feline besties Olivia and Meredith to all of the best gifts.”


"At the same time, please see all her latest photos in our gallery above."
"We'll keep you updated on Taylor."
"Maybe she'll get a new suitcase for the holiday!"
"Who knows?"
In a new interview with British fashion magazine in December, Zahn admitted that "she's walking around in a suitcase" to avoid paparazzi's reputation.
"As early as 2017, there was a lot of speculation that Taylor was transported out of the apartment in a suitcase."
“… Seems to confirm a crazy theory about Taylor... "
"They always have the best life, but they're going to be spoiled this year. Their vacation will be great because Taylor loves them so much. We've reported before that Zane Malik might..."
"As for holiday gifts, she really wants to, and will spoil her cats Olivia and Meredith," our source continued
"Everything is fine." However, although Taylor didn't want any gifts herself, she gave all the best gifts to her cats Olivia and Meredith



Number  186
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“According to a Hollywood Life source, Ariana has serious plans for her wedding to the comedianCuteness overload: The pair took to social media to show off more loved-up anticsCloud nine: Davidson goofs off for his new fiance...”
“The Saturday Night Live star opted for a new tattoo that read 'REBORN'Stylish: Ariana stunned in a brown oversized sweater for the outingStrutting her style!”
“She gave a flash of her toned legs and completed her look with $1800 Gucci boots.”
“T shirt and green shorts Ariana stunned in a brown oversized sweater for the outing...”
“Suits her The No Tears Left To Cry songstress had her dark locks with added extensions slicked back into her signature high pony tail Beauty Ariana s makeup was kept radiant with illuminated cheekbones and a dark nude lip Casual Pete opted for a super casual look with a grey...”
“And it's not Pete's first trip to the parlor, with the comedian covering up the face of his ex-girlfriend Cazzie David.”
“The Saturday Night Live star's ink reads: 'REBORN'.”
“She gave a flash of her toned legs and completed her look with $1800 Gucci bootsCaptioning the video, Ariana wrote: '4ever' and tagged Pete and friends Courtney Chipolone, Scott Nicholson and KiD oRange.”
“'H2GKMO': Ariana and a friend showcased new ink - it stands for Honest To God Knock Me OutMy turn!”
“Wedding of the year!”


"According to a Hollywood Life source, Ariana has a serious plan for her wedding to the comedian: they show their favorite anti comedy story on social media. Festival 9: Davidson is lazy for his new fiance..."
The star, who was broadcast live on Saturday night, chose a new tattoo with the words "rebirth" on it: "Ariana was stunned when she was traveling in a brown oversized sweater, showing her style!"
"She showed off her legs and finished her look with $1800 Gucci boots."
"T-shirt and green shorts, Ariana was stunned when she went out in a big brown sweater..."
"Suitable for her, the tearless female singer adds an extra extension to her black hair, smoothly inserts the makeup of her iconic high horsetail beauty Ariana, keeps her bright cheekbones and black bare lips casual, and Pete chooses a super casual gray look..."
"And it's not the first time pete has gone to the living room. The comedian has covered the face of his ex girlfriend, Katie David."
"The ink of the live star on Saturday night said:" rebirth. "
Ariana wrote: "she finished her look with $1800 gucci shoes to show her strong legs in the video. She wrote: 'forever' and labeled Pitt and his friends Courtney chipuron, Scott Nicholson and Kidd orange
"H2gkmo": Ariana and a friend show off new ink - it represents being honest with God, it's my turn! "
"Wedding of the year!"



Number  187
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“'A perfect combination of Mom and Dad,' one person wrote.”
“While a lot of the commenters think the boy is his dad's mini-me, there were a few that saw Savannah in him.”
“'My little buddy turned 2 today.”
“In the sweet snapshots, Charley can be seen leaning over his cake and blowing out the candles.”
“...son on Instagram in honor of his big day...”
“In one sweet snapshot Charley can be seen blowing out the candles on his cake Little man Earlier in the day Savannah celebrated Charley s birthday by sharing snapshots of her son s most adorable moments over the past year Savannah s husband Mike Feldman also shared photos of their...”
“Adorable: Savannah's husband, Mike Feldman, also shared photos of their son on Instagram in honor of his big dayMake a wish!”
“They topped off the cake with candles, including one shaped liked the number '2.'”
“Savannah also struck a pose with her daughter in front of the cake they made, which featured 'Charley' written in white icing and a sprinkling of M&M's.”
“In one snapshot, he is happily putting his finger in the chocolate icing after his mom placed the cake in front of him.”


One wrote: "the perfect combination of mom and dad."
"Although many commentators think the boy is his father's mini me, some people see the shadow of Savannah."
"My little friend is two years old today."
"In the sweet snapshot, you can see Charlie leaning on the cake and blowing out the candle."
“… My son commemorates his big day on instagram... "
"In a sweet snapshot, you can see Charlie blowing out the candles on the cake. Earlier on the day Savannah celebrated Charlie's birthday, Savannah shared a snapshot of her son's loveliest moment in the past year. Savannah's husband, Mike Feldman, also shared their photos..."
"Cute: Savannah's husband, Mike Feldman, also shared his son's photo on instagram to commemorate his son's birthday and make a wish!"
They put candles on the top of the cake, one of which looks like "2"
Savannah and her daughter also posed in front of their cake, which had "Charlie" written in white icing and some M & M's
"In a snapshot, when his mother put the cake before and after his face, he happily put his fingers in the chocolate icing."



Number  188
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Incredibly, Swanepoel was pregnant during her last gig strutting her stuff down the runway of the Victoria's Secret Fashion Show at Shanghai's Mercedes-Benz Arena on November 20.”
“That same day, the 32-year-old Dutch model (R) shared a snap of herself and the 29-year-old IMG Model lounging in their bikinis captioned: 'Enjoying the sun with this gorgeous soul!'”
“The 29-year-old IMG Model - who boasts 13.2M social media followers - called it a 'special moment' while clad in a grey underwire bikini from her upcoming swimwear collection, TropicofC.”
“'Myllena is amazed by the fact that there is a baby growing in Candice her belly,' the 32-year-old Dutch model explained on Instagram.”
“Scroll down for video'Special moment!'”
“Doutzen Kroes three year old daughter Myllena Mae L was fascinated by her pregnant pal Candice Swanepoel s R growing belly while vacationing on a Brazilian beach in Bahia on Tuesday So am I it s always special and empowering to see a pregnant woman but to see the way...”
“...she carries amazes me every time I see her...”
“Bless you and the baby, sweet Candice!'”
“The South African stunner has been on holiday with Doutzen - who also has a son Phyllon Joy, nearly 7 - and her husband of seven years, DJ Sunnery James.”
“That same day, Kroes shared a snap of herself and Candice lounging in their bikinis captioned: 'Enjoying the sun with this gorgeous soul!'”


"It's incredible that on November 20, on the catwalk of Victoria's Secret Fashion Show at the Mercedes Benz arena in Shanghai, svanepol was pregnant when he swaggered to show his things at his last concert."
On the same day, the 32 year old Dutch model (R) shared a photo of herself. The 29 year old img model said lazily in a bikini: "enjoy the sunshine with this beautiful soul!"
The 29 year old img model, who claims to have 13.2 million fans on social media, wore a bikini in grey underwear from the upcoming swimsuit line tropicofc, calling it a "special moment."
"Myllena is surprised that Candice has a baby in her stomach," the 32 year old Dutch model explained on instagram
"Scroll down video" special moment! '””
"Doutzen Kroes's three-year-old daughter, mylena Mae L, is fascinated by her pregnant friend Candice Swanepoel's growing stomach during a holiday on a Brazilian beach in Bahia on Tuesday, so I'm always special. I can see a pregnant woman, but I can see the road..."
“… Every time I see her, she surprises me... "
"Bless you and the child, dear Candice!"
"The South African stuntman has been on holiday with dutzen, who has a nearly seven-year-old son, Phelan joy, and her husband of seven years, DJ Sunari James."
On the same day, cross and Candice shared a photo of Candice lying lazily in a bikini with the title: "enjoy the sunshine with this beautiful soul!"



Number  189
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The comedian has also apologized, and was dropped from her co-hosting gig at CNN’s New Year’s Eve show.”
“Late last month, Kathy Griffin posed for a photo shoot in which she held up a bloody prop head that resembled Trump.”
““I hope that some of Mr. Depp’s colleagues will speak out against this type of rhetoric as strongly as they would if his comments were directed to a Democrat elected official.”Depp is only the latest celebrity to find himself in hot water over violent commentary aimed at Trump.”
““President Trump has condemned violence in all forms and it’s sad that others like Johnny Depp have not followed his lead,” the statement read.”
““However, it has been a while and maybe it is time.”Shortly after news broke of Depp’s comments, the White House issued a statement strongly condemning the joke and calling on others in Hollywood to speak out.”
“I lie for a living,” he added at the U.K. music festival.”
““I want to qualify, I am not an actor.”
“Depp’s joke, in reference to the assassination of Abraham Lincoln by John Wilkes Booth in 1865, was made during an appearance at the Glastonbury Festival.”
“I was only trying to amuse, not to harm anyone,” the actor said in a statement to People on Friday.”
“Johnny Depp has issued an apology for a controversial comment about President Donald Trump, asking, “When was the last time an actor assassinated a president?”“It did not come out as intended, and I intended no malice.”


"The comedian also apologized for the cancellation of her co hosting job on CNN's new year's Eve show."
"At the end of last month, Kathy Griffin posed for a picture, holding a bloody prop like Trump's head."
"I hope that some of Depp's colleagues will be as strongly against this kind of speech as they were against a democratically elected official of the Democratic Party." Depp is just the latest celebrity to get into trouble with violent comments on trump
"President trump has condemned all forms of violence, and it is regrettable that others such as Johnny Depp have not followed his example," the statement said
"However, it's been a while, maybe it's time." Shortly after Depp's comments came out, the White House issued a statement strongly condemning the joke and calling on others in Hollywood to comment
"I lied to survive," he said at the British Music Festival.
"I want to qualify. I'm not an actor."
Depp's joke is about John Wilkes Booth's assassination of Abraham Lincoln in 1865, told at the Glastonbury Festival
"I just want to amuse, not hurt anyone," the actor said in a statement to people on Friday
"When was the last time an actor assassinated the president?" asked Johnny Depp, apologizing for controversial remarks about President Donald Trump? "It wasn't intentional, and I didn't mean it."



Number  190
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“If you're reading this in the app please click here.”
“MailOnline brings you the latest updates.”
“By 1pm the newlyweds will emerge at the West Steps of the Chapel where they'll be waved off on their carriage procession by members of both families.”
“After stepping in as a late replacement it was revealed Prince Charles will walk Ms Markle down the aisle at 12pm before the royal couple say their vows.”
“More than a 100,000 royal fans have lined the streets of Windsor to get a glimpse of the couple while millions of viewers around the world watch in anticipation.”
“The countdown to the royal wedding is finally over as Prince Harry and Meghan Markle prepare to tie the knot after a turbulent week full of dramatic twists.”


"If you are reading this in an application, click here."
"Mailonline provides you with the latest updates."
"By 1 p.m., the newlyweds will appear on the West steps of the church, where they will be waved off by two family members."
"When Prince Charles stepped in as a late substitute, it was revealed that before the royal couple took the oath, Prince Charles would take Ms. markel to the aisle of the church at 12 pm."
"More than 100000 Royal fans watched the couple on both sides of Windsor's streets, while millions of viewers around the world watched in anticipation."
"The countdown to the royal wedding is finally over. Prince Harry and Megan Marcel are getting married after a week of turmoil full of dramatic changes."



Number  191
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Flawless: The simple look was signature for Victoria's style in recent years, which has also carried into her own brandsAmazing: With the look she certainly proved why she was worthy of such a fashion honour...”
“X vb #spicegirls #friendshipneverends (sic).'”
“And Victoria Beckham proved why she was worthy of such an award as she led the People's Choice Awards red carpet on Sunday in a statement white trouser suit.”
“The 44-year-old stood out in the lightly-coloured ensemble as she attended the star-studded event at Santa Monica's Barker Hangar.”
“Gorgeous Victoria Beckham was putting on a stylish display in a chic white trouser suit on Sunday night as she led the star studded People s Choice Awards in Santa Monica Ever the style icon Victoria showed off her trim figure in the classic white blazer and matching trousers teamed...”
“...with a lace slip style vest and black heels...”
“The mother-of-four sported her signature smile with her brunette tresses pulled into a low-key up-do.”
“Victoria's trip to the awards also proved to be a hectic outing as she also took to Instagram to reveal she was having to do her hair in the car en route to the event.”
“Looking good Ever the style icon Victoria showed off her trim figure in the classic white blazer and matching trousers teamed with a lace slip style vest and black heels Amazing The 44 year old mother of four had her ageless complexion on full display with a simple bronzed smoky...”
“...eye contoured cheeks and a nude lip Hurry up...”


"Flawless: simple modeling is the symbol of Victoria's style in recent years, which is also reflected in her own brand design: she uses this modeling to prove why she deserves such fashion honor..."
“X vb#spicegirls#friendship neverends（sic）。”
"On Sunday, Victoria Beckham wore a white trouser suit to lead the red carpet of the people's Choice Award, which proves why she deserves such an award."
"The 44 year old stood out in a light ensemble at a starry event in Santa Monica's Barker hangar."
"On Sunday night, the gorgeous Victoria Beckham, wearing chic white trousers and leading the star studded people's Choice Awards in Santa Monica, shows her fashion side. Victoria Beckham, the fashion icon, shows her slim figure in classic white suit and matching trousers ”
“… With lace tank top and black heels... "
"The mother of four has her signature smile, pulling her dark hair into a low-key upper body."
"Victoria's award trip has also proved to be a busy outing because she also revealed on instagram that she had to have her hair done in the car on the way to the event."
"It looks good. Victoria, the fashion icon, shows her slim figure in her classic white coat and matching trousers, lace vest and black high-heeled shoes. Surprisingly, the mother of four, 44, shows her eternal skin color with a simple bronze smoked shoe..."
“… Eye contour, cheek and bare lip quick... "



Number  192
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““My lil mama 1 month today,” he wrote on top of an adorable snap: a close-up of Stormi‘s sweater that read “DADDY” inside a red heart.”
“Image zoom Stormi Webster | Credit: Kylie Jenner/InstagramJenner and boyfriend Travis Scott welcomed Stormi, their first child, on Feb. 1.”
“Kylie Jenner Shares First Look at 1-Month-Old Daughter Stormi's FaceStormi Webster has her first selfie!”
“On Saturday, new mom Kylie Jenner, 20, shared the first shot of her 1-month-old daughter’s face to Snapchat in an adorable video complete with the social network’s popular fire filter.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The tiny tot looked happy as can be in the photo as she sucked on a purple pacifier.”
“She wore a white onesie top that covered her hands and a fur-like hood over her head.”
“Mom Jenner labelled the video, “My pretty girl.”Her post came hours after she posted a photo of Stormi’s latest duds: a handful of colorful baby Adidas tracksuits.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”


"My little mother is a month old today," he wrote in a lovely snapshot: a close-up of Tommy's sweater, which says "Dad is in a red heart."
Image zooming stormi Webster | image source: on February 1, Kylie Jenner / instagram Jenner and her boyfriend Travis Scott welcomed their first child, stormi
Kelly Jenner shares the first face of her one month old daughter, Tommy Webster's first self portrait
"On Saturday, Kylie Jenner, a 20-year-old new mother, shared her first picture of her one month old daughter in a lovely video with the popular fire filter on the social network."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The baby sucks the purple pacifier and looks very happy."
"She was wearing a white tunic, covering her hands, and a fur hat on her head."
The video was tagged "my pretty girl" by Jenna's mother, who released a new matte photo of stout a few hours ago: a colorful Adidas baby sportswear
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."



Number  193
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Here\u2019s the Good, the Bad, and the Ugly”,”reading_time”:11}]};”
“Vox dug deep into this phenomenon, and Card Advice Is Going Viral on TikTok.”
“But while many of the tips you might find are pretty useful \u2014 hello, tortilla trend \u2014 there\u2019s plenty of bad advice floating around, especially on a topic near and dear to our hearts at NextAdvisor: personal finance.”
“Here’s What to Know About Legal Sports tips can help you turn an average skill into an above average side the Tips for Starting a Side Hustle From Experts Who\u2019ve Done it is known for viral videos and life hacks galore.”
“Here\u2019s what you should know the Are Betting Billions on Super Bowl LV.”
“...const FP = you make money from sports betting leading up to the Super Bowl?”


"Here are the good, the bad, the ugly", "reading time: 11}]}
"Vox delves into this phenomenon, and the card proposal spreads on tiktok."
"However, although you may find many tips very useful, tortilla trend has a lot of bad suggestions, especially a topic we are very concerned about: Personal Finance on next advisor."
"Here's some knowledge about legal sports, which can help you turn a common skill into a higher than average skill. These skills are provided by some experts who are famous for virus videos and a lot of life hackers. "
"Here's what you should know, they bet billions on Super Bowl Lv."
“… Const FP = did you make money from sports gambling before the super bowl? "



Number  194
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Can’t we talk this out instead #DuckandcoverDad.””
“Ella?”
“The baseball star took to his Instagram to share a picture of him and his daughters Natasha, 12, and Ella, nine,” showing off their boxing moves “Tashi?”
““I’ve never seen anyone work and have the type of work ethic she does.” While Alex didn’t have Jennifer by his side during the opening of the gym, he had two more of his special ladies in her place.”
“...of two...”
“A post shared by Alex Rodriguez arod on Aug 11 2017 at 5 08pm PDT MORE Alex admits that he gets mistaken for Jennifer s bodyguard I think humility work ethic what an incredible daughter and mother she is and just a great team player he said about the mother...”
“When asked about his lady’s work ethic, Alex couldn’t help but to sing her praises.”
“She does all types of workouts which I don’t try to keep up.” Last week, Jennifer showed off her intense leg day workout in NYC with fitness trainer David Kirsch before heading to the set of Shades of Blue.”
“She goes to TruFusion.”
““She’s a former track star from junior high.” When asked if Jennifer, who he’s been dating since March, will make an appearance at the new facility, the baseball correspondent replied, “She’ll be here.”


"Can't we say that, dad?"
"Ella?"
The baseball star shared on instagram photos of him and his daughters Natasha, 12, and Ella, 9, "showing their boxing moves" Tashi
"I've never seen anyone work, and I don't have her work ethic." Although Alex didn't have Jennifer around at the opening of the stadium, he had two special ladies in her position
“… Two... "
"Alex Rodriguez arod shared a post on PDT more at 5:08 p.m. on August 11, 2017. Alex admitted that he was mistakenly regarded as Jennifer's bodyguard. I think she has a humble professional ethics. What an incredible daughter and mother she is, just a great team co-author. He said about mother..."
"When asked about his wife's professional ethics, Alex couldn't help praising her."
Last week, in New York, Jennifer showed off a day of intense leg training with fitness coach David Kirsch before heading to the shadows of blue series
"She went to trufusion."
"She used to be a junior high school track star." Asked if Jennifer would show up at the new venue, the baseball reporter replied, "she'll be here."



Number  195
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Kardashian also puts out homemade napkin holders made with fresh rosemary, cinnamon sticks and a small gold bell held together with natural twine.”
“I don’t get hung up about things like that.”Image zoom Credit: Burke DoerenImage zoom Credit: Burke DoerenHer finishing touches include red roses in gold vases to tie in with the flatware.”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“The glasses she uses are hand-me-downs from her parents' wedding.”
“See Kourtney Kardashian's 'Over the Top' Christmas Table Setting with Plates from Her ChildhoodKourtney Kardashian is all about mixing old and new when it comes to setting her Christmas table.”
“In a new post on her app, the Keeping Up with the Kardashians star reveals that she hosts all of her sisters on Christmas morning for a holiday breakfast.”
“The occasion allows her to pull out all her best holiday decor—an act the whole family seems to enjoy.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Christmas is one of my favorite holidays and we always go overboard in decorating the whole house,” she says.”
“The kids love this time of year so we have a tree in each of their bedrooms and also a bunch of big trees throughout the house Image zoom Credit Tommaso Boddi WireImage Image zoom Credit Burke Doeren In the dining room of her California home Kardashian uses Christmas placemats...”


Kardashian also introduced a homemade napkin holder made of fresh rosemary, cinnamon sticks and a small golden bell tied together with natural hemp rope
"I won't worry about such a thing." Image zooming credit: Burke Dolan image zooming credit: Burke Dolan's finishing touches include putting red roses in a Gold Vase and matching them with tableware
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"The glasses she used were from her parents' wedding."
"Take a look at Kourtney Kardashian's" over fire "Christmas table arrangement with plates when she was a child. When she sets the Christmas table, Kourtney Kardashian should have both the old and the new."
"In a new post on her app, the" follow Kardashian "star revealed that she hosted all her sisters on Christmas morning and prepared holiday breakfast for them."
"This occasion made her come up with her best holiday decoration, which seems to be a favorite behavior of the whole family."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Christmas is one of my favorite festivals and we always over decorate the whole house," she said
"Kids love this time of the year, so we have a tree in each of their bedrooms, and there's a bunch of big trees all over the house



Number  196
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So it’s not entirely out of his realm to run a comedy/meme account on Instagram.”
“I will never forget this dumb peanut butter and jelly joke that lasted lit’rally two years.”
“A few things about this: A) why does it matter if she secretly runs this innocent account?”
“Management had not responded at the time of writing, but shortly after questions were sent through, we’re sad to report the onionringsworldwide account was removed from Instagram.”
“Newshub contacted Lorde’s management to ask whether Lorde likes onion rings, whether she prefers a light batter on her onion rings, and whether she runs the account.”
“The account has since been deleted.”
“Instead?”
“Newshub reached out to her management and they didn’t respond.”
“Even more evidence that this account was run by non-Royal Lorde?”
“), helped the fan build a strong case that this account was actually run by Lorde.”


"Therefore, opening a comedy / meme account on instagram is not entirely out of his scope."
"I'll never forget this stupid peanut butter and jelly joke that lasted two years."
"There are a few things about this: a) what does it matter if she secretly manages this innocent account?"
"At the time of writing, management has not responded, but shortly after the issue, we regret to report that the onionioningswordwide account has been removed from instagram."
"Newshub contacted Lord's management and asked if Lord liked onion rings, if she liked to put a light batter on them, and if she was in charge of the account."
"The account has been deleted."
"On the contrary?"
"The news center contacted her management and they didn't respond."
"More evidence that the account was run by a non Royal aristocrat?"
"), helped fans build a strong evidence that the account was actually managed by Lord."



Number  197
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Although I’m much healthier than I was a year ago, complications arose from my most recent endometriosis surgery.””
““Thank you for all the love & concern that’s been pouring in since Tuesday,” Dunham wrote on Instagram.”
“...support after her hospital stay...”
“That doesn t mean it can never return but for now once my sutures have been removed and my bruises have changed from blue to yellow to green to gone I will be healthy But her condition took a turn after the Met Gala and she thanked fans for their...”
“Between my surgeries and hormonal intervention, I was disease-free.”
““When I emerged, cotton-mouthed, Randy told me something I hadn’t expected to hear, maybe ever: there was no endometriosis left.”
““My surgery went off without a hitch,” she wrote.”
“...to Hospital After Met Gala for Endometriosis Complications In an April 4 Lenny Letter Dunham had announced that she was endometriosis free after a fifth surgery...”
“Lenny is about giving 100 percent of ourselves 100 percent of the time and I couldn t bear to limp through this Dunham adds that all tickets will be refunded and that we hope to be back when my uterus has taken a chill pill RELATED VIDEO Lena Dunham Rushed...”
“...this tour she writes...”


"Although I'm much healthier than I was a year ago, my latest endometriosis surgery caused complications."
"Thank you for all the love and care you've given since Tuesday," Dunham wrote on instagram
“… Post hospital support... "
"It doesn't mean it won't come back, but now, once my stitches are removed and my bruises change from blue to yellow to green, I'll be healthy, but her condition has changed after the met Party, and she thanks the fans for their..."
"Between surgery and hormonal intervention, I have no disease."
"When I showed up, Randy told me something I didn't expect to hear, maybe never: there's no endometriosis."
"My operation went well," she wrote
"On April 4, Lenny announced in a letter that she had recovered from endometriosis after her fifth operation..."
"Lenny is going to give ourselves 100% of the time and I can't stand limping through this Dunham added that all the tickets will be returned and we hope to come back when my uterus has taken a cold pill related video of Lenna Dunham in a hurry..."
“… She wrote about this trip... "



Number  198
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“...s Next for Dan Egan EXCLUSIVE Veep Star Reid Scott on Just How Low Dan Egan Will Go For His Career This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors...”
“Reporting by Brendon Geoffrion RELATED CONTENT Veep Halts Production on Final Season as Julia Louis Dreyfus Undergoes Breast Cancer Treatment EXCLUSIVE Veep Star Anna Chlumsky on Amy s Pregnancy She s Got Choices to Make EXCLUSIVE Veep Star Reid Scott on the Show s Brilliant Move This Season and What...”
“For more about the Veep star, watch the video below.”
“Congratulations to the happy family!”
“"He's a chubby, little guy, so he keeps seeing Mommy's belly, and then he looks at his own belly and says, 'I have a baby too,'" Scott told People in August.”
“According to Scott, Conrad was excited about becoming a big brother.”
“March at the Screen Actors Guild Awards in 2015”
“Scott posted a shot of the couple posing on the red carpet writing Happy to be Home Again with my bride and the bump This was the second red carpet reveal for the couple who announced the pending arrival of their older son Conrad who turns three years old in...”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
“… Next Dan Egan exclusive veep star reed Scott about how low Dan Egan's career is going to be. This video is not available because we can't load sponsor information... "
"According to Brendan Jefferson, due to the fact that Julia Louis Dreyfus is undergoing breast cancer treatment, veep will stop production in the last season. Exclusive veep star Anna klensky can choose exclusive veep star reed Scott's wonderful actions in this season's program when Amy is pregnant. What else..."
"For more information about veep star, watch the video below."
"Congratulations to this happy family
"He's a chubby little guy, so he always looks at his mother's stomach, and then he looks at his stomach and says," I have a baby, too, "Scott told people in August
"According to Scott, Conrad is happy to be a big brother."
"2015 Screen Actors Guild Awards parade"
"Scott posted a picture of the couple posing on the red carpet, which said," I'm glad to be with my bride again. "This is the couple's second appearance on the red carpet. They announced their upcoming eldest son, Conrad, who is three years old..."



Number  199
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Oh, ohNever coming down...”
“If fans vote with Xfinity, there is a limit of 10 votes per nominee, per set-top box.”
“People’s Choice Awards” kicking off at 7p ET/PT.”
“Live From The Red Carpet: The E!”
“The 2018 People’s Choice Awards will be broadcast live from the Barker Hanger in Santa Monica on Sunday, November 11th starting at 9p ET/PT, with “E!”
“...favorites here...”
“Male Artist of 2018 Drake Keith Urban Ed Sheeran Shawn Mendes Bruno Mars Country Artist of 2018 Thomas Rhett Luke Bryan Carrie Underwood Blake Shelton Keith Urban View the complete list of finalists and learn more about voting for your...”
“Check out which country music stars scored nominations below!”
“For Google search, users must be logged into their Gmail account and they can vote up to 25 times per session per category.”
“Share this news with other country music fans!”


"Oh, oh, never come down..."
"If fans use xfinity to vote, the voting limit for each nominator and set-top box is 10 votes."
People's choice awards start at 7 p.m. Eastern time
"Red carpet live: e!"
"The 2018 people's Choice Awards will be broadcast live on Sunday, November 11, at Barker's hanger in Santa Monica, starting at 9 o'clock Eastern time, accompanied by" E! "
“… Favorites here
"Drake Keith Urban Male Artist ed Sheeran Shawn Mendes Bruno 2018 Mars country artist Thomas Rhett Luke Bryan carrier Underwood Blake Shelton Keith Urban view the full shortlist to learn more about the votes for you..."
"See which of the following country music stars has been nominated!"
"For Google search, users must log in to their Gmail account and can vote up to 25 times per session per category."
"Share this news with other country music fans!"



Number  200
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
The total pass rate is  0.28
Correct number is  56
Total number is  200
(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ 
